CHAP. I.
Hiatus valde deflendus, multa desiderantur.
HERE is a great gap. Not a word said about
the travels of the Captain, from the packing up of
Teague, and sending him off to France, until after
the termination of the French revolution, and the
armistice
or convention of Amiens. Though the fact
is, that he had been, all this time, travelling, and
Teague had rejoined him, in the capacity of a
pediseque
,
or foot-boy, as before. As to Duncan the
Scotch waiter, he had, long since, left the service,
and taken a job of weaving in the neighbourhood, and
was doing well. The Captain had endeavoured to
persuade him to take to preaching, as many do in
this country who are less qualified, but he refused,
alledging, that though it was good work that pleased
the customer, yet he had some scruples of conscience
in undertaking the charge, not having been regularly
called by ordination to the office.
Teague had been landed at Nantz, and being a
real sans culotte, was liberated, as we have said, and
carressed by the multitude. With considerable eclat,
he made his way to Paris. We hear of him at a very
early period as made use of, by Anacharsis Cloots,
the Orator of the human race; This was in a
procession
of that uncommon man, in which
representatives
of all nations, were introduced in their
respective
garbs, addressing the Convention to bring liberty
and equality amongst them. Teague was in the
character
of an Esquimaux Indian, and passed his
aboriginal
Irish, for the native dialect of that people. An
Irish officer or two that were present discovered the
imposition, but the gillotine forbad them to speak,
and they were silent.
This ultramarine person, as he was called, for
they had ultramontain men enough among
themselves
,
was a good deal distinguished during the
rign of Robespiere, and was employed on many
occasions
,
and discharged a variety of functions, so that
though his morals were not much amended, nor his
address much improved, sans culotism still
continuing
the order of the day, yet he had contracted some
French phrases, and could interlard his Hibernian
dialect with a que voulez vous; and je demand
pardon
,
without hesitation or embarrassment. At length
however, he found himself in the conciergerie, a
destination
from which no talents, virtues, or even vices
could exempt any man; and it was only on the fall
of that monster of whom we have just made mention,
that he was vomited with others from the caverns in
which he had been included. How he ever got to
America again it is difficult to say. We shall leave
that to those who may take from his own mouth the
memoirs of his travels. It is sufficient for our
purpose
,
that he did get back, and that he is once more
in the train of the Captain. The fact is, that he had
joined him in a most unexpected manner, in a short
A 3
time after Duncan the Scotch servant had begged
to be dismissed, and applyed himself to a profession
more congenial with his education.
We shall go no farther back upon the steps of the
Captain, with the bog-trotter at his heels, than where
we find them within a mile, or less of the village where
his home was, and where he had resided some years,
before he had set out on his peregrinations. Passing
through a wood just as he approached the town, he
saw at some distance before him the semblance of men
suspended on the limbs of trees, or at least the exuvi
of men, coats, waist-coats, breeches, and hats. What
can this be, said the Captain? It is probable that
hearing
of your return, Teague, the wags of the village
have been making what are called Padies, and have
set them up on these trees, knowing that this way we
should come along. By St. Patrick then, said
Teague, but I will Pady dem wid dis shalelah. I will
tache dem to make Padies, and hang dem up for sign
posts in de wood here. Dis is not Saint Patrick's
day in de morning neider: Bad luck to dem, it may
be some poor fellows dat dey have hang'd up in
reality
,
for shape stalling as dey do in Ireland.
I see nothing, said the Captain, drawing nearer,
but the emptyings of ward-robes, jibbeted on these
trees, through the grove: stretched on limbs, or
suspended
from them, a phenomenon, which I am
unable
to comprehend, or explain; For I see no corn
growing underneath, or near about, from which, a
priapus, or scare-crow might affright the birds; nor
can they be the vestments of people at work, near
hand, or stripped to bathe, as I see no water pond, or
river, but a dry grove.
The fact is, these habiliments were of the people
of the town, who had hung them up to take the dew,
in order to take off the musk of a pole-cat which had
affected them from the perfusions of one of these
animals
.
The story is as follows.
Not long before this, a typographist, had set up a
paper in the village and having reference to the
sharpness
of his writings, the editor had chosen to assume
the symbol, or hieroglyphic of the Porcupine, and in
allusion to his quills called himself Peter Porcupine;
whimsically Peter, because Peter, and Porcupine,
begin with the same letter, and produces what is
called an alliteration. Such respondence has been
thought a beauty, in some languages, and at some
periods. In the English language, it was a
constituent
of poetry, a few centuries ago; and though now
disused, yet is retained in appellations, where fiction
is at liberty, and quaintness and humour is intended.
Nor was the device or synonime of Porcupine, ill
chosen. For the editor could dart his quills to some
purpose. To drop the figure, a happy nature had
fited him for a satyrist, and felicity of education was
not wanting to qualify him for the office. He had
not the pleasantry of Horace, nor the pungency of
Juvenal, but an original stricture of his own that
supplied
the place of them. The truth is, he had been
bred in the barracks, and had at his finger ends, the
familiar phrases of the common soldiery, with that
peculiar species of wit, which is common with that
occupation of men, and in that grade. Doubtless we
see something like it among the plebeians of all
classes and denominations; The women that sell fish
at a certain stand in London, have a species of it,
known by the name of Billingsgate, either because there
is a gate of that name near the place, or formerly
was one. The miners and coal heavers have a good
deal of it. The scavengers and chimney sweepers
are adepts, though without the least scholastic
education
,
or knowledge of letters whatsoever. I have
known even in our own country, where we are remote
from the seats of the muses, a good deal of it
possessed
,
by way travellers, or boat men on our rivers.
It is a kind of unshakled dialect; fettered by no rule
of delicacy, or feeling of humanity. I have been
turning
in my mind what word in our English language, best
expresses it, and I have found it to be that which has
been given it by Thomas Paine,
black-guardism
. The
editor of the Porcupine had scored the village not a
little. I do not say rubbed. For that is a translation
of the phrase of Horace: urbem defricuit; and
conveys
the idea of tickling, and causing a sensation in
part, pleasant, yet hurting a little. That was not the
case here. For what man without indignation and
bitter resentment, can bear the touch of the slanderer,
more especially if that slander is of a private, and
domestic
nature and alludes to what cannot be explained
or defended. Not that it is true, but a man in the
just pride of standing in society, would scorn to appeal
to the public or bring it before a court!
There was in the village a man of understanding,
and sensibility who had been the subject of
caracature
by Peter, and not chusing for reasons that
weighed
with himself, to take it in good part, thought of
retaliation. But what could he do? The same
language
was unbecoming a gentleman. The like
strictures
of foibles or of faults on the part of an
adversary
,
could only become the character of a subordinate.
Nor was it so much his object to repress the
licentiousness
of this buffoon, as to correct the taste and
judgment of the public who did not all at once
distinguish
the impropriety of countenancing such
ribbaldry
This they continued to do by receiving his
papers.
With a view to this having taken a pole-cat on
the mountains, he had put it in a cage and hiring an
office contiguous to that of Porcupine he kept it,
suffering
the boys of the village to provoke it, and the dogs
to bark at it through the bars. The consequence
was, that Peter himself, and not unfrequently the
female
part of his family passing and repassing, were
besprinkled with the effluvia and offended with the
odour of the animal. The effusions were excited by
the irritations of others; but friend and foe were
indiscriminately
the objects of the vapour when they came
in the way of its ascension. It was in vain to
complain
;
the owner called himself Paul Pole-cat, and
when Peter expostulated and justified his gall on the
freedom of the Press
, Paul fortified himself on the
liberty of the
Express
.
But it was not Peter alone nor his unoffending
wife and family that had reason to complain of this
nuisance. The children running home to their
parents
,
and the dogs with them brought the perfume to
the houses of the village. The wearing apparel of
almost every one was affected with the musk; the
women buried their dresses; the men in some
instances
did so, and in others, hung them up to the action
of the air, and the dews of the adjoining wood.
The vestiges of these were the phenomena,
which the Captain saw, in his approach to the town.
He had now got within sight of the main square,
when a tumultuous assembly struck his eye; some
with fists raised; others with sticks, and all in a
menacing
attitude. He could also hear tongues of
people
altercating with one another and using opprobrious
epithets.
The fact was, that the village had become divided.
Those who had been the subjects of the obloquy of
Porcupine, justified the emission of the cats, and were
of opinion that the one had as good a right to be
borne as the other. Council had been taken and
learned
opinions given. But this making the matter no
better, the dissention had increased, and the people
had come together in a rage.
Teague at a distance seeing this, stop'd short;
said he, what means all this paple in de street? It is
as bad as dat of St. Anthony in Paris, or de place de
greve where dey have de gillotine. The devil burn
me if I go farther, 'till your honour, goes on and sees
what is de matter.
The Captain advancing to the populace was
recognized
by them, and his appearance contributed not
a little to a longer suspension of hostilities.
Countrymen and fellow-citizens, said he, is this
the satisfaction that I have, in returning amongst you
after an absence of several years, to see man armed
against man, and war waged not only in the very
bosom of the republic, but in the village which I have
instructed by many precepts? What can be the
madness
that possesses you? are not the evils of life
sufficient
but you must increase them by the positive
acts of your own violence. You cannot wholly
preserve
yourselves at all times free from the maladies of
the body, or the distresses of the mind. But it is in
your power greatly to assuage these, by the virtues of
temperance and moderation. What fury can prompt
you, to this degree of apparent resentment, and
approaching
tumult. Is it local or general politics? Is
it any disagreement with regard to your corporate
interests
,
or is religion the cause? Has any flagrant
instance
of moral turpitude, or exceeding knavery in an
individual, roused you to this excess of violence, and
exclamation?
Captain, said a middle aged man stepping
forward
,
companion of his years, and who had long lived
with him in the village; it is not only pleasing to see
you return in apparent, good health, but more
especially
,
at this particular moment when your
interference
cannot but be of the greatest use, to the citizens;
not only on account of that confidence which they
have in your judgment and discretion, of which they
have a lively recollection; but as they must naturally
think that your opportunities from travelling must
have given you knowledge, and brought you home
full fraught with learning and information. Your
humanity is also, well remembered by them, that
man, woman or child was never injured by you, in
life, estate, or reputation; that on the contrary, it was
always your study to do good, and compose
differences
.
Now a misfortune has happened to the
village
If I can call it a misfortune, which was at first
thought a good; a printer came to this place and set
up a paper, or gazette, by taking subscriptions from
those that were willing to give them. His device
was the Porcupine; and his motto, I forget what.
Scarcely a month had gone over his head before he
began to lampoon; searching into the secrets of
families
,
and publishing matters of individuals, with
which, whether true or false, the public had nothing
to do; ridiculing virtue as if it was vice; and this
in so low and disorderly a manner, that the more
intelligent
have disapproved of it; but the bulk read,
and it seems to increase rather than curtail his
subscribers
.
A young man on the other hand that has
come to us since you went away, and has had an
academic
education, had given his opinion pretty
freely
in companies, that this Porcupine was not a
gentleman
,
which drew upon himself the paragraph's of
Porcupine, which he has resented in a manner, that
has wrought much disturbance. Meaning to
burlesque
his manner of writing, having gone to the
mountain with a dog, or a trap, or both, and having
taken a pole-cat, he puts the beast in a cage; hires
that frame building that you see, one story high, and
but a room on a floor, and calls it his office. Here
he places the pole-cat with a man to attend it. What
a running of boys; what a barking of dogs we have
had! and when the children run home, and the dogs
after them; what a putting of the hand upon the
nose, by the servant girls and the misstresses, at the
smell that accompanies. The young man justifies
himself under the pretence that it is but retaliation
to the worse than animal odor that proceeds from the
press of Porcupine; for, as this affects the organ of
smelling, that disgusts the judgment of the mind.
The people are divided, as will always be the case,
if for no other cause, yet for the sake of division;
because
the pride of one man forbids him to think just
as another does. But in this case, the cause is
serious
and solid, for the olfactory organ is offended by
Paul, but the heart itself is wounded by Peter. The
adversaries of the opposum, or what else it is, insist
that it shall be put down as a nuisance, and have met
with clubs, staves and knives, to carry the threat into
execution. The advocates of the animal on the other
hand have convened to opppose them.
But said the Captain, did I not leave you a regular
corporation? Have you not power to make bye laws?
and is not this done upon notice given by the chief or
Assistant Burgesses? why such hurry scurry as this?
moreover it is a weighty question that agitates the
public mind; a question of right: and where the
rights of the citizen come in question, I hold it a most
delicate thing to decide; in a free government, more
especially, where the essence of liberty is the
preservation
of right; and there are three rights, the right
of concience, the right of property and the right of
refutation. This is a right of property; for if this
animal which is fer natur, has been reclaimed by
the owner, he has a right to put it to such use as suits
his trade, or accords with his whim, provided that it
does not affect the rights of others. The limit,
boundary
,
or demarcation of this use, is a question of wise
discussion and examination; and not in a tumultuous
assembly, heated not with wine, but with the ardency
of their own spirits. I advise therefore, and so far
as my weak judgment deserves to be regarded would
recommend, that each man lay down his shalelah,
baton, or walking-stick, and retire for the evening;
and convene to-morrow in a regular town meeting,
B
where the adversaries and advocates on both sides may
have an opportunity of being heard. You have
lawyers
also amongst you, who on such an occasion owe
their services to the public without fee or reward; for
as when the matter respects the digging a trench, or
building a bridge, the mechanics speak, and ask no
peculiar douceur, or perquisite; so on this occasion,
the gentlemen of the long robe will not be wanting to
develope a case that involves in it a nice question of
law and municipal regulation. To-morrow when ye
meet with the chief Burgess regularly in the chair, to
keep order, and preserve decorum assign the proper
times of speaking, and call to order on a deviation from
the subject, as is usual in deliberative assemblies, the
business can be taken up and conducted as is proper
in town meetings. Besides I am just from my
journey
;
somewhat fatigued; but more moved by the
consideration
that I am on horse-back, and it is not
becoming
that I take a part in your debates as if my
horse were to speak also; for though it is true that
some of you may speak with perhaps as little sense
as he could, were he to open his mouth and attempt
utterance; yet the decency of the thing forbids, and
even the exercise of the right might be questioned; for
the faculty might exist, yet he could not be considered
as legitimately franchised to this privilege, at least
not having a right to vote in town meetings. For
though in the Congress of the United States, the
representatives
of the territories, not yet organized into
independent states, and made regular and complete
members of the Union, have a right to speak, but not
to vote, this is not to be drawn into precedent in
subordinate
corporations; for that is a special provision
of the constitution within which as a groove, the states
move. And it is even indecorous for myself to sit
here and speak, mounted, as occupying a more
elevated
station; and should I descend from my cavalry,
my servant whom you see yonder, is kept at bay, by
an apprehension of your swords, and refuses to come
up, so that I am without an attendant to hold the
beast; all things considered therefore, I move, if you
will excuse the expression, a chairman not yet
being
appointed, who might put the question, that you
adjourn, or dissolve until to-morrow about this
time, when the matter may be taken up as we now
have it, and the affair canvassed as becomes members
of the same community, and inhabitants of the same
village.
It cannot be difficult to conceive that these words
had a favourable effect upon the audience; as oils
compose a storm. For as the waves of the ocean
rise and fall suddenly, so the passions of men; and
in no instance more than where they are just coming
to blows; for approaching anger disposes to peace,
every one having felt half a blow already on his head;
and the difficulty only is to get an excuse, for
returning
,
or sheathing the weapon. They are much
obliged
to the man that councils concord; and advises the
puting down the brick-bat, or puting on the coat.
Even in dueling it holds the same, and the principal
is a friend to the second ever after, that manages the
matter so wisely that no blood is shed.
It was moved and seconded before the people
should retire; for the mob had insensibly begun to
assume the form of a regular assembly; it was moved
and seconded that in the mean time the keeper, or
as he called himself the editor of the pole-cat, should
keep his charge within the claustrum, or bars of his
cage, and covered with a matting, so that access
might not be had to him, by man or beast, or egress
on his part, of that offensive odour, which had been
the cause of the disturbance. This, the partizans of
the skunk, were willing to admit and sanction with
their acquiescence, on condition, nevertheless, that
the Porcupine in the mean time, should also restrain
his quills; in other words, suspend the effusions of
his press, and cease to distribute papers for a day or
two while the matter was depending. This was
thought reasonable, and carried by the multitude
holding up their hands.
CHAP. II.
CONTAINING PROCEEDINGS OF THE TOWN MEETING.
The day following, a meeting being held, and the Chief
Burgesa in the chair, an advocate of Porcupine took
the ground and spoke
.
Gentlemen, said he, the press is the palladium of
liberty. The image that fell down from Jupiter.
The freedom of the press is essential to liberty.
Shackle the press, and you restrain freedom. The
constitutions of the states have provided that the press
shall be free. If you muzzle this, you may as well
muzzle the mouth of man.
It is not the freedom of the press, said one
interupting
him, it is the abuse of it that is in question.
The chief burgess called to order, and the
speaker
went on.
That is the point, said he, to which I meant to
come. What shall be said to be the abuse of the
press? In order to determine this, we must consider
its use. This is,
1. The amusement of the editor. For as some
men amuse themselves, shooting, fishing, or chacing
with the hound, wild beasts, so men of literary taste,
find their recreation in penning paragraphs for a
paper
,
sometimes containing information, or
observations
on the state of empires, and the characters of
great men; at other times by descending, or not rising
B 2
at all, but confining themselves to the subordinate,
affairs of individuals, and private persons.
2. The profit of the editor: and this depends on
the number of subscribers. It is not every one that
has a taste for refined writing. An editor must be
all things to all men, that he may gain some.
Guts and garbage delight bears; and swine swill the
trough in preference to the running stream.
Black-guardism
is the gout of many. Nay it is the more
prevailing taste;
The world is naturally averse
To all the truth it sees or hears;
But swallows nonsense and a lie,
With greediness and gluttony.
In Britain, or some other countries, delicacy may
succeed. But the coarse stomachs of the Americans
crave rather indelicacy and indecency, at least a
portion
of it. Rough like their own woods, and wild
beasts, they digest scurrility.
Well done Porcupine, said a pole-cat man, taking
the ground in his turn: well said. But this furnishes
a ground to justify the introduction of the pole-cat.
You talk of the freedom of the press. Here is the
freedom of the express. Nay the word
expression
which is common to both institutions, the artificial
one of the types, and the natural one of the cat, shews
the original to be similar, and the comparison
to run
on all-fours
. If the ink cast into black letter, and
carrying with it pain and pungency from the ideas
communicated, is tolerated; much more the volatile
alkali of the animal that is now set up, is to be born,
as not more offensive to body or mind. Shall the bark
of trees made into powder, and this powder into a
liquid, impregnated with thought, and put upon
paper, and carried to the press, be accounted
harmless
,
notwithstanding the violence of the decoction, to
speak figuratively, yet the wild cats that inhabit those
trees, and are denizens of the forest, be prohibited
the haunts of men, because of a bag under their tails
which contains an unsavoury distillation, and may
be occasionally spurted upon men?
A young lawyer took him up on the side of
Porcupine
.
The principles of the common law embrace
this case. It is unlawful to exercise trades in towns
that occasion noisome smells; they are abateable as
nuisances.
Grant it, said another on the pole-cat side; but
when it is in retaliation, or in self-defence against an
editor whose defamation is more offensive to the
feelings
of the mind, than the hogo of a civet to the sense of
smelling; or when it is used in burlesque, and by way
of analogy and symbol to explain the impropriety of
encouraging
such personal abuse, by taking papers, it
may correct by leading to reflection. The mind may
be insensible to abstract lessons, but a paradigm, or
object
set before it may affect. As to this man carrying
on his trade or occupation by the smell of a cat, it is
an occupation which can be carried on to advantage
only in a town; for it is in towns chiefly that editors
assemble; and it is by seting up under our noses, and
affecting the readers, that the impression is made.
For if the public will receive into their houses for the
use of themselves and families gossip slander, let
them take a little of this hartshorn with it and if they
will have the one, bear the other. A ground of the
common law is general reason adopted to particular
cases. I grant that it even goes so far as to make the
keeping hogs in a pen so near my window, in towns,
as to offend by the smell, a nuisance; but this is a
borough incorporated, and can by a bye law regulate a
new trade. I hold it to be a matter of vote, and
nothing
more; whether this quadruped shall be tolerated
or excluded.
The advocate for the press rejoined. The
common
law, said he, protects the press. It is the right
of the tongue transfered to the hand: it ought to be
as free as the air that we breathe: The privilege,
as unfettered as the organs of articulation. But what
is there in the common law to protect from the
aspersion
of this animal?
The pole-cat man replied. It is on principle and
by analogy, said he, that it is protected. Does not the
law of water courses apply to this. If a man divert
a stream from my meadow, or obstruct one running
through it, so as to dam it up, and drown the grass, have
not I a remedy; shall this man at much expence and
charge bring a beast from the mountains, tame it, or
reduce it under his dominion, and apply it to a purpose
in civilized and domestic life, and shall we say that
the common law does not protect him in the
enjoyment
of its musk?
The lawyer on the side of Porcupine rejoined. So
use your own said he, that you trespass not upon
another
mans. If you keep your smell, and hogs at
home to your own nose, there is no objection. But in
the nature of the thing it cannot be; for the air is the
natural conductor; and therefore it cannot but exist
a nuisance.
Surrejoinder by the other. But after all, is it more a
nuisance than the press, which it has in view to correct?
At this instant a commotion was perceivable
amongst the multitude; not on acount of what was
said, or meaning any disturbance like debate; but the
rumour was that a fresh cat had been brought from the
hills above the town, and was on its way to the
college-man
who had offered a reward for an additional puss
to increase his stock; and as it was conjectured, meant
to play it off under the pretext that the prohibition
contained
in the armistice extended only to the individual
beast that he had before in his possession.
The Captain, at this, rising, said; young man this
is not fair. It is within the reason, if not the express
words of the convention, that all annoyances by steam,
vapour or effluvix proceeding from a pole-cat shall be
suspended during the pendency of this question; and
it is an evasion to substitute another badger, and by
that means attempt to elude the stipulation.
The young man got up to explain. It is far from
me, said he, to elude or evade the performance of the
stipulation. The fact is, that hearing, a day or two
ago, that Porcupine, was about to enlarge his sheet,
and for that purpose had employed a journeyman, or
two more, I thought it not amiss to extend the scale
of my vapour and employ two conduits instead of
one. For that purpose had sent to the woods, for
another
cat, which is now on the way, but in a leathern
bag by my directions, and not to have regress, or
egress, until this assembly shall dissolve, nor for a
reasonable time after, that eundo, and redeundo, or
going as well as coming you may be safe let what
will be the issue of the controversy; whether I am
to break up stock, or be suffered to go on.
This explanation gave satisfaction, and composed
the assembly.
Another speaker had now occupied the ground.
I cannot say the floor, for there was no floor. I am,
said he, for supporting the press. The objection is,
that it is a blackguard press. But while there are
blackguards to write, must they not have a press? Is
it only men of polished education that have a right
to express their sentiments? Let them write in
magazines
,
or make books, or have gazettes of their
own, but not restrict the right that people of a more
uncultivated understanding have to amuse themselves
and others with their lucubrations. You call us the
Swinish Multitude, and yet refuse us the food that is
natural to us. Are there not amongst us that have
no relish for disquitions on the balance of power or
form of governments, agricultural essays, or
questions
of finance; but can comprehend and relish a
laugh raised at the expense of the master of a family;
or a public character in high station; if for no other
reason, but because it gratifies the self-love of those
who cannot attain the same eminence? Take away
from us this, and what have we more? What is the
press to us, but as it amuses?
I think, said another rising, that the gentleman
means irony. But let us take the matter seriously.
I am on the same side with him, but not for the same
reasons. I take it, that scurrility may be useful to
those that bear it, and are the subjects of it. It may
bring to a man's knowledge and serve to correct
foibles
that he would not otherwise have been conscious
of, or amended. Men will hear from the buffoon or
the jester, things they would not take from a friend,
and scarcely from a confessor. It was on this
principle
that in the middle ages of Europe, a profession
of men was indulged, and rewarded, in the houses
of the great, called the Joculators, or Jesters. So late
as the time of James I. we had one of these of the
name of Archy. The Duke of Buckingham
having taken offence at something that he said, had
him whipped. It was thought beneath a man of
honour
to have taken notice of it; and inflicted
punishment
I consider the bulk of our editors as
succeeding
to the joculators or fool-caps of the early periods;
and as the knights or men of character and dignity
of those times were not bound to notice the follies,
however
gross of jokers, so now a gentleman is not bound
to pay attention to the defamation of gazettes; nay,
as in the former instance, it was deemed
uncourteous
,
and unbecoming to resent what the fool said,
so more what a printer chuses to publish. Selden in
his table talk remarks, That a gallant man, is above
ill words. We have an example of this in the old
Lord of Salsbury, who was a great wise man. Stone
had called some Lord about the Court fool. The
Lord complains, and has Stone whipped. Stone cries,
I might have called my Lord of Salsbury often
enough, fool, before he would have had me whipped.
As in the case of the Merry Andrew, even when
there was no wit, it was taken for wit; so now, when
an editor means to divert, however dull his abuse, it
ought to be the mode to laugh, to keep those who
know no better in countenance.
The Captain rising and putting himself in the
attitude
of speaking, seemed to claim the attention of
the audience. I see here, said he, the Principal of
the Academy, a man of letters and learning. I would
wish to hear from him how the ancients managed
these matters: in the republics of Greece and Rome
especially. For since I have been abroad, and read
and heard public speeches, I find that it is no
unusual
thing to draw similies, and illustrations from the
sayings and doings of antiquity. In deliberate
assemblies
talking of governments, they tell you of the
Amphytrionic Council; the Achean league, the
Ionian confederacy. What was the freedom of the
press at Athens, or at Rome?
The principal risingThe fact is, said he, there
was no press at these places, or in these times. The
invention of printing is of later date. But they had
in lieu of pen and ink, what they called the style,
hence our phrase style, vertere stylum, and they
impressed their thoughts upon wax. They made use
of ink in copying upon vellum and parchment. But
notwithstanding the want of a press, they were not
without satyric salt in their writings. Nor are we
to suppose that they were altogether free from what
we denominate scurrility. They could call a spade
a spade. Aristophanes was a great blackguard. His
Comedy of the Clouds is a sufficient specimen.
Lucilius
,
amongst the Romans was a rough man. Cum
lutulentus flueret, &c. Do we suppose that nature
was not then the same as it is now? On board the
Roman gallies was there no low humour? In the
Roman camps none? In the Forum no occasional
ribaldry? Would not this naturally get up into higher
walks? Would it not creep into corporations?
sometimes in verse; sometimes in prose: versis
famosis. The poet speaks of the fesscenine verses.
Amongst the Romans the Saturnalia, or days of
Saturn
became a festival, in which it was allowable to
exercise their faculties in all intemperance of
language
.
This is all wide of the question, said an individual,
holding his hand upon his nose; it is shall we tolerate
the pole-cat in this village?For, maugre all the pains
that may have been taken to restrain the pett, and
confine it by a matting, I feel a portion of the fetor
this very moment, come across my nose, by a puff
of wind from that quarter, where it is. I move that
the question be taken, whether, whatever becomes of
the press, the nuisance of this beast, be suffered in the
vicinity. For what can a news-paper do, compared
with this? It is sent us and we read the
publication
.
But this is involuntary, on our part, and there
is no saving ourselves from the exhalation.
I move the previous question said a friend to the
baboon; or rather an enemy to the Porcupine. I
move that the press be put down, or that both go
together
.
There is hardship both ways, said an elderly
inhabitant
.
In a community different interests will exist.
Family interests; family attachments; party
conceptions
;
and party interests. The passions of the heart
will create differences. To have a printer all on one
side even though he be a dunce, is an inequality.
What if we prevail upon the owner, or as he would
call himself the publisher of the pole-cat, to give
up or sell out his establishment, dismiss the wild
C
beast, or return it to the mountains, and institute in
its place, a counter press of types and black-ball
that may be a match for Porcupine.
O Jehu! Said a man laughing, where will you
get a match for Porcupine? A man neither of
conscience
or shame, taught and educated as he is, with
typography that is adequate? Who will be willing to
be the ostensible vehicle of language becoming a
scavenger
?
Can any one be found who will have front
from insensibility of heart, or the forehead of brass,
to bear the imputation? If we could get some Teague
O'Regan now, that did not know what we were doing
with him: that would think it an honour to be
employed
;
that would not take amiss the proposition
of making him the conduit of reproach, and
dishonourable
inuendo; in short, from whom it could be
concealed on what account he was chosen; the
project
might be plausible.
The Captain, at this rising hastily; a thing
unusual
with him; for he was naturally grave and sedate;
but suddenly feeling the impulse of the congruity, he
started from his seat, and seconded the proposition
of another press; for said he, the very Teague
O'Regan
that you want is at hand; a waiter of mine.
A bog-trotter, taken, not on the Balagate, but, on the
Irish mountains: an aboriginal of the island; not
your Scotch-Irish, so called, a colony planted in
Ulster
,
by king James the first of England, when he
subdued the natives; but a real Paddy, with the
brogue on his tongue, and none on his feet; brought
up to sheep-stealing from his youth; for his
ancestors
inhabiting the hills, were a kind of free-booters,
time immemorial, coming down to the low grounds,
and plundering the more industrious inhabitants.
Captured by traps set upon the hills, or surrounded
in the bogs, attempting his escape, he had been tamed
and employed, many years, digging Turf, before he
came to my hands. I bought him from an Irish
vessel
,
just as a curiosity, not that I expected much
service
from him; but to see what could be made of a
rude man by care and patience. The rogue has a
low humour, and a sharp tongue; unbounded
impudence
.
And what may be a restraint upon the
licentiousness
of his press, should he set up one, he is a
most abominable coward; the idea of cudgeling will
keep him in bounds; should he over-match
Porcupine
,
and turn upon his employers. He has all the
low phrases, cant expressions, illiberal reflections,
that could be collected from the company he has kept
since he has had the care of my horse, and run after
my heels in town and country for several years past.
What is more, he has been in France, and has a
spice of the language, and a tang of Jacobinism in
his principles, and conversation, that will match the
contrary learning carried to an exhorbitant excess in
Peter Forcupine. I do not know that you can do
better
than contribute to a paper of his setting up. He
may call it the Mully-Grub, or give it some such
title as will bespeak the nature, of the matter it will
usually contain.
The college-man at this came forward. I am far,
said he, from a disposition to spoil sport; but when
the useful is mixed with the jest, I count every point
gained.
Yes, said the principal of the academy, Omne tulit
punctum, qui miscuit utile dulci.
I never had intended, continued the other, more
than to reach the sensations of the multitude, and
bring them to their senses. It is only by an appeal
to feeling that the mind sometimes can be awakened.
The public have now some idea of what I mean, that
the licentiousness of the press, is not more a nuisance
in the moral, than offensive smells are in the physical
world. I agree that the cat be removed, and as a
substitute, that we may taper off gradually, shall
subscribe to the Mully-Grub.
The speech was applauded, and the vote taken.
CHAP. III.
Duncan M`Dougal
, taking the Captain aside, as
he was walking home, suggested an alteration of the
title of O'Regan's paper, which was to call it the
Rams Horn; for said he, the rams horn is a
Scripture
name; it was at the sound of
rams horns
that
the walls of Jerico fell down; now if by a rams horn
paper, we can knock down, this Porcupine, it will
bear an analogy. The ram and the he-goat are spoken
of in the Prophesy of Daniel. In short, the ram is
a very common symbol. Hence amongst the
Romans
the warlike engine which they made use of at
sieges, was called a battering ram. All this could
be explained, and made a good introduction or
opening
to the paper; and this being done, it will be
necessary
that the analogy be kept up; for the editor
must butt and run his head at every body. The
hardest fend off in that case. It will behoove him
to be a good deal personal, to be a match for
Porcupine
.
The greater the blackguard, the better the
editor now a days. It was not so in Britain, even in
Wilkes's time. National peculiarities were a common
theme of his irony, but he did not descend to
personalities
;
but you Americans have improved upon
the matter, if it may be called improvement.
The Captain was a little hurt at this. But,
said he, is this stile of controversy of American
origin
,
or confined altogether to American editors; I
mean such authors of newspapers, as have had their
education in America. Your armies during the
revolutionary
war, have left among us both language
and men, and some have come since, from the other
side the water, that if not the first, have at least
excelled
most in this way of writing. But it may be of
more use to learn how to counteract it, than to
ascertain
its origin. It may be of domestic origin. It
may be imported; or both. The truth is, that where
a leading editor, becomes so, from his situation in a
great city, or by his eminent talents, distinguishes
himself in any way, the editors in smaller country
towns imitate, and one black sheep, gives the rot to
the whole herd.
But it will be necessary, said M`Dougal, that your
editor, O'Regan, proceed in this way of newspaper
blackguardism as a match for Porcupine, or a
burlesque
on him, for this is the end of his creation,
and our object in taking him up. It will behoove
him to stick at nothing. He must out Herod Herod
in all that is scurrilous. Nature would seem to have
fitted him for it, and art has done her part, from the
servile habits of his occupation. He must have
collected
much dialogue, and I may add dialect, from
the subordinate company of his station, in the
capacity
of waiter to your Captainship in the course of your
late rambles. It is an ill wind that blows no body
good, and this village may profit by it.
CHAP. IV.
The
day after the town meeting, the Captain
began
to reflect, that he could not avoid being
implicated
in the character of the paper about to be
established
.
O'Regan was known to be his servant; at
least to be under his influence, and he would be
considered
the real editor; Teague the ostensible, and
though the fact was known at home, that he had
nothing to do with it, yet abroad, it would bear a
different construction, and refutation would be
difficult
.
Having supported the character of a
gentleman
and being still willing to support that
character
,
how could he endure to have the volumes of
scurrility
that would appear, worse than the atmosphere
of that nuisance in whose place it was substituted,
imputed to his pen; or supposed to be admitted with
his approbation. Uneasy with this upon his mind,
he could see no way to get out of the labyrinth in
which he had involved himself, by inadvertently
proposing
Teague. He thought it however his duty, and
that he was bound in honour to disclose to the
bog-trotter
,
the office to which he was destined.
Maintaining
good faith, he was unwilling to make use of
his influence to dissuade from the undertaking; or
accomplishing the same thing, by sap, endeavour to
deter by representing the danger that existed, and
the consequences that might ensue. This he could
easily have done, by suggesting the guillotine, or even
a cudgeling, the more common mode of punishment,
in this republic. But good faith forbade. The
contrary
was expected of him, and he must fulfil the
expectation
Detailing therefore to the future editor,
the history of his selection, and sketching a little the
duties of his office, he had prepared him for the
town-meeting
this day; and at the hour accompanied him
to the town-house, and announced the new candidate
for their subscriptions.
But what was the amazement of every one, when
news was brought, that Porcupine, had decamped in
the night. Whether it was that the talents of Teague
had been magnified, and he did not chuse to engage
in competition with one so much his superior, lest he
should lose by comparison, the reputation he had
acquired; or what is more likely, the constables
were after him for debt, his press and types having
been seized the day before, and sold for rent, and
new demands, of a smaller nature coming against
him, fines and penalties also hanging over him for
libels; and damages recoverable in actions of
defamation
;
but so it was, that he had disappeared.
The Captain was relieved from embarrassment
to his great joy, which he endeavoured to conceal,
but to the mortification of Teague, who had aspired
to a paper war with his antagonist. The Captain
was glad, because he now saw a way open to set aside
the idea of a press, at least on the footing of a
blackguard
press;
and to any other Teague was not
competent
.
Towns-men, and fellow-citizens, said he, seizing
the first opportunity to speak, the reason has
ceased
upon which we had proposed to act.
Yes said a lawyer, cessante ratione, cessat et
ipsa lex.
The reason has ceased, said the Captain, of
setting
up the bog-trotter in the capacity of an editor as
a match for Porcupine, for he has disappeared; and
what need we buft at the bear when there is no bear
to buff at. Unless indeed we could set him up,
expecting
from him a chaste and pure paper containing
solid information, and strictures useful to the
republic
.
But that, from his education and manners, we
have no reason to expect. It is true, if he had sense
to collect the ideas, and give them expression he has
had opportunities to observe what if known and
digested
might essentially serve to preserve from
extremes
in a free government. He has seen the folly
of the people of France, if those occasionally thrown
into the representative assemblies, could be called the
people. He has seen the folly of these in reducing
all things to the first elements instead of
accomodating
to existing establishments; of deracinating from
the foundation church and state. and bandying the
term liberty until ignorance and usurpation,
terminated
in despotism. For though at the commencement
of a revolution, active and uninformed spirits, are
useful, or perhaps absolutely necessary, like the
subterranean
fire throwing up continents; yet as in this
case, the fostering dews, and the breath of the
atmosphere
,
are necessary to give soil and impregnate
with vegetation; so after the stirrings of men's minds,
with a political convulsion, deliberate reason, and
prudent
temperament are necessary, to preserve what is
gained, and turn it to advantage. But fellow-citizens,
this sans culotte, for so he was called in France; and
well he might; for he was without femorals when he
went away, and when he came back; this sans
culotte, is not a Mirabeau. He has kept no journal:
he has made no observations except of men's heads
chopped off by the guillotine. He has brought back
little with him, but ce que dit; que ce vous la; donnez
moi, and such like. I think we are well off with him
and let him go to his vocation.
It was agreed; and the sans culotte was
dismissed
.
OBSERVATIONS.
The
preceding chapters were written some years
ago, while an editor of the name of Cobbet,
published
a paper under the title of Porcupine. But the
breaking up of that paper in a manner similar to that
just stated, prevented the going on with the allegory,
or the handing to the public by the way of the press,
in some shape, the pamphlet begun. Some time
since, the appearance of a certain Callender, in a
paper
under the title of the Recorder, had induced me
to look at what I had intended for Porcupine, and to
think of continuing it to some point and winding up
of the story; but the man drowning himself, or being
drowned by accident, bathing in the river Potomack,
stopped me in my intention, as it would be like
throwing
water on a dead, or as the proverb is, a drowned
rat, to say any thing that had a relation to him.
But having a little leisure on my hands, and in
warm weather, liking light work, I amused myself
with saying some things that were on my mind on
other subjects, and I thought I would make this which
I had already written, the introduction. For the fact
is, that I mean this tale of a Captain travelling, but
as a vehicle to my way of thinking on some
subjects
;
just as the ancients introduced speakers in
a dialogue, occasionally at banquets; or as the
philosophers
in their walks and conversations,
moralized
in parables, and feigned cases, a way of
reasoning
,
and address less offending the self-love of
men than what has the appearance of immediate and
direct instruction. Nor, will the publication of the
foregoing hints
on the illiberality of the press
, be
thought, even now altogether useless; for though,
since the death, or departure, of the two monsters
just named, there has been an ebb of this flood of
scurrility, yet, dropping the figure, the American
press, has not been wholly free from the stains of the
like paragraphs. The application therefore may not
be wholly without an object, and, in the painting
may be seen some existing resemblances. For
though, as the almanac-makers, say it is
calculated
for a particular meridian, yet it may without
sensible
variation, serve other latitudes. No man can
have a higher opinion of the dignity of station
occupied
by the editor of a paper under a free
government
than I have. In short I think it one of the
most honourable, as well as the most useful in
society
.
I am unwilling therefore that it be degraded,
and I am happy to observe that the example of the
two monsters mentioned, has had the effect to
disgust
the public, and lead to a reform of what had
proceeded
from an imitation of their blackguard
personalities
.
I take the pulpit, the courts of judicature, and the
press, to be the three great means of sustaining and
enlightening a republic. The Scripture is replete
with the finest sayings of morality. With a scholar
of the Latin and the Greek school, it is delightful
to quote in conversation, or writing, the classical
sentences of antiquity, aptly applying them to the
occasion; enriching the discourse with apposite
thoughts; pleasing the hearer, or the reader, and
doing credit to the persons drawing out from his
treasury, such things new and old. But these
writings
of an oriental cast, the Scriptures, contain pithy
observations upon life and manners, than which there
can be nothing more delightful to remember and
quote, and more profitable to carry into practice.
Reading the Scriptures by young people; hearing
them explained and introduced by quotation, sermon
and lectures from the pulpit, raises the affections to
virtue, and helps the judgment in the conduct of life.
The courts of judicature, are a school of justice,
and honour. A great ground of the law, are the
principles of universal justice. The discussion of
council; the verdicts of juries, the decision of the
courts, have respect to the great principles of moral
honesty. But the sphere is confined, compared with
that of the press, which has an extensive range; and,
for this reason ought to preserve the greater delicacy
in language and sentiment. Even the war of the
sword has its laws.It is not allowable to poison
springs, or the means of life. In a paper war
nothing
is justifiable that does not tend to establish a
position, or determine a controversy; that which
outrages humanity, is the cruelty of a savage who
puts to death with torture, or disfigures, to gratify
revenge.
To know what may be said in a paper, or in
what manner it may be said, the editor whom the
public alone knows, need only consider what would
become a gentleman to say, in promiscuous society.
Whether conversing in the manner he writes, or in
which, what is inserted, is written, he would be heard
with respect, and treated with civility. Good
breeding
D
is as necessary in print as in conversation. The
want of it equally entitles to the appellation of an
ill-bred-man
.
The press can have no more licence than
the tongue. In fact, at the tribunal of common sense,
it has less, because an expression might escape a
man, which might receive pardon, or excuse, as the
offspring of inadvertence; but writing is deliberate,
and you may turn back and strike out the allusion,
or correct the term.
National character is interested in the delicacy
of the press. It is a disgrace to a people to have
amongst them volumes of scurrility circulated
through their post-offices, with a peculiar privilege
of centage more than their common correspondence;
to have bilingsgate, as they call it, in a kingdom,
which we surpass in privileges, placed upon the
benches in our public houses, or sent home to our
private dwellings.
Is this the occupation to which it ought to be an
honour to belong; to which a father would wish to
put a son, having educated him with the best
advantages
,
and giving him, as he had thought, a duty as
sacred as the priesthood, and with a more exclusive
sphere of action than the barrister; having it in high
commission by the constitution of his country, to
canvass the conduct of men in public offices, and
inform the public, where the matter is proper for
public information.
It does not follow, that because a man takes a
paper
,
that he approves of all that is in it. It is
certainly
censurable to continue our subscription to a
paper, the prevailing tenor of which is defamatory of
individuals; but were we to reject a paper because
it is occasionally so, there are few papers that we
should take at all. The American press, has been
abominably gross, and defamatory, and there are few
publications of this nature, that have been at all times
unexceptionable. The fool scattereth fire-brands,
and saith, am I not in jest? A man will be
astonished
sometimes to hear of himself, or of others,
what has not the slightest foundation, but in the
invention
and imagery of the paragraphist. There may
be some prototype, filmy origin to the unsubstantial
fabric; perhaps not even a vapour, but in the breath
of the defamer. Is the assassin odious, and not the
author of anonymous abuse? Yet such is the error
of opinion with some, that they think it not
dishonourable
to attack anonymously. It is cowardice in
a free country, where the law is equal; where no
Csar exists to make it necessary to conceal the
author
of the pasquinade. A brave man will scorn
subterfuge, and shade. An honest man will avow
himself and his opinions. Yet how many write in
public prints that were they at the time to count
upon
being known, they would retract, or alter much,
both in stile and sentiment, of what they subscribe
with signatures of fiction.
I feel a concern for the honour of the American
press, that as we are before most, or all other
governments
in the freedom of it, we may not be behind
in the delicacy with which it is used.
CHAP. V.
Notwithstanding
the Captain thought he had
got quit of Teague, in the matter of the press, he had
still some trouble. For the bog-trotter, the
following
day, appeared dissatisfied. He thought his hopes
of an occupation had been raised, only with a view
to disappoint him. He had an hankering after the
press still, and talked of taking up subscriptions. To
put him off, the Captain suggested the publishing his
travels. Teague, said he, if many a man had what
you have in your power, he would make a fortune
by it. You have been in the Conciergerie. That,
of itself, might make a chapter that would fill a
volume
.
If you take up subscriptions, why not for
such a work as that? It will sell for a ready penny
these times; I would advise you to go about it.
Och, on my shoul, said Teague, but it would
make a book as big as the Praists' bible, if I was to
tell all dat I saw on toder side de great water. In
dat great country, old France; where de paple talk
all at once wid de brogue on deir tongue, and say
nothing. The devil burn me, but deir foutres, and
parbleus, would make a book, as big as a church staple.
Well done Teague, said the Captain; you must
then set about it. The first thing it will behoove you
to consider, is the manner in which it will be
written
;
whether your narration shall be in the first
person
,
as, I did this, and I said that; or whether in
the third person, as it were one speaking of you, as,
Teague having done so, and made an observation to
this effect. And whether it shall be in the way of
continued narrative, with chapters, or in the shape
of a journal, or be cast in the way of letter. For all
these modes of writing are used as best suits the
traveller
;
or may be thought most pleasing to the
reader
One advantage you will have, that you need not
stick pertinaciously to the truth; for travellers have
a licence to deviate; and they are not considered as
on oath, or upon honour in giving their accounts;
embellishment is allowable. Some illumination of
their story: though, confining yourself to the truth
strictly, I make no doubt, your story will be
sufficiently
extravagant, and of course, border on the
marvellous
.
The fact was, that the bog-trotter had incidents
sufficient to enliven his history. He had been in the
suit of Anacharsis Cloots, and represented an
Esquimaux
Indian; he had been taken up in a balloon
some distance from the earth, and let down by a
parachute
,
instead of a sheep. It is true, this was not
with his own consent, but by force. The Parisians
thinking it of little account whether the experiment
was made with him or a less valuable animal. It is
true, to make amends for this, a royalist lady fell in
love with him, thinking he had a resemblance to the
young Duke of Orleans. He had made a fortunate
escape in the Conciergerie. A prisoner in the next
cell, No. 1, finding the letter G, put upon his door,
which stands for guillotine; exchanged for a few
D 2
louis's with O'Regan, No. 2.But an order came to
reprieve No. 1, and to take No. 2, meaning the
bog-trotter
.
The consequence was, that the Frenchman
was put into the cart, and our sans culotte escaped.
It would make a book, as has been said, to
exhaust
these particulars, and many more that occured.
The Captain having recommended the work, was
concerned to have it accomplished with some credit
to those concerned, and therefore thought it
advisable
to give the author some hints before he entered
on the task.
Teague, said he, the first thing to be thought of,
is a place to write. The extremes are two, the
cellar
and the garret. The cellar was chosen by an
orator of Greece, to write his orations, or at least to
prepare for the writing them; for in this, he is said
to have copied over eight times the history of
Thucidydes
.
Whether it is the darkness, or the solitude
of the cavern, or both, that is congenial to the talent
of writing, may be a question. I should think,
however
,
that the aerial mansion of a garret is most
favourable
to the lighter species, of writing such as
madrigals; or paragraphs in magazines, or novels.
But as yours is a serious work, it may be above the
subterranean, and below the firmament. Perhaps a
middle story may suffice. It will depend, however,
on your head. If you find yourself light, go down;
if heavy, mount; and thus adjust your apartment to
your feelings. The wasps chuse the garret; but the
spider is found sometimes in the cellar; and his
weaving is an emblem of the composition of an
author
;
while the wasp, resembles the critic.
As to stile, Teague, after all that I have heard
said upon the subject, I know no more about it, than
this; just write as you would speak, and give your
account with simplicity, without affectation;
understanding
your subject well, and using no more words,
than is necessary to express your meaning.
As to paper, whether common or woven; or
as to type, whether single or double pica; these
are terms I do not understand. I see them in the
advertisements, and that is all I know about them.
It will behoove you to enquire. Whether
duodecimo
,
octavo, or folio, may depend upon the bulk of
what is to be printed.
Without more ado, being furnished with
subscription
papers, he set out to solicit the patronage
of subscribers for his work.
CHAP. VI.
The
Captain had now been more than a month
at home, though, I have not filled up the time by
marking what he did every day, or how he was
occupied
.
But this he had done; made enquiry into the
history of the village; what changes in the domestic
affairs of his neighbours; what good or bad fortune
had happened to individuals, at the same time
walking
through the town, he observed the improvements
or dilapidations in the buildings or streets. It was
obvious that little attention had been paid, for some
time to public works; the pavements were neglected,
and the ways and water-courses suffered to fill up.
An aqueduct begun, to bring a spring from the hill,
was left unfinished.
What can be the reason of all this, said the
Captain
?
It was answered, that the chief and assistant
burgesses
some time ago had been extravagant; that
the works, which, by the charter of incorporation
they had a power to project, were extensive, and the
consequent taxes which they had a right to impose,
and which became necessary, were thought
oppressive
.
The people had turned out these officers at
the annual election, and chosen new. That these
wishing to preserve popularity, had let all matters
rest, and had neither made improvements, nor raised
taxes.
And does this please the people, said the
Captain
.
No, said the citizen, who had taken upon him to
reply; they have turned out one set for doing too
much; and they will turn out the other next for
doing
nothing.
But why not hit a medium, said the Captain.
A difficulty occurs, continued the speaker. In
the works projected, the people insist that no man
shall be consulted in his own occupation. The
mason
shall make out the bills of scantling; and the
carpenter determine the arches of a stone bridge.
That is just as bad, said the Captain, as in a city
that I passed through in my travels. The physicians
claimed a right to judge of laws, and the lawyers of
physic. Reversing the maxim, that every man is to
be trusted in his own profession.
They are prejudiced, said the citizen, or thought
to be so. They have an interest in the amendments
projected; or weded to a system, they are not free
to change it to advantage. It is better to appeal to
persons that know nothing about the matter, and trust
them.
This is republicanism run mad, said the Captain.
The sovereign people would do well to imitate other
sovereigns, at least in this; that they trust even
foreigners
in the arts, and not by an unreasonable
jealousy
loose the advantage of judgment, which it is not
in the nature of things, that they themselves can
possess.
The sovereign people never had a good head
upon
their shoulders, said the citizen.
You are an aristocrat, said the Captain. I shall
not go so far as that. The sovereign people act
wisely
,
they act madly, just like other people.
They might act wisely, said the citizen, were it
not for political divisions.
Political divisions will always exist, said the
Captain
.
It is inseparable from the nature of a
community
And it is not in the nature of things that the
power can be long on one side.
The duration
depends upon the judgment of using it
. The people
will revolt from themselves when they find they have
done wrong, and that side which was now the weakest
will become the strongest.
These are matters I do not much understand, said
the citizen. You have the advantage having seen
more.
I may have seen a little, said the Captain, but
I have thought more; and deduce my remarks from
the nature of man.
Accounts were received, and Teague himself
occasionally
announced that he had succeeded in taking
up subscriptions for his commentaries. But it had
never occured to any one that the bog-trotter could
neither read nor write. But the difficulty now
presenting
itself, a school-master offered his services to
be his amanuensis.
But amongst the advertisements on the tavern
and shop doors, the Captain observing one day a
notice
of the want of a suitable person in the academy
to instruct in the French language, he was led to
reflect
,
that after dictating his publication, Teague
would be out of employment, and that a vacancy of
this kind might tally with his faculties having been
in France, the very country where the language was
vernacularly spoken; that his attainments must be
much superior to those who had acquired the tongue
only from dead books, the ear not accustomed to the
sounds of familiar conversation.
Loosing no time he waited on the Principal of the
Academy, and gave him a minute account of the
pedesque, how he had followed him, been in France,
&c. &c. &c.
The Principal was astonished; but concealed his
surprize. He could easily comprehend the
incompetency
of this man to teach the language in a school
of learning, where it is expected to be taught
grammatically
;
and the absurdity of taking his lingo, for
French, if he had the brogue in that pronunciation
as he had in English. But it might not be so easy a
matter to convince the Captain of this who appeared
to have an undue opinion of his acquirements.
Nevertheless he endeavoured to make himself
intelligible
on this subject, by observing that there was a
wide difference between a public professor in a
college
,
and a private tutor who attends pupils
occasionally
that in a seminary of learning the rudiments
of a language were usually taught by rules; and it
was an object to understand the parts of speech into
which the tongue was divided; the use of the articles
if there were any; the inflexions of the cases, the
variations of the genders, the conjugations of the
verbs; the concords of syntax; and after all this the
idiom, or peculiar phrase, and structure of the
sentence
:
that from what the Captain had informed him,
and what he himself had gleaned from others, of the
characteristics of this subordinate, the academy
was not his province, but the village. He might
employ
his talents to advantage, instructing young
gentlemen
and ladies in the knowledge of the French
tongue at their own houses; with a bare grammar,
and without a dictionary; or without a grammar;
and with the voice and diction only. For in fact it
was of little consequence how they were taught; for
they would learn nothing: and barbers, and tumblers
that had come in and undertaken to instruct; had
just done as well as wiser masters; for they had
amused their pupils; and amusement was all that
pupils would be willing to receive. The young
gentlemen
of the village were above learning as soon as
they had got on a pair of pantaloons, and half-boots.
They were out of their education, and
men before
their time
. We had an election the other day; for
a
Chief Burgess
. It was a matter of astonishment
to those of the old school, to see a youth come
forward
,
born after his competitor had been ranked with
the sages of the village, and claim the suffrages of
the citizens. It had an unfavourable effect upon the
very dumb creation. It was not enough that the lads
under age, began to raise their voices, and vociferate;
but it seemed that the young of animals had gained
upon their growth, and were old before they had
attained maturity. The young dogs barked more.
Whether it was from an impression of the
atmosphere
;
or an imitation of the sounds of men.
But this is digressing; your Paddy may suffice to
teach coxcombs that wish nothing old; that will be
satisfied with the name of learning French: enough
if they can get a word or two that sounds like French,
to throw out to a lady in a dance; as parlez vous
madame
;
or s'l vous plais.
It may be a digression, said the Captain; but it is
a profitable lesson. Do you conceive that the
American
youth are two hastily manufactured, and come
forward too soon into life.
Unquestionably, said the Principal. Education
here is unnaturally hastened. Our minority is too
short to make a great man. We over-step the
modesty of nature, and suffer our young men to
come forward into councils that require the heads of
age. Hence our juvenile speeches in debates.
Hence the wild fire in our councils some time ago,
which burned down the administration to which it
was attached. But this is running into politics with
which I do not meddle. I come back to speak of your
man, the bog-trotter, I think he may teach French in
the village, but I cannot consent to his being
employed
in the university.
The Captain was pleased with the Principal for
his frankness, and gave up the matter.
E
CHAP. VII.
To give Teague time to write his history, the
Captain turned away his mind for a while to other
objects. There was an old lawyer in the village that
had left off practice, and accompanied by a blind
fidler, gave lectures occasionally, at what he called
his inns of court, on the practice of the law, of which
he pretended to have had great experience; and in
fact he had been a long time at the bar; and from age
was now unfit for the circuit, especially being blind
and unless in a carriage, which the roads did not well
admit, he could not conveniently go abroad; and the
small practice of the village, scarcely sufficed for the
occupation of his time, or the means of his support.
The want of sight rendered him incapable of
conveyancing
,
and all he could do was to give council, or
argue a cause by which he made a penny; but to
fill up his time, and put his learning to account, he had
set on foot lectures for young students, and amused
himself at intervals with a tune on the violin which
the fidler played, and for which the by standers threw
in a five penny bit of silver, such of them as did not
attend to the law lecture, or could derive any benefit
from it. Thus, these two, clubbing their talents, and
joining in amusement, and in business as joined in
the loss of vision, made a living; the scraper
receiving
his six cents and one half for his air or spring on
the instrument, and the lawyer the same money for
his breath on the abstract subject of the law study,
or practice.
It may be asked how it came to pass, that this
man could lay down the principles of a successful
practice in a profession, and at the same time not to
have become enriched by it himself, so as to be above
the necessity in his old age, of making money, by the
best means in his power to procure his support, the
profession being lucrative itself, especially where any
one excells in the knowledge of it, and is ordinarily
industrious in the pursuit. But the answer is easy;
if we take the Scripture, that riches are not to men
of understanding, or if we take the fact, that the
making money and keeping it are two distinct things:
for so it was that this lawyer now blind, had let a
great deal of business go through his hands, without
making much by it; from a want of skill to make
money stick, which others had with less parts, and
ability. He thought always more of gaining the suit
and the praise of managing it well, than of the fee
for which some stipulate. Hence it was that he
had credit as a pleader, but not as the maker of a
great estate.
It is doubtless a general rule that the way to be
rich is to excell in your profession, and whoever
excells may in general be rich, and it is a folly not to
make this use of it. But we see that, in all the lovers
of the arts, painting, music, statuary, eloquence, there
is a neglect of riches, the mind carried off from the
love of money, and placed upon the art itself. The
main chance is over-looked; and it is only late
in life that the folly is discovered by the person
himself
,
though others had been remarking it all his life
long. But though not profitable to the professor, to
cultivate an art for its own sake, yet it is useful and
pleasing to the world; and Quintilian who has left us
a book on the eloquence of the bar, is more valued in
his memory, because he has given more pleasure to
those who have come after him, than others who had
made perhaps more by their practice, but whose
memory
has gone with themselves, at the same time that
their estates went to others.
But the Captain having spent many an hour with
the lawyer before he was blind, had not failed to
enquire
for him on his return to the village, and now
had leisure to pay him a visit. Coming in just as he
was beginning a lecture with the blind fidler by his
side, he did not interrupt him but let him go on, as
we shall also, and give the lecture as he delivered it,
and as a short hand writer took it down. It was as
follows:
THE LECTURE.
It
is necessary to comprehend perfectly the facts
of the case, and this to enable;
1. To frame the action; trespass, or trespass on
the case; &c.
2. To frame your declaration; that is, to put a
precise statement of the cause of action upon the
record
.
3. To examine the witnesses, preparatory to the
trial.
I say nothing of the science necessary to draw a
declaration; though there is great delicacy and
beauty
,
in making a legal statement of your cause of
action
with brevity, perspicuity, and tecnical
correctness
.
Nor do I mean to touch on the vigilance on
your part, or liberality to your adversaries, in
conducting
the cause to issue and trial, taking rules and
giving notice. This is not the stage where all
advantages
are fair. These are preliminaries to the
contest, and as in the wager of battle the combatant
makes oath, that he uses no enchantment; so a
liberal
lawyer will disdain to avail himself of an
over-sight
or take a catch which has no effect upon the
merits of a cause. If he observes a defect which it
becomes necessary to amend, in civil cases, he will
point it out and give leave to do it. This I grant
he is not bound to do; but it is for the credit of the
profession that such liberality should be cultivated,
and justice will loose nothing by it. Strict rules of
pleading, strictly pursued, are not inconsistent with
this liberality! Professional men, can understand
the boundaries and distinctions. It is not within my
present compass to go into them.
Preparatory to the trial; a great point is, the
examination
of the witnesses to be adduced by your
client; such of them as are willing to say what they
know, prior to their being called in court. It is of
moment for you to know what you can prove by any
one of them, that you may bring them to the point
immediately; and save the time of the court from
impertinent relation. It is necessary for the sake of
your client to sift them well, and know the
testimony
they are about to give. The council above
who has thus sifted them, should undertake to
examine
.
When the conduct of the cause, rests with
me, and the responsibility, I would suffer no
assistant
to ask a question of my witnesses. Let him take
his turn, and fill up his part in cross examining the
witnesses of the adversary. When the testimony is
closed in a jury trial, the cause is usually lost or
won: and a single question injudiciously put, may
have been the cause of lossing it. Yet there is
nothing more difficult for a leading council than to
restrain the impetuosity of his associates, and their
avidity to ask questions.
It is a matter of great judgment when a witness
has answered well, to let the answer rest. It is
favourable
to truth to let it rest; for by puting it again,
and again, you confuse the mind, and you may get
the very reverse of what he had before said; or at
least you may get it so disturbed, as to be
unintelligible
,
and do you no good.
If it occurs to an assistant council who has not
previously examined; that a question may be put
with advantage, he can suggest it to the leading,
or examining council, and leave him to judge. The
wish of seeming to be doing something for his money
is the cause of that propensity to interrogate that
prompts improperly to take up the examination.
The taking down the testimony is so managed
as to consume time unnecessarily in our courts. All
concerned in a cause, must take down and wait for
all. The testimony must be taken down as if it was
to be read again to the court, or sent to the jury in
the style of a written deposition. Unnecessary
matter
is taken down; for there are seldom more than
a few sentences in the testimony of a witness that
are material to the cause. But it is to seem very
busy, and doing something for the client, where in
fact nothing is done, that leads to an ostentation
of taking down, even where there is nothing to take.
I have actually known this to take place at the bar.
Well; what do you know of this matter?
Why, in fact, I know little about it.
Stop, stop a little, let me take that down.
Well; you say you know little about the
matter
.
Nothing at allonly
Stop, stop, let me take down what you have
said
A thing like this exhausts the patience; yet it is
difficult for a court to correct it. It must depend
upon the good sense of the council themselves, to
select, and confine their notes to what is of substance
in the evidence.
The greatest effort in the management of a cause,
is the taking exception to evidence. For this
purpose
,
it is necessary that from the commencement of
the trial, the leading council lies by; thinks much;
says little; bends his whole mind, to preserve
himself
unruffled: sets forward the junior, and assistant
council to spar where it may be necessary; to make
prolusions, and gain time,
As for instance; a piece of evidence is offered.
It strikes the leading council, that exception lies
against it. But he is not clear; nor is he prepared
to support the exception. An assistant council takes
the exception. It is run down and completely
answered
.
Not a word more: But the leading council
has had time to consider.
If he had not thought proper to give it up; He
would have risen in full force.
And if he had been answered with some shew of
reason, the assistant would have rejoined, and done
justice to the argument. For let it not be thought
that though I mark the parts of the assistant council,
I do not well know that the greater lawyer, may have
the subordinate part assigned him; or may fall into
that place, in the management of a cause, on the
trial. The greater general may happen to have the
command of a detachment only; or be employed to
bring on, or relieve, in the course of an engagement.
For law is an image of war; and as in war, the
greatest praise, is to discharge your duty wherever it
may be assigned, so on a trial. A column
standing
still; and never brought forward, or discharging
a shot, but simply keeping ground, may have done
the real execution, and gained the battle. A thought
suggested is sometimes more than an argument.
But, nevertheless, elocution has its place, and
noble praise. It is delightful to hear one speak well
where he ought to speak. The words of the wise
are like nails; fastened in sure places. Great
indulgence
must be made, for young pleaders; but I
have it not in view to treat, not of what is to be
indulged
;
but of what is to be approved. Brevity is the
soul of eloquence, and amplification, the usual fault.
Few err in saying too little. Tediousness is the more
common extreme: padding, and beating on the point.
After a passion
is excited there is danger of
tearing
it to rags.
The opening of the case, before the evidence is
introduced, is a matter of some delicacy; and a
principle
is brevity; and stating the proper proof, rather
below what it will turn out. When disappointed in
the expectation raised, the mind is disatisfied, and
with difficulty can do justice to what is proved.
It is in the application of the evidence that eloquence
finds her province at the bar. And yet here it is that
less harm can be done by weak or unskilful
advocates
,
than in any part of the contest. The court
and jury are attached to the evidence. The mind
is steadfast upon this, and if a flourisher runs off; he
may talk; it is only a loss of time. It is here that
less experienced council may be suffered to amuse
themselves; and can do little harm, more especially
if there is some one to follow to review the facts,
apply the law, and clench the argument. The harm
that can be done, is to weary the mind, and relax the
spring of attention. This is mischievous; but
cannot
well be prevented. The council must be heard.
But there is much less danger to a cause, in this,
than from an injudicious touch in the conduct of it,
through the evidence.
With regard to reading authorities in the opening,
or reply; or in the conduct of the trial generally, I
have but a single observation. It is better to adduce
no authority, at all, than one which has a doubtful
application, because it brings in question the
disscernment
of the council; and gives an opportunity, to the
adversary, to flourish and run down. General reason,
is a safer ground, than doubtful decissions.
The lecture now ended, the Captain paid his
score, for the privilege of hearing, and to the fidler,
for the tune that followed, and so took his lease.
CHAP. VIII.
A great uproar had, in the mean time, taken
place in the village. The doctrine of abating
nuisances
,
had been much in conversation, since the
town-meeting
in the matter of the pole-cat. It came so
far, that an incendiary, proposed, to abate or burn
down the college. Because, said he; all learning is
a nuisance.
A town-meeting had been called on the occasion;
and whether from a wish to see a bon-fire; or from
the hatred of the ignorant, to all that places the
informed
above them; the proposition however
unreasonable
and illegal had its advocates. It had been
actually
carried, and a fellow was now on his way with a
brand lighted to set fire to the building.
The alarm was given; and the more considerate
and amongst these, the Captain, rushed out to
endeavour
to prevent conflagration.
Force was in vain; and reason avails little with a
mob. The only way to oppose their resolution is
indirectly
by turning the current of their thoughts aside
and to the attaining the same thing in another way.
The principal and professors had harrangued in vain.
It was threatened that if they did not stand out of the
way, they would burn them, with the college.
The Captain had come up; and ventured to speak.
gentlemen, said he, it is not for the college that I am
about to speak; it is for yourselves; your object is
to put down learning; and do you not know that it is
put down already. Why will you do a useless thing?
It is calling in question your understanding, to do a
needless mischief.
At this they began to stare, while the Captain
went on.
Is not learning put down already? the methodists
are the best preachers. Take a horse jockey and in
two weeks from the jump, he is in a pulpit. No need
of Latin, Greek, Hebrew; a pollyglot bible; systems
of divinity; a commentary, a treatise, an essay, or a
dissertation. All is plain sailing now.
All this tends to put learning down, so that you
have all the advantage of this, without the trouble.
Why burn the college?
The building will serve useful purposes, when the
professors are driven out of it. All is plain sailing
now.
Politicians say; we have it from their own mouths
on some occasions, that though they have no
learning
,
they feel no want of it. Is it to be supposed that
a workman does not know whether he wants tools?
All this ends when learning and law are put down.
Trial by battle must regulate society. We shall
then want barracks and hospitals. This building will
accomodate invalids.
I do not know, said a sedate man among the
croud, whether after all, a little learning may not be
in some cases, useful.
It is a great help to weak people
.
I have seen a book, entitled,
Hukes
, and
e'en
to
had
up crippled christian's brecks
. That is hooks and eyes
to hold up breeches. Alluding, by the bye, to hooks
and eyes which were in use before buttons. What are
called gallowses, have succeeded to the assistance of
buttons, but have not altogether superseded them.
Not that I mean to insinuate that the disuse of hooks
and eyes, lead to the gallows in the proper sense of
the word, any more than that learning does. Though
many a man that wears buttons has been hung.
Perhaps
more without buttons than with them. But I
mean to say that a young man, before he comes to
the years of discretion may as well be employed in
learning to make marks upon paper, as playing at
nine mens morrice, and it does him no more harm to
try to read Greek, than to trace partridge tracks. The
mind must be employed in something to keep it out of
harm's way, and a recluse in a seminary is useful, if
for nothing else at least to keep young people within
doors, which the academician could not easily do,
unless, the device of books was used to beguile the
hours of study. And though a great part of their
learning, is but the knowledge of
hooks
and
crooks
,
yet the exercise of the
mind renders them more expert
in
thinking
, and though Latin is of no more use to
raise the devil than English, now a days; yet it is a
gentle exercise to learn it, and makes the boys grow
faster. It keops them from their mothers who are
apt to spoil their offspring by too much indulgence.
The idea of geting a task accustoms the mind to
obedience. Now there are some branches of science
that are really useful, such as speaking and writing
intelligibly, and casting up accounts. Nor is the
time altogether thrown away in learning
mathematics
,
F
especially the theory of the mechanical powers.
Some are of opinion that this study has been of great
use in navigation, and water works. The antients
found their account in it, in the construction of the
Catapult
.
But, at least, what harm, in letting pedants chop
logic, and boys laugh, in the seminaries? A herring
pickle, or a Merry Andrew, is allowed to amuse
people
,
and we do not pull down their stalls. A ventriloquist
is suffered to take his dollar from us, and we make no
remonstrance. Lectures, on moral philosophy are at
least as innocent as this. I do not know any better
recreation for a lad of mettle than to listen to a
dissertation
on cloquence, or a discourse on chronology,
and history. It sharpens his wit to talk over affairs
with his equals. But there is one reason that serves
for a hundred. It is not every one that is born a
genius
,
and can do without the help of education. I am
the refore for continuing these crudities a little longer.
When we can offord it better, we can pull down the
college. This speech had a good effect, and the mob
retired.
But before they were aware, the flame had broken
out, in another direction. The mob retiring, had
entered
into altercation amongst themselves, and began to
blame one another. Some, for not going on to burn the
college, and others, for having thought of it all. In
opposition
to the last, the first grew outrageous, and
began
to exclaim, and to curse and to swear, and said,
damn them, but if they had not burned a college, they
would burn or pull down, a church. They had
actually prepared faggots, and were on their way a
second time, to execute a new mischief.
The alarm was given, the chief Burgess, and
assistants, and respectable inhabitants assembled!
Great reliance was had upon the Captain, from his
success in the former instance; and when the two
forces, that of the mob, and that of the community
stood face to face, and were in opposition, ready to fall
on, the one to commit waste, and the other to defend,
he was called upon to come forward and harangue.
He obeyed instantly, but was well aware that a
stratagem in war cannot succeed a second time, and
therefore instead of attempting to decoy and turn aside
their passions, thought proper to attack them directly
by the opposite, fear. Madmen, said he, what do you
mean? Is it to rob, plunder and murder that you
have assembled? Come on; but in coming you must
meet with this weapon, brandishing his hanger; I am
alone; but a legion is behind me and will be with me
speedily.
But as I am at all times averse from the use of
force until it becomes necessary. I am willing in
the mean time to hear reason. Why is it that you
would pull down a church, and abolish the christian
worship in the village?
It is not our intention to abolish christianity, said
a grave man amongst them, but to put down the
preacher at this place; who is not an American
republican
,
but quotes the English commentaters in
his sermons, Henry's annotations on the Bible;
Burket
on the New-Testament; Pool's Synopsis, Tillotson
and Baxter, and many others We wish to abolish
these, and have nothing but our own commentaries.
Are we to be drawing our proofs from under a
monarchy
,
and refering to tracts and essays published
in Great Brittain? Have we no sense of our own to
explain texts of Scripture, and apply doctrines? It is
time to emancipate ourselves from these shackles,
and every man be his own expounder, or at least
confine our clergy to the Bible and the Psalm book,
or such of our divines, as have written amongst
ourselves
,
and are of our own manufacture in a
republican
government.
Religion, said the Captain, is of no government.
Wines are the better for being brought over seas,
and our best brandies are from monarchies. Where
was the cloth of that coat made? Will you reject a
good piece of stuff because it came through the hands
of an aristocratic weaver? These are false ideas of
what is right, and useful to mankind. The common
law is not the worse for having been the common
law of England, and our property and birth right
which our ancestors brought with them; nor is our
Bible the worse for having been translated under
James the first of England, which translation we still
use, and from which we repeat all sentences of
Scripture
.
Nor are systems of theology, or harmonies of
the evangelists the worse for having been written in
another country. Why do we use the English
language
?
Is it not because we cannot easily substitute
another; or have no better to substitute. The
Shanese
,
or Delaware, or Piankisha, may be softer,
but not so copious or of equal energy and strength.
But even if in all respects superior, can we by an act
of volition, transfer it into common-mon use and
make it all at once, our vernacular tongue?
The grave man made no answer; but the more
violent were still disposed to pall down the church.
At the alarm created by the uproar, the
pedagogue
,
and the pedeseque, ran out, and left the
manuscript
in hands on the table. A wag stepping in,
wrote an addition to a chapter. Coming back, the
school-master resumed his labour, without observing
it. The chapter in hands was that which gave an
account of his ascent in a balloon; and the addition
was as follows:
Passing a cloud, I put out my hand,
and took a piece of it, and squeczed it like a spunge,
and the water ran out. The sun went North about;
but never set. At the distance of about fifty leagues
above the earth, we saw a white bird sitting on the
corner of a cloud. We took it to be one of
Mahomets
Pigeons. If we had had a gun we could have
shot it. Passing by the moon we saw a fellow
selling
lands at auction. He wished us to give a bid;
but we told him, we had not come to buy lands in the
moon. We came across a comet, but it was asleep.
It looked like a tarapine; but had a tail like a Fox.
The balloon struck a wasp's nest, and we were in
danger of the stings.
We came near a hail bank; and filled a hat to
bring down with us. The hail stones were about as
large as a pigeon's egg.
A thousand miles above the earth we passed
through a field of turky buzzards. This would seem
to be their region; and accounts for the
circumstance
,
that no one has ever found a nest of one of
F 2
these. Their rookeries are out of sight, in the
atmosphere
.
As we approached one of the heavenly bodies.
It appeared like an island. We struck upon a planet,
but Blanchard got out and pushed off the balloon.
We supposed it to be Mercury, as we heard orators
haranguing, and a multitude of tongues.
There were marriages going on in Venus, and in
Mars, we heard the drums beat.
In Jupiter we heard swearing, Proh! Jupiter;
O! Jupiter! by Jupiter.
We meant to have a pull at one of Saturn's rings,
but were blown off the coast, and found ourselves in
the latitude of Herchel. Provisions failing, we thought
proper to shape our course to the carth again.
The first thing we saw was the forest of Ardennes,
which appeared like a shamrock; the Pyrenean
mountains seemed a bed of parsley, and the Atlantic
ocean, was about as large as Loch Swilly.
Within about a furlong of the earth, Blanchard
gave me the parachute, and I came down. It was in
a field of corn among reapers. They took me for a
sheep, and thought to have mation; but finding
their mistake, they invited me to breakfast.
Teague with his amanuensis returning, resumed
his memoir, not observing the interpolation which, in
the mean time had been made. Some have thought
it was the best chapter in it. At least it is the most
extravagant.
CHAP. IX.
Having
now a little time upon his hands, the
Captain thought of repeating his visit to the blind
lawyer, and fidler; and happening at an interval of
the blind man's lectures he drew him into
conversation
,
on the subject of the law. What is this common
law, said he, which you speak of, and why cannot it
be abolished? The common law of England! why
not a common law of our own; now that we are an
independent government?
It is our own common law, said the lawyer.
We derive it from a common source with the
inhabitants
of Britain. Shall the people on that side the
water alone possess this jurisprudence, which our
common ancestors possessed, just because we have
left the island? It was because our birth-right to this
law was questioned that we resisted in war, and
declared
our independence. The right to
representation
is a principle of the common law, and this right
was denied to the colonies. The right of trial by
jury is a principle of the common law, and this in
some cases, was abridged, in others, taken away
altogether
.
On what ground were these defended;
on the ground that they were our inheritance by the
common law.
But why called common law? It was so called as
distinguished from the laws of particular places. It
was a system common to the whole people. The
term came into use after the heptarchy.
A ground of this law is reason; or the principles
of universal justice. The application of these
principles
to particular cases, forms a great part of the
common
law: the application of the principles of justice
to that infinity of cases, which arise on the intercourse
of men in a state of society: obligations independent
of contract, or contracts themselves. We read the
decisions in such cases, because the reason of those
who have gone before, is a help to those that follow.
Rules of pleading, rules of evidence, the practice of
courts, are the result of experience, and our own;
or adopted by us, as a part of the common law. This
law forms a system begun in the woods of Germany;
taking its rise amongst our Saxon ancestors, was
brought with them into Britain; receiving accessions
from what it found good in the island to which it
came.
Abolish the common law? why not abolish the art
of medicine, because it has been cultivated in Great
Britain? Sydenham, Harvey and Mead, are thought to
have added to the science. The British chymists, in
some instances, have increased the materia medica.
Why not make war upon the apothecaries, because
they sell English drugs?
Just at that instant a hurly burly was heard half
a square distant; people rushing into an apothecary
shop, and jugs thrown out at the window. It was a
mob collected to break up the Doctor.
A Latin master, a friend of his from the college,
lifting up his hands in the attitude of a man attempting
to ring a bell, was endeavouring to appease the
multitude
,
in such address as was on his tongue from the
classic authors: cives, cives, quis furor vos agitat!
vesania qu versat! que dementia cepit! Infelix
pecus
!
oh! heu! proh hominum. Insanire decet,
ratione
modoque.
It availed nothing. The outrage was continued.
Glass and earthen-ware, broken; the powders and
liquids filled the atmosphere with vapour, and
variety
of smells. Ah! said an orator, it is full time
to return to the simplicity of early times, when
men had recourse, in case of internal diseases, or
external wounds, to the barks of trees, or the plants
of the fields, and had not yet become acquainted
with extractions and decoctions put in phials, and
called drops, to make the well sick, and poison the
living.
It would have made a drawing in a picture, to
have seen the apothecary, in the mean time, at work,
endeavouring to clear the shop; with a cudgel,
sometimes
pelting a riotor; at other times breaking the
head of one of his own jugs.
A preacher stood by exhorting to carry on the
work. He had taken a text. It was in these words,
There is a time to build, and a time to pull down.
He thought this a pulling down time. The greater
part of his audience appeared to think him orthodox,
and were shewing their faith, by their works, at the
expence of the dispensary. Good God, called out
the son of Esculapius, will no one assist? shall I be
ruined? The industry of years dissipated in a day:
All my laudanum, my pepper-mint, sulphur, vitriol,
oils, acids, my tartar and arsenic; all gone to pot,
or rather the pots gone with them, jars, jugs,
glister-pipes
:
what devastation! what havock! Is it for
sport, or for profit? Oh; monstrous! the folly, the
fury, the madness of the populace! They are indeed
the swinish multitude. A herd of swine in a century,
would not have done me so much damage.
The swine ran down a steep place into the sea,
said the preacher. They may have had a vertigo,
or dizziness of the brain, said the Doctor, but they had
no hydrophobia.
At this point of the game, whether by design, or
accident, a cry of fire had been raised; and the fire
company with their engine and buckets were up, and
began to play upon the building, throwing the water
in at the windows, and at the door, so that the
people
in the house, and the Doctor himself were as wet
as rats, and occasionally the pipe carried round with
a sweep, came upon the by-standers without. The
preacher got his Bible wet, and his Psalm book; and
the Latin master called out Jam satis terris; or that
there was rain enough; and the orator, thought it
a new way, of quelling mobs. The Captain said he
had seen something of the kind attempted in
repressing
bees, when they swarmed, throwing water
on them, and that the riots of men were anologous.
But what can they mean, said a peace officer by
attacking this mans boluses? Do they mean to put
an end to the practice of physic? among the savages
they attribute aches, and pains in the flesh and
bones, to a bad spirit that has got into the muscles,
and the tendons, and by rubbing with the hand, and
pressing the parts they endeavour to expel it. The
chaffing has sometimes a good effect, and if there
should not be an evil spirit to drive out, it eases and
relieves from the complaint. But though exercise
and temperance may preserve health, and cold and
warm bathing, and friction of the joints may relieve
from a rheumatic pain, yet in a multitude of cases,
the specifics of pharmacy may be found useful;
especially
in a society of close population, where we
have not woods and forests to run in, and where
sedentary occupations keep people sitting half their
time. And though after all, the diagnosis, or
distinguishing
diseases, is in many cases, but a guess,
and the means of cure still more conjectural, yet still
there is something in the province of science, and
the skill of the well read, and experienced
physician
.
Why then do you not put the law in force against
such an attack upon the druggist, said an orator? You
see his chest of medicine broken open, before your
eyes, and his shelves pulled down, and the tables
under
foot, and yet no one bound over, or the riot act
read.
Soft and fairly said the peace officers, all in good
time.
Take sail from the mast when there comes too
strong a blast. A madness prevails at present. It
will be but a fortnights continuance. When the people
get a thing into their heads, the best way is to let them
go on. They will come to themselves by and by.
But in the mean time they will do a great deal of
harm, said the Captain.
It is in the atmosphere said the orator! is it
imported
,
or of domestic origin, said a thinking man
among the croud?
It may be imported, or it may be of domestic
origin, said a simple man; for both abroad and at
home, we have instances of such madness occasionally
breaking out, owing to some subtil gass in the holds of
vessels, or that breeds in our own streets. It may
come from France or Ireland: but what is there to
hinder it of springing up here, where there are as
good materials to work upon, as on the other
side the water. Human nature is the same every
where.
A genteel looking man had got up to speak; but
the people had got tired, and did not stay to hear
him. They retired every man to his habitation.
CHAP. X.
The
memoir of the bog-trotter had now made its
appearance, and was read with avidity by all ranks, and
classes of the community. The novelty of the matter
made the stile agreeable and it was called up as a
model of fine writing. In fact the school master who
was the real author, Teague furnishing only
materials
,
had some knowledge of the English grammar, and
had read the Pilgrims Progress, the Seven Champions
of Christendom, Reynard the Fox, the Siege of Troy,
and had a diction not unpleasing, and tolerably
correct
.
The place of a professor of rhetoric in the college,
being vacant, it was suggested that the new author
might be an acquisition to give lectures on eloquence,
and Teague was, as usual, elated, with the
proposition
,
and solicited the Captain to countenance the
matter, with the Trustees of the Seminary, that, if
he had failed in the political, he might have a chance
of elevation in the literary world. The Captain
accordingly
lent his aid, and though, with some
reluctance
undertook to press the matter with the friends
of the institution, still doubting in his own mind the
capacity of the candidate for a chair in a University.
It is true he had heard tell of lectures on taste and
criticism by those, who had not much taste, and
were no great critics themselves. But this was
G
considered as abuse, and not to pass into precedent.
However consented and did broach the matter. It
was likely to be carried and would have been carried,
but for the other professors, who said it would be a
burlesque on them, and threatned to resign if the
thing was pushed any farther, as in their opinion,
however great the fame of this phenominon might be,
he was in fact but an illiterate person, and fitter for a
professor of gymnastics, than of letters in an
academy
.
A professor of gymnastics, then let him be, said
the Captain. It is true he has not read Saltzman on
the athletics of schools, or Strutt on the games and
pastimes of England; nevertheless he can play, at
prison base, barley butt, blind-mans buff; the
hind-most
of three, and fool in the corner. He is no slouch
at swere-arse, is a pretty good hitch at a wrestle.
He can run and leap abundantly well.
So saying, he turned about, and walked away,
with his stick in his hand to look for the bog-trotter,
and to bring him forward for the professorship, but
had not walked far before he fell in with the
remains
of the Doctor's shop that had been thrown
out upon the street; and there, was Teague in a stall
turned doctor, and selling drugs to the multitude,
arsenic for worm-powder, and laudanum for
wine-cordial
.
He had picked up the phials when the
apothecary
had run off fearing the multitude, and the
people thinking this man his deputy, or substitute,
selling off at a low price, were willing to take a
bargain
while they could get it.
The Captain was enraged on the score of
humanity
,
and for the first time, made a stroke at the
bog-trotter
The cudgel lighted on a box of spanish
flies that was going off at 12 cents, and dissipated
the contents. A dialogue ensued, and much
expostulation
.
But the result was, that the vendue was
broken up, and it came to be understood, that Teague
was not the real owner of the ware-house, and that
the purchasers might be called upon to pay for the
druggs a second time. This last consideration had
an effect and the bidding ceased.
But as to the professorship of wrestling, we have
heard nothing farther of it.
At this time John Murdoch came up, a shrewd
sensible man, though not in any office, and being
well acquainted with the Captain, and the history of
the bog-trotter, made free to speak upon the
occasion
,
and addressed himself to the Captain; for the
bog-trotter had run off, whether fearing the stick, or
to spend the money he had gathered. Captain, said
he, Nemo omnibus horis sapit; for he had a few
scraps of Latin at his command; no man is wise at
all times. You have been a long time seeking to
get your man into place, and now that he had got
into place without you; for accident often does more
for a man than his best friends; now, I say that he
had got into place without you, you have been
unwilling
that he should stay in it. Nay you have
driven him from it. He had just got into a good
way in an honourable and lucrative profession, and
you have stopt his career with your batabuy, or
shalelah, a weapon which, from his infancy he had
been taught to dread. Do you think the greater part
of doctors are better read than he was; or even if
better read, does their reading turn to much account?
will the people employ them the sooner, because
they are learned in their profession? Or, even if
learned
,
is their skill the more to be depended on. One
of the faculty has said; Celsus, our art is but a
guess; ars nostra conjecturalis est. Hoffman ran
down Borehave; Cullen ran down Hoffman. Brown
ran down Cullen; and the system now among the
physicians, is a hotch potch, or mixture of all.
O'Regan
might have been a quack; but the faculty tell
us that medicine is much indebted to quacks.
Mercury
was brought into use by them, and it is now the
panacea, the specific for almost all diseases,
the
consumption
itself
. Gravity is the most practical
qualification
of the physician. Could not Teague assume
a gravity of appearance. A sober physiognomy, a
measured step, with a cane in his hand; a steady
look straight before him; a nod to those that pass
by, as if from a thinking man? Could not he feel a
pulse, and speak mysteriously, if he could not speak
learnedly, not having given clinical lectures, or
attended
them? Or could he not hold his tongue a long
time, and say nothing; which would answer the
purpose
just as well; for silence is obscurity, and
obscurity
is sublimity. When the patient is dead, it was
the disease killed him, not the Doctor. Dead men
tell no tales. Facilis descensus Averni. I have heard
the old blind lawyer say, that occasionally goes about
the town, and delivers lectures, with the blind fidler
at his elbow; I have heard him discoursing to this
effect, that in the profession of the law which is an
ostensible profession, and more likely to expose a
mans parts, or faculties of mind than almost any
other, yet it is, not always understood who is the real
lawyer; and a man may have made an estate at the
bar before it is found out
that he is a fool
. If he
loses the cause by his mismanagement, he lays it on
the jury: or if the court decide on a point of law
contrary to the advice he had given, what can I help
it, says he, if
a commission cannot give sense
. It is
the law of the books, though it is not the law of their
heads. The client submits, and is better pleased
with his counsel, than with an honest fellow who had
told him in the first instance; or would tell him in
the last, that his cause was not of the best; and the
verdict, or judgment right. If this is the case in a
profession, that, in comparison of the other, is visible,
tangible; that you can reach it in its exhibition; what
must it be in an art which is less in view; where
the ignorance of the practitioner is capable of more
concealment; and the man dies who is most hurt,
and carries his complaint before Minos, and
Rhadamanthus
,
who wait until
the Doctor comes
to give him
a fair hearing?
It is not that I had any doubt, said the Captain, of
his getting into practise, that I had been opposed to
his empiricism. My apprehension rather was that he
would get too much practise, and have too many lives
to answer for morally and in conscience, if not legally.
For what did he know of drugs, or of their effect upon
G 2
the constitution? If you go to conscience and
morality
with it, I have done, said Mr. Murdoch. You
leave no reasoning for me. I was speaking as a man
of the world, and the making a living: if you feel
yourself entramelled with that sort of doctrine, you
are on the other side the line. I have no concern
with you. You belong to the old school: good bye
to you. So saying, he left the company standing in
the street, and withdrew.
The doctor, in the mean time had come back, and
was examining the depradations.
An inventory was taken under the direction of the
Captain that what remained might be compared with
the original stock, and the loss ascertained, that it
might be compensated to the poor man by
subscription
.
As to what had been purloined by Teague
in the way of sale, he undertook himself to make up
as to that, having been somewhat accessary to it by
introducing the bog-trotter to the village.
CHAP. XI.
From
what has been stated of the activity of mind
among the inhabitants of this village, and especially
from the samples that have been given of their
attention
to politics it will not be a subject of wonder, that
there was a village coffee-house, on a small scale in
this place, and that the people sometimes met here,
to smoke a pipe, and take a glass of beer and read a
newspaper. It might be called a beer-house, if what
was drank in it gave the name; for more ale was
drank than coffee; but, in imitation of the larger towns
it was called a coffee-house. It happened that the
Captain wishing to learn the news of the coffee-house,
took a walk there.
Teague, with what he had collected from the sale
of the drugs, had been here before them; and taking
on himself the air of a politician, had called for pipes
and tobacco, and was looking over a gazette; not that
he could read; but to induce people to believe that he
could read: occasionally also, as if unconscious of
those around him throwing out a sentence, in French;
a little of which he had acquired as a parrot would
language: such phrases as, save qui peut: save
himself
that can; tam pis pour lui; so much the worse
for him; a la guillotine; to the guillotine. Nor did
he neglect the shrug of the shoulders, a habit of
expressing
the emotions of the mind, which remained
still in some degree among the republicans, though it
had been contracted under the monarchy, when
people
were afraid to speak out, and raised the back,
when they did not dare to lift the voice; and dumb
signs served instead of a viva voce declaration. This
suited the bog-trotter admirably, and enabled him to
conceal his ignorance. Not that he had the prudence
to intend this; but imitating what he had seen
abroad
,
he took up the character at home.
The attention of the benches was attracted by
his physiognominy, and attitude; and in the opinion
of some, he was taken for a French minister or
consul
;
by others for an emigrant of distinction that
had lost his property, for the sake of his title of
nobility
.
The Captain hearing these surmises, impelled by
the natural candour of his mind, could not avoid
explaining
.
It is neither French minister, nor consul,
said he; but my bog-trotter, that I had detected
some time ago, selling drugs, and passing himself
for a physician. He might be qualified to be a horse
doctor, but certainly not to practice on the human
constitution. But what particularly excited
indignation
,
was his purloining the medicines, taking and
carrying away, what did not belong to him, and was
aggravated by the circumstance, of the things being
thrown into the open air, by the rioters who had
broken the house, and dispersed the shop, to the
great injury of the poor apothecary whose property
they were. I had taken it on myself to chastise him,
considering myself under obligation to restrain him,
having been accessary to his coming to the village.
And if you will give leave gentlemen, and excuse
the time and place, I will take the liberty to deal
a few blows at this instant, as he cannot
conveniently
escape from the boxes before my stroke
over-takes
him.
Not giving time for reflection, or reply on the
part of those present, he raised his baton, and was
about to strike; Teague on the other hand, had up
his heart of oak, also, if not to offend, at least, to
defend
,
and parry the stroke. His countenance in the
mean time argued submission: his words also,
whether
from fear, or respect softening and conciliatory.
God love your shoul, said he, and be aisy; and not
be after bating me before desse paple dat know noting
o' de cause o' de matter; that will take you for an
ould fool, bating and fighting for noting. Just for
making a copper out o' de offals of a farrier, selling
dem to de paple when de mountebank himself ran
off. It is a good job to be making a penny in hard
times. If your honour will give me lave, I will
introduce
your honour, to dese paple dat have taken
me for a French minister. I tought I had looked
more like a Papish Praist. But as dey know best,
it is all de same to me. I will drink your honours
health in a tankard of ail if your honour will plaise
to call for it. Dese shivil looking strangers, dat I
never saw before will like your honour better than
kicking and cuffing wid your shalelah and puting
yourself in a passion wid a bog-trotter dat never
meant you any harm.
The address seemed reasonable; and those
present
interfering, the Captain consented to let him off,
advising more honesty and fair dealing for the future.
But, in his apology to the company, for what might
seem an impropriety in behaviour, he was led to
give the history of the Hybernian, and the
circumstance
of his being in France, which accounted for
his affecting the French manner, and occasional
attempts
at the language. This in the mean time led
to a general conversation on the affairs of France,
and the history of the revolution. Observations were
made occasionally, above the ordinary stile of
beer-house
conversation; and of which, though expressed
in a desultory manner, as each one took the pipe
from his mouth, or listened to the suggestions of
others, it may be worth while to give a sample.
One of these who had a considerable fluency of
tongue, and ready memory, observed. That the
loss of liberty in the course of that revolution was
owing to the unskilfulness of those who conducted it.
But in like situations, said another, is it
reasonable
to expect more skill? The mass of the people
conducted the revolution, and is it in the nature of
things, for them to stop at a proper point?
It is in the nature of things, said another; but
it is a
rare felicity
. It is natural to distrust him who
proposes to stop short of what seems a complete
reform
.
The sovereign people is as liable to the
impulse
of passion, and as open to the insinuations of
flatterers as an individual tyrant. The courtier
devoid
of principle, in the democratic hall, gets the
ear of the populace, as he would that of a Prince, and
abuses it.
I do not know well what a man can better do, said
another, than just to fall in with the current of
opinion
,
and when it changes, change with it. We are
right, say the people. You are right, says the man
of prudence. We were wrong, say the people.
You were wrong, says the same man. Who is ever
displeased with a person that has been in the same
error with himself?
That is true said the Captain: but is there no
such thing as public spirit? Is there not a spice of
virtue to be found in a republic? Who would not
devote himself for the public good? Were Phocion,
and Philopoemen time servers? I grant that it is
not the way to make money of the people, to oppose
them, but it is the way ultimately to make friends of
them, and to have their confidence. Let school boys
propose to rob a hen-roost, they will respect him who
dissuaded, though it was not popular, but incured
the imputation of cowardice, and a want of spirit, at
the time. Let them rob a garden, and be brought
to punishment, they will revere him who had told
them it was wrong but was hurried along with them,
and suffered by their fault. It is by these means that
amongst savages, strong minds obtain the ascendancy
and are trusted by the nation. Great is the force of
truth, and it will prevail. It requires great courage
to bear testimony against an error in the judgment
of the multitude; as it is attended with present
disreputation
.
Yet courage here is virtue, and is its own
reward.
The great mischief of democracy is party, said an
orator, who had taken the pipe from his teeth.
It is the great advantage of it, said his neighbour,
a man with a red head, and a sandy beard. It is the
angel that descends at a certain season and troubles the
pool of Bethseda, that the lame person may be made
whole. Were it not for party, all things would go
one way; the commonwealth would stagnate.
But let one party obtain the ascendancy, and does
it not come to the same thing. All things will go one
way then; or rather stand still.
Not so, said the Captain; no party can maintain
power long. The ascendancy carries its overthrow
along with it. The duration depends upon the
judgement
of the leaders of the councils. But the leaders,
will find that they cannot lead, after the overthrow
of an adversary. While they were struggling up the
ascent, every one was willing to be helped, and took
advice. But on the top of the precipice, they take
possession of the plain, and scamper, and hoop, and
there is no restraining them. A leader of judgment,
will always find it more difficult to manage his own
people than to combat his adversaries. They cannot
be brought to halt at a proper point; and their errors
bring them down again, as those of the possessors of
power, did before them.
However, this is wandering from the point, said
a man in a black wig; we were talking of the French;
who says that Bonaparte did not usurp the
government
?
I am of that opinion, said the Captain; for there
was no government to usurp. He put down the
directory, who had themselves put down the
councils
.
The banishment to Caryenne, is a proof of
this.
I agree with you, said an individual on the other
side of the box, or bench, as it rather might be
called
.
It was the Mountainards that ruined the
republic
,
at the very time they were running down others
under the charge of incivicism, and conspiracy against
the republic.
Doubtless, said the Captain; It is in popular
intemperance
,
that aristocracy, and despotism often
have their source.
At this instant the blowing of a horn announced
the arrival of the post; the late papers were brought
into the room, and all began to read
H
CHAP. XII.
The
Captain having a short space of time to spare
from his avocations, and disposed to take the air, had
walked out and coming near the small building
which served as a hospital for the village, was
disposed
to visit it, and see the state in which it was, with
what new objects, since he had been absent on his
peregrinations.
He was shewn by the keeper a very extraordinary
object in a cell, a man who imagined himself a moral
philosopher, delivering lectures. His observations
were occasionally fraught with good sense. While the
Captain stood, in the passage opposite his door, he
made a note of some part of his discourse, and which,
having had an opportunity of copying, we shall give
to the reader. It was on the subject of the resentment
of injuries.
It is a strange thing, said he, that we cannot
submit with equanimity to evils in the moral world,
as we do in the natural. We expect a fair day, and
there comes a foul. Is it any gratification to us, to
beat the air, or stamp upon the puddle? Who would
think of giving the cow-skin to a hurricane? Yet the
greatest damage is sometimes done by a blast of
wind. He would be thought a madman, and sent to
this place, who was deprehended buffeting a
whirlwind
,
even though it had torn up by the roots, or
broken down a fruit tree. He must be out of his
senses indeed, that would have recourse to a
bludgeon
,
in case of an attack by an inundation. It would
be a laughing stock to see even a Turk giving the
bastinado, to a hot season, or to cold weather. The
knout indeed to a Russian winter! Did the Pope ever
excommunicate a storm on the ocean? What man is
angry with a squall of wind? He considers it as an
evil, and composes his mind to the disasters, which,
in the loss of his merchandize, it has occasioned.
Is ingratitude less to be expected? and yet when it
happens, we reprobate, and seek revenge. Sufferings
from moral causes, are just as common as from
natural
.
And yet when an injury is committed by a
human creature, we are taken as it were by surprise,
and lose temper. Cannot we turn away, as it were
from a sudden gust, and take shelter under some one
willing to protect us, without thinking more of the
enemy that had beaten us, with his fist, or abused us
with a bad tongue? The pelting of a hail stone never
induces you to use hard words, or to demand
satisfaction
of the atmosphere; and yet you will send a
challenge, and risk your own life to punish a man
that has barely slighted you in manner, or in words.
Why not take the other side of road, and pass
him by as you would a pond of water, or a marshy
place? Cannot we take the necessary precautions
against calumny, as we would against foul air,
without
puting ourselves in a passion with the author of
the defamation any more than with a vapour, or an
exhalation? But there is such a thing, as will and
intention
in the moral agent. Is this any thing more
than an idea, a matter of our own imaginatiens? It is
the same thing to us whether there is a
spirit
in the
winds, or
no spirit
when a house is blown down; or
the roof carried away. What is it to us, whether the
cause thinks, or does not think. We blame it the
most sometimes because it does not think. We call
in question the understanding of a man when he
wrongs us; and say, if he had the reflection of a
reasonable being, he would have conducted himself in
a different manner. And yet the consideration that
he had not reflection, does not mitigate, but increases
our resentment. Oh! the inconsistency of human
life and manners. I am shut up here as a mad man,
in a mad place, and yet it appears to me that I am
the only rational being amongst men, because I
know that I am mad, and acknowledge it, and they
do not know that they are mad, or acknowledge it.
As far as my small judgment goes, says an
orator
,
when he is about to express an opinion; and
yet he does not think his judgment
small
. No, no:
he would take it much amiss if any one took him at
his word, and would say, true it is, your
judgment is
but small
. All think themselves wise, wise, wise.
But I say, fools, fools, fools. At this he threw
himself
down on his couch, and fell asleep.
The keeper said he had been lecturing three
hours, and he presumed, was exhausted of his
strength, if not of his fund of observations.
In the next apartment was an insane person, who
stiled himself the Lay Preacher, and the
Captain
coming forward, he took his text as usual; and
began to preach. Book of Judges, 21, 25. In
those days there was no King in Israel; and every
man did that which was right in his own eyes.
That was right, said a mad democrat, who was
confined in a cell across the passage. When we got
quit of a king, the same thing was expected here,
that every man should do that which was right in
his own eyes; but behold we are made to do that
which is right in the eyes of others. The law
governs
,
it is said, and this law is made up of Acts of
Assembly, and the decisions of the Courts; and a
kind of law they call
the common law
. A mans nose
is just as much upon the grind-stone as it was before
the revolution. It is not your own will that you
must consult; but the will of others. Down with
all law, and give us a free government, That every
man may do that which is right in his own eyes.
Madman, said the Preacher; thou knowest not
what thou sayest. It is an evil that men should do
that which is right
in their own eyes
. A man is not
a proper judge of right in his own cause. His
passions bias his judgment. He cannot see the right
and justice of the case. The want of a king in
Israel
was accompanied with the want of laws. I do
not mean to say that, without a king there cannot be
laws. But kings is put here for government, that
being the government, at that period known in the
world. For even a mixed monarchy is an
improvement
of later times. The meaning is, there being
no government, every man did that which was right
in his own eyes; and ten to one,
but it was wrong in
the eyes of others:
A wild state of anarchy indeed.
A fine time for Sampson to live, that could knock
down people with
the jaw bone of an ass
.
What worse, said the democrat, than amongst
us where we see honest men knocked down with the
H 2
jaw bones of lawyers
, arguing a cause,
and the judges
that decide upon
the case.
Passing on, the Captain came to the stair case,
and ascended to the second story; he wished to see a
mad poet who had been engaged in travestying his
travels. He had the advantage of a commodious
apartment, more so, than some of those who have
surpassed him in his art in different places and
periods
of the world. The great Dryden was not so
well accommodated, at least at the time he wrote his
St. Cecilia's Ode, which is thought to be the best of
his compositions. The poet that we have before us,
was a quiet man, and had the privilege of the
hospital
,
to go and come as he pleased, but not to go
without
the walls. He was confined here by his relations
merely as a matter of convenience to have him taken
care of; being so absent in mind, that he was
incapable
of taking care of himself. The bundle
of manucript by him in dogrel verse, would seem
to be enough to compose a book, half as large
as Hudibrass. He was over-joyed to see the
Captain, who was the hero of his Poem; and
the Captain was no less amused to see him, and
the adventures of which he made a part turned into
rhyme. His sensations were not equally sublime
with those of the Trojan hero, when he saw the war
of Troy in the paintings hung up in the Hall of the
Queen of Carthage. But the circumstance was not
less entertaining to him as the actor, or the speaker
in the course of the adventures so recorded, and he
consented to accept a copy, not that he meant to
give it to the press, but to cast his eye over it, for
his particular amusement: Nevertheless, the
manuscript
having fallen into our hands, we shall select
parts of it, and according as the reader seems to like
that which he gets, we shall give him more. In the
mean time we shall dismiss the Captain from the
hospital, not but that there was much more to see
and hear amongst the Bedlamites still, but affected
with melancholy and weary of the scene. At the
same time doubting with himself, whether those he
saw confined were more devoid of reason than the
bulk of men running at large in the world. He had
no doubt of one being a lunatic of whom the keeper
made mention, but whom he had not an inclination
to visit, in the second story; for he was said to be
employed looking at the moon, with a pair of
spectacles
which he took for a telescope. For lunacy
means moon-struck, and this seemed to be the case
with him.
CHAP. XIII.
Having
turned his back on the hospital, the
Captain saw a concourse of people: the cry was a new
code of laws.
A new code, said a grave man? Is not the old,
the result of experience, a gradual accession of rules
and regulations in society? Begin again, and you
would come to the same result at last. But to form
laws from abstract comprehension, fitted to all
exigencies
,
is not within the compass of the powers of man.
It is sufficient if he can form a schedule or plan of
government; this is the outline; the interior
gyrations
,
must be made up from repeated experiments.
The words new code, were mistaken by some
amongst the croud, for no code.
No code, was repeated through the multitude.
What no laws at all, said the grave man?
No laws, was the outcry immediately, and every
vociferous person wishing to hear himself speak, and
every timid person, afraid of being suspected of
incivicism
,
began to call out, no laws.
That will never do, said the grave man, it were
better to have no judges than to have no laws, or at
least as bad. For how can men judge but by laws.
Arbitrary discretion is a blind guide.
The words no judges, had been heard more
distinctly
than the rest, and supposing it to be a
substitute
for no laws, voices came from every quarter in
support of the amendment. I support the amendment;
I agree to the substitute, no judges, no judges.
The clamour became general, down with the
judges.
This puts me in mind, said the Captain, of the
sermon of the Lay Preacher. I should have no
objection
to an amendment of the law, or to new judges
but no laws, no judges, is more than I had expected
to have heard in an assembly of republicans.
A person standing by was struck with the good
sense and moderation of this remark, and stepping
forward, made his harangue.
I will not say, said he, that I am for no judges;
But this I will say, that new judges is a desideratum in
the body politic. The greater part that we have are
grown gray, and are as blind as bats: they cannot see
without spectacles. I am for new judges.
You talk of judges, said the grave man, as if it
was as easy to make a judge of law as to make a
bird-cage, or a rat-trap.
What, said a merry fellow, shall we have new
shoes, new pantaloons, and new every thing; and
shall we not have new judges? We shall never do
any good with the present set of judges on the
bench.
It was carried that there should be new judges.
But having disposed of the old, it became a
question
whom they should elect for new. The
bog-trotter
was proposed for one, having had his name up
before
in the matter of the news-paper.
What, my waiter, said the Captain? Yes, your
waiter, said a wag, or a fool, I do not know which.
You astonish me, said the Captain. My waiter a
judge of the courts. He will make sad work on a
bench of justice. He will put down all law. He will
silence all lawyers. He will have no law: no books;
no cases; all plain sailing with him. Every man
his own lawyer, state his own cases, and speak for
himself. No Hooks and Crooks reports; no Hawkins;
no Bacons: or Blackstones; or Whitestones; no
Strange cases; no law of evidence. Every man sworn
and tell what he knows, whether he has seen it, or
heard it, at second, or at first hand: interest or no
interest; all the same; let the jury believe what
they think proper; and the judge state the law from
his thumbs ends without books.
This is madness, and here I have more trouble
on my hands with this bog-trotter, than I have ever
had before. It is a more delicate matter to see him
placed on the seat of justice, to administer the laws,
than to be in the Senate House, and assist to make
them. For in that case he would be but a
component
member of a great body, and his errors, might
be lost in the wisdom of the other members. But in
the capacity of judge he is sole, or with but a few,
and it is an easier matter to frame a single law than
to expound and apply a thousand.
Gentlemen, said he, addressing himself to the
multitude, you will ruin your administration at this
rate. You will bring disgrace upon it. The people
will not feel your error at once; but they will feel it
by and by, and will depose you who have been the
most active in this cavalcade. That is, they will
withdraw from you their confidence. The abuse of
power leads to the loss of it. No party in the
government
,
can exist long, but by moderation and
wisdom
The duration of power, will always be in
proportion
to the discrete use of it
. I am shocked at
your indiscretion. Have not some of you read Don
Quixotte? In the capacity of judge, Sancho Panza
made some shrewd decisions; or rather Cervantes
made them for him; for, I doubt much whether
Sancho
ever made one of them. But who is there of
you, will make decisions for Teague. I doubt much
whether he would take advice, or let any one judge
in his behalf. Besides that of a judge is not a
ministerial
office, and cannot legally be exercised by
deputy. You will make pretty work of it with
Teague for a judge. It may be according to the
light of nature; but not according to the law of
nature
that he will judge. At least, not according to
the law of nations: for no nation under heaven ever
had such a judge. Not even in the most
unenlightened
times. If he had a knowledge even of the old
Brehon law, in his native country, it might be some
help. But in matters of meum and tuum he has a
certain wrong headedness that hinders him from
ever seeing right. He thinks always on the
one side; that is on his own side. But what he
would do between suitors, I am not so clear, but I
take it he would be a partial judge. The man has
no principle of honour or honesty. He would be an
unjust judge.
Will not the commission make him a judge,
exclaimed
one of the multitude.
But will it make him capable of judging, said the
Captain?
Why not, said a boisterous man. What else
qualifies or makes fit. Can the most sensible man,
or the most learned person, judge without a
commission
?
Doubtless that is the authority, said the Captain.
But still the capacity.
Capacity! Said a man, with a bit out of the one
side of the membrane of his nose, sniveling in his
speech; capacity! Give me the commission, and I
will shew you the capacity. Let me see who will
dare to question my capacity.
Such a burlesque, said the blind lawyer, tends
naturally
to the overthrow of justice. For able and
conscientious men will withdraw from a degraded
station. Intrigue, worse than, perhaps, the arm of flesh
itself, will come to be employed in the management of
causes. Security of person, property, and reputation,
the great end of civil institutions, will be rendered
precarious
.
The security of them depends upon fixed
and known rules, as well as the application of them.
It is not an easy matter to attain a knowledge of these
rules. The laws of a single game at school, or of
such as employ manhood, in an hour of amusement,
is a thing of labour to acquire. The law
parliamentary
;
or rules of a legislative body, is not learnt
in a day. And yet without a knowledge of it,
there is a want of order, as well as dispatch in
business. The laws of municipal regulation in
a community, laws of external structure, and
internal
police, are not attainable with the celerity of
a moments warning. But when we come to the rules
of property, the laws of tenure and of contract a field
opens, that startles the imagination. Even the study
of years, makes but a sciolist. But, you will say, lay
aside rules. Let all decisions spring from the dictates
of common sense applyed to the particular case before
the judge. But the mere arbitrary sense of right and
wrong, is an unsafe standard of justice. A free
government
,
is a government of laws. A Cadi or a Muffti
are tolerable only in despotic counties. You are
destroying
your republic by undermining the
independence
and respectability of your judiciary. It is that
branch of the government, on which liberty most
essentially depends.
The multitude seemed to be but little moved by
these observations, which made it necessary for the
Captain to try what could be done with the bog-trotter
himself, to dissuade him from accepting the
appointment
.
Accordingly, taking him aside, he spoke
to him as follows:
Teague, said he, will there be no end of your
presumption? I take it to be a great error of
education
in our schools, and colleges, that ambition is
encouraged by the distribution of honours, in
consideration
of progress in letters; that one shall be
declared the first scholar in languages, another in
mathematics. It is sufficient that the fact be so
without announcing it. The self-love of the student
will find it out himself, without information, and his
fellows will be ready to acknowledge it, provided that
it is not arrogated, or a demand made that it be
formally
acknowledged. For this takes away the
friendship
I
of others, and corrupts the moral feelings of
the successful competitor himself. Ambition springs
up, that accursed root which poisons the world.
Now, you cannot lay your ambition to the charge
of schools, or colleges: For, you have never been
at any seminary whatever, as far as I understand, if
I may guess from your want of attainments in
academic
studies; and yet notwithstanding you have
never been in the way of the distinction of grades, and
prizes, and literary honours; you have discovered an
ambition of a full grown size, even at this early
period
of your life. It must be a bad nature that has
generated this preposterous aiming and stretching at
promotion. A wise man will weigh, what he
undertakes
;
what his shoulders can bear, and what they
cannot. He will consider whether the office is fit for
him, or whether he is fit for the office. He will
reflect
that the shade is often-times the most desirable
situation. Do you see that bird upon the tree there?
It builds its nest with care, and endevours to render
it convenient. But does it build it on the topmost
bough, exposed to the sun, and the heavy rain; or
rather does it not choose an inferior branch in the
thickest of the umbrage? Take a lesson from the
fowls of heaven, and the brutes of the field. It is not
the elevation of place, but the conveniency of
accommodation
that governs them. Ambition is an
accursed
germe of evil in the human mind. It is equally
destructive of the happiness of the possessor and of
that of others. You a republican, and yet destitute
of republican virtue, the basis of which I take to be
humility and self-denial
. Were I the master of an
academy, the first, and continual lesson would be,
to attain science, and be learned; but as to seeming
so, to consider it as of no account.
Science would
discover
itself
. The possessing knowledge would be its
own reward. The concealment of all self-knowledge of
this advantage, not only constitutes the decent and
the becoming in life, but lays the foundation of
emolument
in the good will of others
. It may be
pardonable
in early age to have pride in the advantage of
bodily form; but we call in question the modesty of
a youth, male or female, who seems to set an
inordinate
value, on a limb or a feature. How much less
tolerable,
the pride of mental superiority
. But of all
things under heaven the most contemptible, and the
least sufferable, is that of incompetency to a trust,
and the aspiring to a place, for which the candidate
is not qualified; or, even if qualified, against
modesty
,
and the claims of others. It brings a man to be
the subject of a laugh, and ridicule. Do you know
that the making you a judge, was but a farce, in the
manner that Sancho Pancho was advanced to a
government
.
You have read the Don Quixotte of
Cervantes
I presume. But what do I say; you read
Don Quixotte! you have read nothing; and yet you
would be a judge. Ambition, I tell you, is an evil.
You have read of Don Quixotte, in the Roman
Histotory
.
Again I forget myself. You have read
nothing
But I may tell you of him. What was the
purple to him compared with lossing the affections of
his countrymen? Though, by the bye, there is
some reason to think that it was neck, or
nothing
with him, and that self-preservation made it
necessary to usurp the empire, things having come
to that state at Rome, that if he did not usurp,
another
would. But a good republican, and a virtuous
man, would rather fall, than save his life, at the
expence
of the rights of others. But it slips my
memory
that I am talking to a bog-trotter. There is
no making a silk purse out of a sows car. Suppose
you were made a judge; in this hurly burly of the
public mind, would your standing be secure, even
with the most perfect competency for the place?
You would not stand two throws of a weavers shuttle.
Your chair, under you, would be like an old piece of
furniture bought at a vendue, put together for sale;
the glueing gone, and the joints broken. It would
fall before it had felt half your weight, and leave you,
with your back-side upon the floor. New judges
to-day, and the public mind would have desired new
judges to-morrow. Consider the physical
consequence
of being broken from the bench. Take my
word it is not a common breaking this; it will affect
your frame at every change of the weather. It will
make an Almanac of your whole system. It will
make your joints ache. It will be worse than a sprain
in the ancle; or a rheumatism in the limbs; or a
sciatica in the small of the back. It will give you a
cholic every new moon, and take away your sleep at
midnight. It will give you the jaundice; and hurt
your complexion. Your eyes will become
yellow
,
and your cheeks green. You will loose your
appetite; and not be able to eat, even when you can
get it. Why man; it will blister your feet, and break
your shins. It will bring you to deaths door, before
you have lived half your days.
By de holy poker, said Teague, I will be no
judge, if dat is de way of it. Dey may judge for
demselves; I will be no judge. De devil a judge
will I be; I would sooner dig turf or be a
horse-jockey
at fairs in Ireland, dan be a judge on dose
terms; so dey may make whom dey please a judge
for me.
The Captain was satisfied, finding that his
expostulation
,
and remonstrance had had the desired effect.
I 2
CHAP. XIV.
Containing Observations.
To speak seriously upon the subject, I doubt
much, whether in the present commercial state of
society, and where property is not held in common,
people would be safe and prosperous without law
altogether
.
I do not know whether, even lawyers are
not a necessary evil. It is true, they take up more
time, than is perhaps necessary, in their pleadings,
and cite more authorities than are absolutely
applicable
to the point in question. The younger council
read authorities, to shew that they have read, and
the older to prove that they have not forgotten. I
would allow ninety nine cases out of an hundred, that
have nothing to do with the matter; but the citing
five hundred cases, not one of which is any thing to
the purpose, is carrying it to an excess which in
strictness cannot be justified. It takes up time, and
is not paying a proper respect to the common sense
of the country. A little original reason and
reflection
of the advocate himself might answer the
purpose
in some cases. The reason of a mans own
raising, may be as good as that which is bought at
market.
What is't t' us,
Though it were said by Trismegistus?
Not that I mean to undervalue, much less to lay
aside altogether, the assistance of borrowed reason,
and the auxiliary deductions of other men, whether
on this side the water or beyond it. But there is
such a thing as being enslaved to authorities, or at
least, loading the argument with too much
incumbrance
of quotations. It depends a good deal upon
the countenance given by the court to such a lumber
drawn from old books; yet the correcting it requires,
an infinity of care, lest you loose the advantages of
recuring to first principles.
Antiquos recludere fontes. The prefound divine
reads the commentators and thence assists the
comments
which he makes himself. The avoiding one
error leads into a worse.
Fuga Culp,
In vitium ducit.
In tearing up the darnel, the wheat may come
with it. The books must be read.
Nocturna manu, versate diurna.
But in an argument, I value more the
judgment
of selection, than the labour of collecting. It
is a flattering thing to a court, to take it for granted,
that they understand first principles; and even a
jury are not displeased when you seem to suppose
in the summing up the evidence, and the remarks
upon it, that they themselves can see a thing that is
as plain as a pike-staff. Hence, long speaking, and
an over-minute investigation, is sometimes odious.
Or to attempt to make them believe what cannot
be believed, makes a man sick, provided he is not
disposed to laugh. This depends a good deal on
the natural playfulness of his mind or the mood in
which he is, from the want of food, or sleep. I
excuse the people shewing a dissatisfaction to the
trial by jury, under the pleadings of advocates, when
the harangues, in an evening are like to prove
eternal
.
When the stream of the orator turns upon
itself
visits the ground that it had left, and is
unwilling
to quit the enchanted borders of the argument.
Yet, I think, all things considered, that there is
some use in courts of justice; and that it would not
consist with antient habits, to lay them aside all at
once. Liberty has been accustomed to them. I do
not find that she has ever done without them.
Wherever she comes, she seems to call for them.
There is a strange coincidence betwen liberty, and
an astablished jurisprudence. Whether it be matter
of accident, or a connection in the natural existence,
may deserve investigation. To give the devil his
due, there is a good deal of pains taken in the courts
to secure a fair trial, in the empanneling the jurors,
and the admissibility of evidence, whether oral or
written
.
As to the protecting the suitors from each other,
and what is called
the consequential contempt
, it is a
matter too delicate to touch upon, and we shall pass
it by. But it seems to me that the peace is better
kept, than if there were no courts at all, and no
protection
given to the parties, relative to the matter in
question, even out of doors. However, this I leave to
the consideration of the prudent.
Some are of opinion that it would be better to argue
all matters of meum, or tuum, in the public papers,
or in hand-bills posted upon trees. The principal
objection I see to this, is that the suitors waxing
warm in the controversy, would call one another
names and come to blows. A great deal of ill-blood
between neighbours might shew itself. How could
you keep lawyers from writing in the gazettes, any
more than from speaking at the bar? And here, their
jargon reduced to paper, would spread wider, and
have more permanence than floating on the
atmosphere
with which their breath had mixed it in the
first instance. The theories of ingenious men are
not to be discouraged; yet it is not to be taken for
granted that every theory that is plausible, is
practicable
;
and will be found to answer the expectations
of the most deliberate projector.
The independence of judges, is a favourite theme
with the judiciary themselves. And doubtless there
is some reason on their side. For the Scripture says,
the fear of man bringeth a snare;
and the man that
has most influence, in elections, is likely to be most
feared by an elective officer
. It would not be a state
conducive to justice; that in giving judgment, the
judge should be under the temptation to be
looking
about, and turning in his mind, the probability of
being turned out in consequence of the judgment he
was then to give: whether John O'Nokes, or John
O'Stiles were to be the next members of the
Legislative
body. But this supposes judges fallible,
and subject to the weakness of human nature, which
is not to be supposed at all.
But if you confer independence any more than in
a ministerial officer, the judge becomes impudent.
Power corrupts. It is natural to count too much upon
a mans standing. Every one overrates his own
importance
;
much more his own services. Self-love, and
self-consequence swells, and produces oedematous
effects. The man that has given his vote at an election,
or written a paper, will conceive that he has turned the
election;
that day light springs because he has croaked
.
He will denounce the man that differs from him, as
swerving from the faith; the orthodoxy of the creed;
making no allowance for the different organization of
the brain, and the conception of things. How much
more intollerant is a man like to be, that conceives
himself fixed in a seat for an interminable period.
There is such a thing as tyranny in judges; and
I am no enemy to the investigation of official
conduct
.
But let the power paramount, the people take
care that they exercise not tyranny themselves; or
give way to passion, which even in a body politic, is
possible. Let the sovereign, like that of all the earth,
do justice; and consider that the possession of power
is upheld by justice.
But as to the notion of some, that law, lawyers,
and judges, might be laid aside altogether; I doubt
as already hinted, the good policy of this. At least
the experiment may be premature. Republican
principles have purified the world a good deal; but
I do not know that it is just come to this, that men
are universally virtuous. Some vestiges of the
iron-age
yet remain. The old man of federalism enters
yet a little into our dealings with each other. I admit
that public offices are pretty well purged; but there
are unfair transactions yet spoken of among the
multitude
.
It may be too soon yet to abolish all law,
and jurisprudence. I admit that courts of law are a
check upon the freedom of the press, and I excuse
the publishers of gazettes, in their zeal to have them
overthrow, or at least reduced to fear and
subordination
.
Because it is drawing all things to their own
examination. But are they sure that they are good
republicans in this? Or, indeed that they consult
their own security in the event of this licence. For
prostrate the courts, and the cudgel prostrates
themselves
.
While they are pushing at a judge, they
are preparing the way for some robust man in due
time, to push at them. With different weapons it is
true. For the weapons of the press, are spiritual,
or of the mind; but that of the bludgeon is corporal,
and made of wood, or some other material of a solid
substance. It is not the interest of a printer that a
judge be rendered timid, by persecution; for he
stands between the cudgelist, or pugelist in a
controversy
with the man of types. Thus the freedom of
the press, is supported by the laws, and by the due
enforcement of them. Yet it is natural for a man at
first view, to think, that if there were no courts, he
could write with less restraint. He could make every
man tributary to his opinion; or to his measures;
for if he did not libel, he could threaten to libel, and
compel a submission.
It seems to me that a poor man is safer in a
country
of laws, than in one without laws. For wealth
maketh many friends; and I do not hear any
complaints
that the rich are favored in the courts. But,
that may be owing to the mode of trial, which is in
the face of the world, and where lawyers are suffered
to make as free with the character and conduct of a
rich rogue in a cause, as with one of a more
circumscribed
estate. This last is one argument I have just
hit upon, in favour of lawyers; and I find myself
well disposed to give them a lift when I can with
propriety
.
For though I would be willing to muzzle
them a little in their speeches; yet I do not wish to
see them run down altogether.
Fortitude is a requisite qualification in a judge.
It requires resolution to preserve order at the bar;
over-awe petulance; arrest impertinence in manners,
or in argument; suppress side-bar conversation; and
render the practice tolerable to practitioners of mild
and modest demeanor; of delicate and gentle
disposition
;
of scrupulous honour, and liberality in the
conduct of a suit, or management in courts.
Resolution
is necessary to decision unequivocal and
satisfactory
unawed by forensic opinion or the influence of
individuals. It is dangerous therefore to sap this
spirit of independence, by the precarious tenure of
the office, while at the same time the right of the
citizen is examined, and the power of the court
considered
in its latitude and operation. All I mean to
say, is, that the examination of the judicial conduct is
a high trust, in the view of an enlightened public,
and answerable to the present time, and to posterity,
for the consequences.
CHAP. XV.
What
is the reason, said the Captain, to a
Gentleman
who dined with him the next day, of the
fluctuation
of parties in republics?
The reasons are many, said the gentleman. But
one is the unskilful driving of the state carriage, by
those who get possession of the curricle. Phaeton,
you know, though he had the best advice from his
father
In medio tutissimus ibis.
The middle way is the best; yet before the
middle of the day, he had set the earth on fire. The
people are always honest, but oftentimes the
instruments
of their own servitude; by distrust where they
ought to have confidence, and confidence where they
ought to have distrust. The bulk cannot have perfect
information; and that reach of thought which
observation
,
and experience gives. They must trust a good
deal to others in the science of government, and the
expediency
of public measures; and it depends upon
those whom they do trust, whether the power of a
party
is long lived, or short. All depends upon the
wisdom
and integrity of those that lead. What ruined
the federal administration, but the intemperance of
driving. The upright disapproved, and the prudent
forsook
it. The unskilful pilots were not aware of an
under
current that had begun to set. Extremes will
always
K
beget the same effect; and like the tension
of a chord, produce a return in a contrary direction.
Judgment, how far to go, and where to stop, is the
great secret. Trained shaft horses, that will back
down the inclined plane of a hill, are excellent in a
team. Younglings, though mettlesome, and generous,
are apt to draw too fast, upon a declivity or even on
a plain.
For that reason, I cannot say, that I am favourable
to a change of representatives every year, even when
what has been done, does not altogether please me.
Because experience is a great softner of the mind;
it gives knowledge. A man after some time begins
to understand the game, and to find out who it is that
takes a lead with a view to some object of his own.
That may be unfathomable in the early breaking of
the business, and yet come out at last.
Or a man
may come to see his own error, and profit by the
recollection
.
But how will an honest man in a deliberate body,
know what to trust but his own judgment? Nothing.
Then let him think humbly, diligently, extensively,
distrusting pre-conceived opinions, and laying his
mind open to the light of truth. Yet there may be
some rules to guide the judgment. Such as trusting
the judgment of others who have had experience in
the science, or establishment, relative to which, the
question is agitated, or the measure proposed. Every
one is to be trusted in that thing, of which he has
some knowledge.
That man is to be trusted who is free from the
imputation of inordinate selfishness in private life.
You will find an artist that is fonder of the art than
the emoluments. There are men that connect the
public good with their own happiness; generous
spirits who manifest this by their disinterestedness
in ordinary transactions. This is a good sign, and
ought to inspire confidence in their agency, in public
matters.
The man that covets good will more than
money, and the praise of benevolence, more than that of
private gain
, has some soul in him, and other things
equal, is to be trusted before him of a contracted
spirit
,
and self-love in all his actions.
But after all, things will take their course; and
no party in a republic will retain power always,
because
they will abuse it; but the duration of power
in an clective government, will depend considerably
upon the being able to distinguish between vigour
and moderation.
CHAP. XVI.
Containing Observations.
There
is a natural alliance between liberty
and letters. Men of letters, are seldom men of
wealth, and these naturally ally themselves with the
democratic interest
in a commonwealth. These form
a balance with the bulk of the people, against power,
springing from family interest, and large estates. It
is not good policy in republicans to declare war
against letters; or even to frown upon them, for in
literary men is their best support. They are as
necessary
to them as light to the steps. They are a
safe auxiliary; for all they want is, to have the praise,
of giving information. The study of political law,
and municipal jurisprudence qualifies to inform, and
hence at the commencement of the American
revolution
,
lawyers were the first to give the alarm and
assert the rights of the people. Shall we forget the
recent services of lawyers in the framing the
federal
,
and state constitutions? The name of lawyer
ought not to be hunted down, because there are
characters
,
unworthy of the profession, with whom the
love of money is inordinate, and insatiable.
There is ground, for the regret, that literary
institutions
are not favoured; that it has become a
popular thing to call out against learning, as not
necessary
to make republicans. The knowledge of our
rights, and capacity to prosecute, and defend them,
does not spring from the ground; but from
education
,
and study. Under a federal government; we are
peculiarly situated. We stand in need of law,
learning
,
and legal abilities to support ourselves in a
contest
with the claims of the general government, which,
as it bounds the state jurisdiction, must in the nature
of things encroach upon it. It is of great moment,
with a view to this very object that our judiciary be
composed of able men, that under the concurrent
jurisdiction of the courts, it may be able to hold its
own; or more especially, that from a want of
confidence
in the abilities of the state judges, recurrence
may not be had to the tribunals of the United States,
by legitimate election; or by those collusions against
which it is difficult to guard.
K 2
CHAP. XVII.
The
rumour had prevailed, that the judges had
been broke.
Is it upon the wheel? Said a learned man; for
he did not think it could be with the bow-string that
they had been punished; for that is the mode
towards
public officers, in the dominions of the Grand
Seignior; nor did he think it could have been with
the knout or bastinado; as that is usual only in
Russia, and makes a part of the penal code, at the
discretion of the Czar.
Not upon the wheel, said a by-stander; they are
not broke in that sense of the word. It is but a
removal
from office, that is intended by the word,
broke; and not the breaking of the back, or the limbs,
or any part of the body.
Why break them? Said the learned man, even
in that sense of the word. That is remove.
Because they gave a wrong judgment, said the
by-stander.
There could na be a better reason, said a Scotch
gentleman; it is contrary to the very end o' their
creation.
Why not reverse their judgment? Said the
scholar.
Because it is better to reverse themselves, said
the Scotch gentleman; and let them and their
judgment
a' go thegether.
At saying this, a person came in who gave
intelligence
,
that the 4th of July being about to be
celebrated
the people had made choice of Teague
O'Regan
,
the Captains man, to deliver an oration, on this,
the anniversary of our independence, and to draw up
the toasts.
Will absurdities never cease? Said the Captain,
in a free government. My bog-trotter chosen to
deliver
an harangue, in commemoration of the men,
and measures, of our great national contest! It is for
the celebration of the festival. Astonishing!
Teague, said he, I could have put up with the
great variety of functions to which you have been
proposed; or have proposed yourself; even that of a
judge of the courts of law; as being matters of a
mere secular nature, and forensic concern; but to
be the organ of the celebration of a festival, which
has become in a manner sacred, by the cause to
which it is consecrated, is beyond all endurance; and
as to the drawing up toasts, or sentiments for the
day, you are incompetent. You may be equal to the
fabrication of a common place allusion to the
prevailing
cry, and make it the voice of the occasion, as
for instance, to give a slap at the judges.
But as to hiting off thoughts on the principles of
government; or practical application in the measures
of the administration, you are unequal to the task.
With regard to Teague himself, he had as little
thought of delivering an oration, or drawing up
toasts as any one else could have. The apothecary
who meant to sell medicines on that day, on a stage,
had employed him to act in the capacity of tumbler;
not that he could tumble; but that he could not
tumble
;
and so, by preposterous attempts at agility would
answer the purpose of moving laughter, and drawing
the attention of the multitude, who being collected
for that purpose, might be drawn into another, the
purchase of worm powders, lozenges, and usual
drugs.
The celebration of our national anniversary, will
no doubt, be continued while the union of these states
exists. It may be continued by the parts probably
after a dis-union; an event certain, and inevitable;
but which, the wise and the good delight to
contemplate
as remote; and not likely to happen for
innumerable
ages. The orations delivered on this day, may
greatly contribute to postpone the event of a
dis-union
,
by patriotic, and conciliatory sentiments. For
this reason, the best abilities, and the most virtuous
hearts ought to be chosen to be the orators of the
occasion
.
But the toasts, or sentiments given on the
convivial
libations; not in honour of imaginary deities,
as amongst the Greeks and Romans; but in honour
of deceased heroes, who have passed from a scene
where they were mixed with us, and to a scene,
where we shall be mixed with them; these expressions
of the public mind, ought to be the peculiar care of
the aged and the wise. They ought to be the
lectures
of wisdom. Taking up the matter in this point
of view, what delicacy ought to be attached to the
expression
of sentiment. Let it be considered that on
a single thought may depend the essence of liberty:
health or poison may be communicated by a word.
For the toasts of this day are considered as
indications
of the public will
, and yet without a due sense of the
solemn obligations of honour and honesty, toasts are
brought forward, perhaps by an individual, in
accommodation
to a local prejudice, and merely to
accomplish
the purpose of an election to a public body. For
the fact is, that toasts are not always real expressions of
the sentiments of even a majority of those who suffer
them to pass; they are introduced by the mistake of
those, who substitute the sentiments of the
uniformed
for that of the whole community. But all that is
illiberal, on these occasions, ought to be avoided. All
inhumanity, and injustice. All anticipation of
judgment
on cases depending; all expressions calculated
to inflame the decision. For a popular clamour once
raised is difficult to be resisted.
Democracy has its strength in strict integrity; in
perfect delicacy; in elevation and dignity of mind. It
is an unjust imputation, that it is rude in manners,
and coarse in expression. This is the characteristic
of slaves, in a despotism; not of democrats in a
republic
.
Democracy embraces the idea of a standing on
virtue alone; unaided by wealth or the power of
family. This makes the noble of nature of whom
Thomas Payne speaks. Shall this noble not know his
nobility, and be behind the noble of aristocracy who
piques himself upon his honour, and feels a stain upon
his delicacy as he would a bodily wound? The
democrat
is the true chevalier, who, though he wears not
crosses, or the emblazoned arms of heraldry, yet is
ready to do right, and justice to every one. All
others are imposters, and do not belong to the order
of democracy. Many of these there are no doubt; false
brethern; but shall the democrat complain of
usurpation
;
of undue influence; or oppression and tyranny
from ambitious persons; and not be jealous, at the
same time of
democratic tyranny
in himself, which
is the more pernicious, as it brings a slur upon the
purest principles?
BOOK II.
It
has been asked, why, in writing this memoir;
have I taken my clown,
from the Irish ration?
The
character of the English clown, I did not well
understand
;
nor could I imitate the manner of speaking.
That of the Scotch I have tried, as may be seen, in
the character of Duncan. But I found it, in my
hands, rather insipid. The character of the Irish
clown, to use the language of Rousseau, has more
stuff in it. He will attempt any thing.
The American has in fact, yet, no character;
neither the clown, nor the gentleman. So that I
could not take one from our own country; which I
would much rather have done, as the scene lay here.
But the midland states of America, and the western
parts in general, being half Ireland, the character of
the Irish clown, will not be wholly misunderstood.
It is true the clown is taken from the aboriginal
Irish; a character no so well known in the North of
that country; nevertheless, it is still so much known,
even there, and amongst the emigrants here, or their
descendants, that it will not be wholly thrown away.
On the Irish stage, it is a standing character;
and on the theatre in Britain, it is also introduced. I
have not been able to do it justice, being but half an
Irishman, myself, and not so well acquainted with
the reversions, and idiom, of the genuine Thady, as
I could wish. However, the imitation at a distance
from the original, will better pass than if it had been
written, and read, nearer home. Foreigners will not
so readily distinguish the incongruities; or, as it is
the best we can produce for the present, will more
indulgently consider them.
I think it the duty of every man who possesses
a faculty, and perhaps a facility of drawing such
images, as will amuse his neighbour, to lend a hand,
and do something. Have those authors done
nothing for the world, whose works would seem
to have had no other object but to amuse? In
low health; after the fatigue of great mental
exertion
on solid disquisitions; in pain of mind,
from disappointed passions; or broken with the
sensibilities of sympathy, and affection; it is a
relief to try not to think; and this is attainable, in
some degree; by light reading. Under sensations
of this kind, I have had recourse more than once to
Don Quixotte; which doubtless contains a great deal
of excellent moral sentiment. But, at the same
time, has much, that can serve only to amuse. Even
in health, and with a flow of spirits, from prosperous
affairs, it diversifies enjoyments, and adds to that
happiness of which the mind is capable. I trust
therefore, that the gravest persons, will not be of
opinion that I ought to be put out of the church, for
L
any appearance of levity, which this work may seem
to carry with it.
I know there have been instances, amongst the
Puritans
of clergymen, degraded for singing a Scotch
pastoral. But music is a carnal thing compared with
puting thoughts upon paper. It requires an opening
of the mouth, and a rolling of the tongue, whereas
thought is wholly spiritual, and depends, not on any
modification of the corporeal organs. Music,
however
,
even by the strictest sects, is admissable in
sacred harmony, which is an acknowledgement, that
even sound, has its uses to soothe the mind or to fit
it for contemplation.
I would ask, which is the most entertaining work,
Smolet's History of England; or his Humphrey
Clinker
?
For, as to the utility, so far as that depends upon
truth, they are both alike. History has been well
said to be
the Romance of the human mind; and Romance
the history of the heart
. When the son of Robert
Walpole asked his father, whether he should read to
him out of a book of history; he said;
he was not
found of Romance
. This minister had been long
engaged
in affairs; and from what he had seen of accounts of
things within his own knowledge he had little
confidence
in the relation of things which he had not seen.
Except memoirs of person's own times, biographical
sketches by cotemporary writers; Voyages, and
Travels, that have geographical exactness, there
is little of the historial kind, in point of truth, before
Roderick Random; or Gil Blass.
The Eastern nations in their tales, pretend to
nothing but fiction. Nor is the story with them,
the less amusing because it is not
true
. Nor is the
moral of it less impressive, because the actors never
had existence. This, I have thought it sufficient to
say, by way of introduction in this place.
CHAP. I.
If
the memoir of the bog-trotter had not advanced
the authour to a professors chair; it had, at least,
procured
him admission to a number of learned societies;
abroad and at home: should a new edition of the
work come to be published, it will take up, at least,
two quarto pages, to contain the names of these,
member-ships, and honours.
But, notwithstanding the most pressing
solicitations
,
he could not be brought to accept of an
introduction
to
the St. Tammany Society;
owing to the impression
which he still retained of being an Indian chief, from
which he had a narrow escape in the early part of
this work. For unfortunately, it had been explained
to him, that St. Tammany was an Indian Saint; and
that the Society
met in a wigwam, and exchanged belts
.
They offered to make him a Sachem; but all to no
purpose; the ida of scalping, and tomhacking
hung still upon his mind. It was, by compulsion, in
France, that he took upon him the character of an
Esquimaux, in the procession of Anacharsis Clootz.
The Captain presented himself to the Society,
explaining
these things; and that, in fact, such had been
the alarm of the authour of the memoir, at the
proposition
of being made a member, that he had
absconded
a day or two before. The Society took his excuse;
and made the Captain, an honorary member in his
place.
This, was no object with the Captain, as he was
a candidate for no office; and could draw no
advantage
from a promiscuous association. Nor did
he see that he could be of any use to mankind in
this new capacity, as the propagation of the gospel in
foreign parts, or amongst the savages, made no part
of the duty. For though
Tammany
himself may have
been a Saint, there are few of his disciples that can
pretend to sanctity, superior to common christians.
Or, at least, their piety consists more in contemplation,
than in active charity, and practice. We hear of no
missionaries from them, amongst the aborigines of
the continent, as we should be led to expect from
being called the St. Tammany Society. For it is to be
presumed, that this Saint had been advanced into the
calender from the propagation of the christian faith,
as was St. Patrick; St. Andrew, and others. And
though, as these old Societies, with that of St. George,
St. David, &c. the duty of evangelists may be excused,
the countries to which they belong, being long since
christianized; yet the native Americans which St.
Tammany represents, are whole nations of them
infidels
.
The sons of St. Tammany ought certainly to think a
little
of their brothers that are yet in blindness, and lend
a hand to bring them to light. It is not understood,
that even a
talk
has been held with a single nation of
our Western Tribes; though it could have cost but a
few blankets, and a keg of rum to bring them together;
and in council a little wampum, and killikaneeque.
But our modern churches, have not the zeal of
the primitive: or that zeal is directed to a different
object,
the building up the faith at home;
and that in
L 2
civil affairs, more than spiritual, doctrines. It is not
the time now to go about in sheepskins, and goat
skins, to convert the heathen, to the gospel; but
the citizens to vote for this or that candidate. The
Cincinnati being a mere secular Society
, is excusable;
but the
Saint Societies
, would seem in this, to depart
from the etimology of their denomination. I know
that some remark on the word Cincinnatus; and
think that it ought to be pronounced as well as spelled,
St. Cinnatus; and in that case all would be on a
footing
.
I have no objection, provided
that it makes no
schism;
for even the alteration of a name might
make a schism. And a schism in a
Society militant
,
such as this is, might occasion a war of swords; and
not a war of words only. I will acknowledge that I
would like to have the thing uniform,
St. Cinnatus
,
with the rest. So that if it could be brought about
without controversy, it would contribute to the unity
of designation. But controversy, is, above all things
to be avoided. And nothing is more apt to
engender
,
controversy, than small matters. Because, small
things are more easily lost than great. Or; because
it vexes a man more, to find his adversary boggle at
a trifling matter of orthodoxy when he has swallowed
the great articles of credence, than to have to pull
him up, a cables length, to some broad notion, that
separates opinion, and belief. To apply it to the
matter
of the spelling; qui heret in litera, heret in
cortice
That is, to give it in English, it may depend
upon a single letter how to draw
the cork
. All
consideration
therefore ought to be sacrificed to good
humour, and conviviality, and I would rather let the
heathen
name remain, than christian it at the expence
of harmony, and concord. But to return from this
digression, to the St. Tammany Society, of which I was
speaking, and which had some time ago convened.
It was a new thing to the Captain, to take a seat
in the wigwam, and to smoke the calumet of peace.
But he was disappointed in his expectations, of seeing
Indian manners, and customs introduced, and made
a part of the ceremony. There was some talk of
brightening
the chain, and
burying the hatchet;
but he
saw
no war-dance
. What is more, even the young
warriors were destitute of the Indian dress. There
was not a moccasin to be seen on the foot of any of
them; not a breech-clout; nor had they even the
natural; or rather, native brands and marks, of a true
born Indian. No ear cut in ringlets; no broach in
the nose; or tatooing on the breast. All was as
smooth, and undisfigured, as the anglo Americans
that inhabit our towns, and villages.
The Grand Sachem, made a speech to the
Captain
,
not in Indian; but in German; which answered
the end as well; for he did not understand it. But
it was interpreted, and related to the proposition
of making him a Chief, which he declined, professing
that it was more his wish to remain a common
Indian
,
than to be made even a half-king,
[1]
[1]
A
half-king,
means double king, or king of two
nations, who have him split between them
.
not having
it in view to remain much in the nation; or attend
the council fires a great deal. He contented himself
with puting some queries, relative to the History of
St. Tammany; of what nation he was? Did he belong
to the North, or the South? The East, or the West?
On what waters did he make his camp? How many
moons ago, did he live? Where did he hunt? Who
converted him; or whom did he convert? Why take
an Indian for the tutelary saint of the whites? Why
not Columbus; or Cabot? Where did this saintship
originate?
To these queries, the Chiefs could give no
answer
;
nor is it of much moment whether they could
or not. Some of them are not worth answering.
OBSERVATIONS.
Among
the Romans, there was a kind creature,
of the name of Appolo, who stood by people, and
when they were doing wrong, would give them a
twitch of the ear, to bid them stop.
Aurum velluit.
I cannot say, that I felt just such a twitch while
I was writing the last Chapter; unless figuratively;
meaning some little twitch of the mind, recollecting,
and reflecting, that it might possibly give offence to
public bodies, and Societies, especially, the St.
Tammany
;
and Cincinnati; though
none was intended
.
But it is impossible to anticipate in all cases, the
sensations
of others. Things will give offence, that
were meant to
inform, and assist
; or to please and
divert. In the case of public bodies especially, no
man knows, what may make an unfavourable
impression
.
It is necessary; or, unavoidable as it might
be translated; that offences come;
but woe to him
by whom they come
. One would think that, in a free
country, there might be some little more moderation
with regard to what is done, and said. It is a
maxim
in law, that words are to be construed, mitiore
sensu; or, in the milder sense. It is a Scriptural
definition of charity, that it is not easily provoked.
Whereas, on the contrary an uncharitable
disposition
,
is ready to misconstrue, and convert to an offence.
A town, a society, a public body, of any kind might
be presumed to bear more than an individual,
because
,
the offence being divided amongst a greater
number; it can be but a little, that will be at the
expense of any one person. If therefore, any son of
St. Tammany, or St. Cinnatus, should feel himself
hurt, by our lucubration, let him consider that it is
better to laugh than be angry; and he will save
himself
,
if he begins to laugh first. Though, after all,
some will say, there is nothing to laugh at; and in
this, they will be right. For at the most, it can
only be
a smile
. It is a characteristic of the Comedy
of Terence; that he never forces your laugh; but
to smile only. That I take to be the criterion of a
delicate and refined wit; and which was becoming
the lepos, or humour of such men, as Lelius and
Scipio, who are thought to have formed his taste,
and assisted him in his Dramatic compositions. Yet
I must confess, if I could reach it, I would like the
broad laugh; but it is difficult to effect this, and, not,
at the same time, fall into buffoonery, and low
humour
.
Laughing is certainly favourable to the lungs;
and happy the man, whose imagination leads him to
risible sensations, rather than to melancholy.
All work, and no play, makes Jack a dull boy. But
I have no idea of laughing, any more than of playing,
without having performed the necessary task of duty,
or labour. An idle laughing fool, is contemptible and
odious; and laughing too much is an extreme, which
the wise will avoid. Take care not to laugh, when
there is nothing to laugh at. I can always know a mans
sense, by his song, his story, or his laugh. I will not
say his temper; or principles; but certainly his
share of understanding. The truth is, this
composition
has more for its object than merely to amuse
though that is an object. But I doubt whether we
shall receive credit for our good intentions. For
truth lies in a well; and unless there is some one to
draw the bucket, there is no geting it up.
We have been often asked for a key to this work.
Every man of sense has the key in his own pocket.
His own feelings; his own experience is the key.
It is astonishing, with what avidity, we look for the
application of satire which is general, and never had
a prototype. But the fact is, that, in this work, the
picture is taken from human nature, generally, and
has no individual in view. It was never meant as a
satire upon men; but upon things. An easy way,
to slur sentiments, under the guise of allegory; which
could not otherwise make their way to the ears of the
curious. Can any man, suppose, upon reflection, that
if ridicule was intended upon real persons, it would
be conveyed in so bungling a manner that people
would be at a loss to know, who was meant? That
is not the way, we fix our fools caps.
Let any man put it to himself, and say, would he
wish to be of those that give pain by personal
allusion
,
and abuse. Self-love, for a moment may relish
the stricture; but could never endure to be thought
the authour. In attacking reputation, there are two
things to be considered, the manner, and the object.
When the object is praise-worthy, there is an
openness
,
a frankness, snd manliness of manner, which
commands respect. But even where the object is a
public good, the manner may excite contempt. Let
our editors of news-papers, look to this, those of them
who wish to be considered gentlemen; such as have
no character to lose, and never wish to have any,
may take all liberties, and occupy their own grade.
But as we were saying, public bodies, and societies
of men, ought not to take offence easily; nor
resent
violently. As they are strong, be merciful.
A single person is not on a footing with a great
number
.
He cannot withstand the whole, if they should
take offence without reason; and he may be
consciously
scrupulous of fighting; or may be afraid to
fight; which will answer the end just as well; or
he may have the good sense and fortitude, to
declare
off; which by the bye requires more courage,
than the bulk of men possess
. It requires a courage
above all false opinion;
and the custom will never
be put out of countenance, until some brave men
set the example. There is nothing that a wise man
need fear, but
dishonour
, founded on the charge
of a
want of virtue;
on that
which all men, of all places,
and of all times, will acknowledge to be disreputable
.
Under this head, will not be found the refusal of a
challenge.
Nothing can be great, the contempt of
which, is great
. Is it not great to despise prejudice,
and false opinion? He that ruleth his spirit, is
greater than he that taketh a city: but, he that is
above the false sentiments of others, presents to me
the image of a superior power, that ascends through
the vapours, of the atmosphere and dissipates the
fog. The world is indebted to the man that refuses
a challenge;
but who can owe any thing to him that
accepts it; for he sanctions an unjust law?
Doubtless,
the accepting of a challenge, is pardonable
as a
weakness;
but still it is a weakness. The man is a
hero, who can withstand unjust opinion. It requires
more courage, than to fight duels. To sustain life,
under certain circumstances, calls for more
resolution
than to
commit suicide
. Yet suicide is not
reputable
Brutus in the schools condemned it; but
at Philippi, adopted it. Because his courage
failed
him.
But cudgelling follows the refusal of a challenge.
Not if there is instant notice given to a peace officer.
But posting follows. Notice of that may be given also,
and a court, and jury brought to criticize upon the
libel.
Why is it, that a public body, is more apt to
take offence, than an individual? Because, every one
becomes of consequence
in proportion, as he is careful
of the honour of the whole
. It is oftentimes, a mere
matter of accident, whether the thing is well, or ill
taken. If one should happen to call
out, that it is an
insult
, another is unwilling to question it, lest he
should be suspected of
incivism
, and lose his
standing
in Society in general; or, in that to which he
more particulary belongs. The
misconception
of one
forces itself upon another; and
misconstruction
prevails
.
That which was the strongest proof of
confidence
in the
integrity, and justice of the body
, is
viewed
as distrust; and a concern for their honour,
considered
a
reproach
. The most respectful language
termed
insolence
. Implicit submission attributed to
M
disrespect. Self-denial
overlooked, and
wantoness of
insult
substituted in its place. This, all the offspring
of
mistake
; which
it is the duty of the individual to
remove
. But how can he speak
if his head is off,
before he knows, that the offence is taken?
Protesting
therefore that I mean no offence to either of these
Societies, or the individual members, in any thing I
have said; I request them to take it in good part;
or, if there should seem to be ground of affront, they
will give me a hearing, and an opportunity to
explain
.
There is no anticipating absolutely, and to all
extent
,
what a person might say for himself if he was
heard. That presumption which had existed might
be removed. His motives might appear laudable;
or at the worst, originating in a pardonable weakness.
Whether or not, the credit of the tribunal with
the world, might render it expedient to observe
these appearances. They did it in France under the
revolutionary government; and even the Emperor,
seems to consider it as indispensible
. If therefore any
thing in these Chapters should unfortunately give
umbrage to the sons of St. Tammany, or to the
Cincinnati
members, I pray
a citation
, and
demand a
hearing
. I trust I shall be able to convince them
that I am not deficient in respect for them
individually
,
or as public bodies.
CHAP. II.
The
Captain walking by himself, could not avoid
reflecting on the nature of government; a union of
souls, and corporal force. It makes all the difference
that we see between the savage, and civilized life.
The plough, the pully, the anchor, and the potters
wheel, are the offspring of government; the loom,
the anvil, and the press. But how difficult to link
man with man; how difficult to preserve a free
government
!
The easient thing in the world, says the
clown,
if the sage will only let it alone
. It is the
philosopher
that ruins all.
There is some foundation for this. A mere
philosopher
is but a fool, in matters of business. Even
in speculation, be sometimes, imagines nonsense.
Sir Thomas More's Utopia has become proverbial;
Harrington's Oceana has become a model for no
government
.
Lock's Project was tried in South
Carolina
It was found wanting. Imagination, and
experiment
are distinct things. There is such a thing
as
practical sense
. Do we not see instances of this
every day? Men who can talk freely, but do nothing.
They fail in every thing they attempt. There is too
much vision mixed with the fact. Want of
information
of what has been; the not examining the
fitness
and congruity of things, leads to this. You see
a tradesman framing a machine. A chip less, or
more spoils the joint.
Where is the best account to be found of the
Roman
commonwealth? In Polibyus. In what did its
excellence consist? In its balances. What invented
these? The exigencies of the case. Some were
adopted in the first instance; others as remedies to
the mischiefs that occured. Were the sages of any
use here? A little. Salust says; considering the
history of the Roman people, that the Galls, were
before them in bravery, and the Greeks in eloquence;
yet Rome, has become the mistress of the world;
I have found that it has been owing to a few great
men that happened to arise in it. Were these
men demagogues? Not in a bad sense of the word.
They did not deceive the people for their own ends.
How do demagogues deceive people? How do you
catch a nag? You hold a bridle, in your left hand,
behind your back; and a hat in your right, as if
there were something in it, and cry cope. What do
demagogues want by deceiving the people? To ride
them. What do they pretend they have in the hat?
oats, salt; any thing they find a horse likes.
How do you distinguish the demagogue from the
patriot? The demagogue flatters the clown, and finds
fault with the sage. The patriot, and the sage,
unless
you mean the vain philosopher, mean the same
thing. The Jewish prophets were all of them sages.
They were seers, or
men that saw far into things
.
You will find they were no slouches at blaming the
people. My people Israel is destroyed for lack of
knowledge.
I am wounded
in the house of my
friends.
This may be said of liberty, when
republicans
give it a stab
. The lamentations of Jeremiah
are but the weepings of a patriot over the errors of
the people. Yet the people are always right, say the
demagogues. I doubt that.
Tom fool
, may laugh
at the expression, save the people from
themselves
.
Nevertheless, there is something in it. It
is a Scripture phrase, go not with a multitude to
do evil; which would seem to imply that the
multitude
will sometimes do wrong.
Do the multitude invent arts? Or some
individuals
among them? It is sometimes a matter of
accident
Sometimes a matter of genius. But it is
but one out of a thousand that happens to hit upon
it; or that has the invention to contrive. But
government
is an easy matter;
and has no wheels like a
watch
. What is it that enables one man to see
farther
into things than another in matters of
government
What is it that makes him a seer?
Thinking
,
looking, examining. Does it come by
inspiration
More by experience. What are the wheels
in our government that are like to go first?
The
Judiciary, the Senate, the Governor
. Is this the order
in which they will go? Precisely. Does any man
mean it? Not at all. How can it then happen? In
the natural progress of things. Will one house
become
a tyrant? It will come to be the few; and the
few were always tyrants. Will it be but a few in
the house, that will govern? It will come to one at
last. It will take fifty years to bring it to this. I
do not say that it will be a hop, step, and jump; or
a running leap, all at once.
But we have the press here. Suppose a leading
print in the hands of a patriot. He will keep all
M 2
right. Yes, provided he is a sage at the same time.
That is, that his information on the nature of
government
,
is equal to his patriotism; or that his passion
does not betray him into error; the journal of L.
Ami du peuple by Marat, was patriotic; but it
ruined
the republic. An uninformed inflammatory print,
is a corruptress of public opinion. It is the torch
that sets Troy on fire. There is no Marat, amongst
us, at the head of a Journal; but there may come to
be. It is a difficult thing to trim the state vessel.
The altering the stowage will put out of trim. The
Hancock was taken, by altering the stowage. It
destroyed
the trim. Yet trimmers are unfavourably
spoken of. That is, I presume, halting between two
opinions. Why halt ye between two opinions?
But preservers of the balance are not trimmers in
this sense of the word.
But how is it that the people can do wrong, when
they mean well?
An uninformed spirit of reform
may
prevail. How can passion prevail? The axletree is
heated, by the
nave
, and the hob is set on fire. The
nave heats itself by its own motion; and fire is
communicated to the whole carriage.
CHAP. III.
This
was the day of the fair held twice a year in
the village. The people had come in and erected
booths. The Captain took a walk to see the fair,
and on the first stall he saw boxes. What are these,
said the Captain? Cases for lawyers, said the
Chapman
.
What will the lawyers do with these, said the
Captain? Put them on their back-sides, said the
Chapman. That will make them look like soldiers,
with cartouch boxes, said the Captain. No matter
for that, said the Chapman. A lawyer can no more
move without
cases
, than a snail without a shell.
They must have
authorities
.
They have too many sometimes, said the
Captain
,
as I have heard the blind lawyer say; but your
cases, or cartouch boxes, I presume, are meant as
a burlesque. Not altogether, so, said the Chapman;
but a little bordering on it. These boxes might
answer
the purpose, of carrying cases, to the court;
But an honest man might put them to a better use:
so I say no more, but sell my wares to the customer.
At the next stall was Tom the Tinker, with old
kettles mended, and new ones for sale. Ay, Tom,
said the Captain, this is better than resisting laws;
[2]
[2]
The chief of the insurrection, in the western parts
of Pennsylvania, in the year
1794,
called himself
,
Tom the Tinker.
even the
excise
law.
I have found out a better way than resisting laws,
now, said the Tinker.
What is that, said the Captain?
Abolish the courts, and demolish the judges, and
the laws will go of themselves.
Ah! Tom, said the Captain, leave the public
functionaries, to the public bodies; you have nothing
to do with them.
But I should have something to do with them,
said the Tinker, if I had a voice in a public body.
But you have not a voice, said the Captain.
But I may have, said the Tinker.
I would rather hear your voice in your shop,
said the Captain; and the sound of your hammer,
on a coffee pot, or a tea kettle. You can patch a
brass candle-stick, better than the state, yet, I take
it, Tom.
Or solder spoons either, said Tom;
but every
thing must have a beginning
.
At the next stall was a hard-ware man; In
the next, a Potter with his jugs. Anacharsis,
according to Diogenes Lacrtius, invented the anchor,
and the Potters wheel; he was a more useful man
than him that invented fire-arms; though it is a
question
with some, whether gunpowder has not rendered
war less sanguinary.
A Toyman had his stall next. As the Captain was
looking at his baubles, an accident happened on the
other side the way. At a short turn, a cart had overset.
It was light, and loaded with empty kegs.
Nevertheless
the driver wanted help to lift it up.
The Chapman, the Toyman, the Potter, the
hard-ware
man, and Tom the Tinker were endeavouring to
assist. The Tinker and the hard-ware man, had set
their shoulders, to the cart. They hove it up; but,
by too violent a push threw it to the other side. The
Chapman, and Toyman, thought to set the matter
right, and in the adverse direction, applyed their
force, being on the other side the cart; and to do
them justice, gave a good hoist; but over-did the
matter, as much as was done before; for the cart
came back and lay prostrate in the same direction,
as at first.
The driver, in the mean time, was dissatisfied.
Gentlemen, said he, do you mean to assist, or to
injure
me? It may be sport to you; but it is a loss
to me, to have my cart broke, and my kegs staved.
it is all wrong, said the Captain. Why not let the
thing stand upon
the horizontal?
None of your tricks
upon travellers. Let the poor man's cart have fair
play, and stand upon
its own bottom
.
Aye, aye, said a misanthrope; this comes of bad
doings. You must be going to the woods; and
disturbing
innocent forests; cuting down young trees;
making staves, and hooping kegs. This is just the
way they make laws; to hoop people as you would
a barrel. It is right to overturn the cart, on account
of the manufacture it carries.
Ah; it is in this manner, said
a moral drawing
man;
that people over-turn the state. If the vehicle
goes to the one side, it is the act of a patriot to set
it right. But unskillul persons, pass the line of
gravity
;
so that as much mischief arises, from too
much force as too little. Passing the line of
gravitation
,
in erecting a body, is like
wounding a
principle
of the Constitution
. All errors of
expediency
may
be amended; but the violations of
principle
are vital,
and terminate in death. Put that fellow in a pulpit,
and he could preach, said a by-stander; do you hear
what a sermon, he makes upon a cart? He could
take a text; Nebuchadnezzar, or Zerubabel; and
lengthen out a discourse for a fortnight.
In the meantime, the Captain, was almost
carried
off his feet, by a croud of people going to see
the learned pig. Has he the
tongues
, said Angus
Sutherland, a Scotchman? He has two, said a wag.
The Hebrew, and the Erse, I trow, said the
Scotchman
.
No; the
squcel, and the gruntle
, I ween, said
the drolling person. That is his
vernacular
, said
the Scotchman; but I mean his acquired languages.
I do not know that he has acquired any, said the
drolling man; but he is considerably perfected in
those that he had before.
Weel, that is something, said Angus; but he
has got a smack o' the mathematics, I suppose. A
little of Algebra, said the wag; the plus, and
minus, he understands pretty well.
The conversation, was interrupted by the
vociferation
of a man, in soliquy at a distance. He
appeared
to be in great agitation: clinching his fists,
and striking them against each other. An
abominable
,
stander, said he; I a scholar! I a learned man!
it is a falshood. See me reading! He never saw me
read. I do not know a B. from a bulls foot. But this
is the way to injure a man in his election. They
report of me that I am a scholar! It is a malicious
fabrication. I can prove it false. It is a groundless
insinuation. What a wicked world is this in which
we live. I a scholar! I am a son of a whore, if I ever
opened a book in my life. O! The calumny; the
malice of the report. All to destroy my election.
Were you not seen carrying books, said a
neighbour
?
Aye, said the distressed man; two books that a
student had borrowed from a clergyman. But did I
look into them? Did any man see me open the books?
I will be sworn upon the evangelists: I will take my
Bible oath, I never looked into them. I am innocent
of letters as the child unborn. I am an illiterate man,
God be praised, and free from the sin of learning,
or any wicked art, as I hope to be saved; but here a
report is raised up, that I have dealings with books,
that I can read. O! The wickedness of this
world! Is there no protection from slander, and bad
report? God help me! Here I am,
an honest
republican
;
a good citizen
, and yet it is reported of me,
that I read books. O! The tongues of men! Who
can stop reproach? I am ruined; I am undone;
I shall loose my election; and the good will of all
my neighbours, and the confidence of posterity. It
is a dreadful thing that all the discretion of a man,
cannot save him from evil-speaking, and defamation.
It is a strange contrast, thought the Captain, that
we admire learning in a pig; and undervalue it in a
man
. The time was, when learning would save a
man's neck; but now it endangers it. The neck
verse, is reversed. That is, the effect of it. For
the man that can read goes to the wall; not him
that is ignorant. But
such are the revolutions of
opinion
.
Of all things in the world, said a speculative
philosopher
,
I should the least expect science in a pig;
though the swinish multitude are not without good
moral qualities; or the semblance of these, by
propensitive
instinct. The herd of deer avoid, or beat
off the chaced, or wounded companion; but attack a
hog in a gang, and the bristles of all are up, to make
battle. There is an esprit de corps; or a principle
of self-preservation. They do not wait until they are
taken off one by one; but make a common cause in
the first instance. When the 21 deputies in the
National
Assembly of France, were denounced, there
were, no doubt a great number that saw the
injustice;
but not the
consequence
. They were willing that the
bolt should pass by themselves, and were silent.
But those that followed, soon felt the case to be their
own, though they did not make it at first. The hogs
have more sense, or
nature is more faithful than
reason. A sailor on board a ship may not like his
comrades
;
but if they are charged with mutiny
wrongfully
he is interested and will see it if he is wise;
for it concerns him that they be dealt with fairly.
For injustice to them, leads to injustice to himself.
A third mate may dislike the first, or second
, or the
Captain, himself, and have no objection to change
them; but the mistake, or injustice of owners
towards
these, affects himself.
If one goes at
this turn; another may go at the next; until all fall
to unjust accusation
. If the
independence
, and safety
of command is affected, all officers suffer, and the
service is injured. The picking off one at a time is
politic in those that assail; but fatal to those that
are assailed.
Polyphemus devoured but one of the
soldiers
of Ulysses in a day
. So that it does not follow,
that hog, likes hog, more than sheep, likes sheep;
or
that bristle is champion for bristle; when he comes
to take his part; but
that,
the law of self-preservation,
is better understood; or felt by this animal
. But as
to teaching a pig any thing like human knowledge,
though not a new thing, would seem to be of little
use. Crows were taught to speak in the time of
Augustus Csar; as we find from the story of the
Cobler, and his crow. The Poet Virgil talks of
cattle
speaking;
Pecudesque locut.
But this was a prodigy. Learning must go
somewhere, as a river that sinks in one place
rises in another. If erudition is lost with men,
it is well to find it with pigs. The
extraordinaries
are always pleasing. The intermediate grades
of eloquence, from a Curran to a Parrot, are not worth
marking.
A little learning is a dangerous thing.
Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian spring.
If a man cannot be a Pollyglotist, he may as well
be a goose.
It was at a time things took this turn that
Balaam's
ass spoke. There was darkness all over
Europe
for six or ten centuries; and little knowledge of
the scientific kind to be found with man, fish, fowl
or beast. A glare of light sprung up, and has
prevailed
N
awhile. Men of science have been in repute
in monarchies; and in some republics: or at least
science itself has had some quarter. But it is now
scouted, and run down. The mild shade of the
evening
,
the crepusculum approaches. A twilight, that
the weakest eye can sustain. The bats will be out
now. The owl can see as well as the cat.
If there
is less light, there is more equality of vision;
which
may be for the best.
That fellow could preach too, said a by-stander;
and give him a text. What a speech he has made
upon a shoat!
But looking up, they saw a man actually
preaching
;
or something like it in a tavern door, with a
news-paper in his hand. It was upon the subject of
oeconomies
. For now all is
oeconomy
. Not making;
but
saving
. This discourse was a lecture, on the
subtraction
of aliment, and the making water go farther
by boiling it. Saving the scales of fish; and the
stem beaten out of flax; curtailing wages, and doing
less work; all things by the minimum: he would have
all Miscroscopes; no Telescopes. Minuti, Minuti,
Minuti; nothing great, comprehensive; or
magnificent
in his projects. Themistocles knew how to
make a great state, out of a small commonwealth.
But was it by saving, or by gaining that he did it?
Was the sweep of his mind contracted; or extensive?
Had the Zar of Muscovy a great heart? Did he
reduce
mountains by particles; or employ his mind
upon hen coops? These were questions, the
oeconomist
answered in the affirmative. But some doubted
the orthodoxy of the doctrine; and left the
congregation
.
In a public house, was heard the music of a fiddle,
and a bag-pipe. It was Duncan the quondam waiter
of the Captain who had made a match of the bag-pipe
against the violin. Play up, said Duncan to the piper;
now
the coming o' the Camrons;
now
the reels o'
bogie
. Play up; I could dance amaist involuntarily;
as, I were bit by the Tarantula.
The Latin master was of the company; and
encouraged
the contest, by the application of classic
phrases; such as,
Et vitula tu dignus, et hic
Boni quoniam cenvenimus ambo.
Tale tuum carmen, divine poeta.
But more noise; though, perhaps less music was
heard out of doors coming down the street. A croud
of people; boys and grown persons, were following
O'Dell the revolutionist. For Ca Ira, or the Marseilles
hymn, he bawl'd out the following
Down
with the sessions, and down with the laws;
They put me in mind of the school-master's taws.
There's nothing in nature that gives such disgust,
As force and compulsion to make a man just.
Hillelu; Billelu, set me down aisy.
Hillelu; Billelu, &c.
A lawyer's a liar; old Sooty his father;
He talks all day long, a mere jack-a-blather.
His books, and his papers may all go to hell,
And makes speeches there, sings Lary O'Dell.
Hillelu, &c.
The state is a vessel, and hoop'd like a tub;
And the adze of the cooper it goes dub, a dub.
But hooping and coopering, is fitting for fools;
Away wid all learning, and shut up the schools
.
Hillelu, &c.
A horse eats the less, when you cut off his tail;
And chickens hatch faster, the thinner the shell.
A clerk in an office might do two things in one,
Hatch eggs while he sits, and writes all alone.
Hillelu, &c.
The song may be good, as to music, said the
Captain
;
but I do not like the sentiments; especially
the concluding couplet. It seems to me, that oeconomy
has become
parsimony;
the opposite extreme of
prodigality
;
or extravagance. The one is odious; the
other
contemptible. All tax; or no tax. There is no
medium. And yet all that is excellent lies in the
medium
.
But
no tax, and oeconomy
will as certainly
destroy
an administration, as all tax, and extravagance.
The meanness of starving offices; establishments;
improvements
,
will attach disreputation to the agents; and
operate a removal from the body politic; or the
debilitation
of the body politic itself
. But in all things there
is a tendency to extremes. The popular mind does
not easily arrest itself when descending upon an
inclined
plain of opinion. Popular ballads are an index
of the public mind. Hence we see that an antipathy
to laws, lawyers, and judges, is the ton at present;
and also that
oeconomy is the ruling passion of the
time
. Yet in all these things, there may be an
excess
.
For the people are not always right
. Unless in
the sense of the English law, that The king can
do no wrong. Doubtless whatever the people do is
legally right; but yet not always politically right.
For do we not find from the voice of history, that
those men are thought to have deserved best of their
country, who have occasionally withstood the
intemperance
of opinion. Self seekers only are all things
to all men. Three things are necessary to
constitute
a great man. Judgment, fortitude, and
self-denial
It is a great thing to judge wisely. Perhaps
this may be said to comprehend the whole. For
judging wisely upon a large scale, will embrace
fortitude, and self-denial. Hence, in the Scripture
phrase, bad men are called
fools
. It is but cuting
down the fruit tree, to hark in with a popular cry
for the moment. All is gained for the present. But
there is nothing for the next year. Such a man may
get into a public body, but will not long retain his seat;
or, if he does, he loses all,
in the esteem of the
virtuous
,
and the wise
. But I doubt whether the people
are so mad for oeconomy.
It originates with those
who are conscious to themsetves that they cannot please
them by great actions; and therefore attempt it by
small
. The extreme has been that of unnecessary
expenditure; and it is popular to call out oeconomy;
which the people-pleaser gets into his mouth, and
makes it the shibboleth of just politics. But the
people-pleaser
is not always the friend of the people.
Do we find him in war the best general who consults the
ardour of his troops, wholly, and fights when they cry
out for battle?
Pompey yielded to such an outcry,
and lost the field of Pharsalia. A journal was
published
in France, by Marat, under the direction, or,
with the assistance of Robespiere, entitled
L' ami
N 2
du peuple
. There could not be a more seducing
title; and yet this very journal was the
foe of the
people
. I have no doubt, but that Marat meant well
to the poeple; but he had not an understanding
above the public, and judgment to correct the errors
of occasional opinion. He was of the multitude
himself
,
and did not overtop them
by having higher
ground from whence to observe. He had not been a
sage before he became a journalist
. Hence he
denounced
the Girondists the philosophers of the
republic
Condorcet, and others who had laid the
foundation
of the revolution. He denounced them
because
they suggested a confederate republic, such as
Montesquicu projected, and America has realized.
Marat took up with the simple,
the one and
indivisible
;
the populace understood this, but not the
complication
and it prevailed; but the republic went
down.
OBSERVATIONS.
I never had a doubt with the Captain, but that
the bulk of the jacobins in France meant well; even
Marat and Robespierre considered themselves as
denouncing
,
and trucidating only the enemies of the
republic. What a delightful trait of virtue discovers
itself in the behaviour of Peregrine, the brother of
Robespierre, and proves that he thought his brother
innocent.
I am innocent; and my brother is as
innocent as I am
. Doubtless they were both
innocent
.
Innocent of what? Why; of meaning ill.
The time shall come, when they that kill you,
shall think they are doing God service.
Peregrine
,
led the column with his drawn sword in
his hand, that entered and re-took Toulon. He threw
himself into the denounciation. This ought to be a
lesson to all republicans to have charity, for those
that differ in opinion. Tiberus, and Caius Gracchus
at Rome meant well; Agis, and Cleomines at
Sparta
the same; but they attempted a reform, well, in
vision, and imagination; but beyond what was
practicable
or expedient. They fell victims to the not
distinguishing the times; the advanced state of
society
,
which did not comport
with the original
simplicity
of institutions
.
Marat the journalist and Robespierre were pushed
gradually to blood; by the principle, which governed
them, of taking it for granted that all who thought
differently upon a subject were traitors; and that
a
majority of vote was the criterion of being right
. The
mountain
, the bulk of the national assembly, could not
but be in their opinion, infallible.
The eternal mountain
at whose foot every one was disposed to place himself;
the mountain on whose top were thunders and
lightnings
,
and a thick cloud; but not a natural
mountain
of the earth, collecting refreshing showers, and
from which descended streams. It was a mountain
pregnant with subteranean fire. It burst, and exists
a volcano to this day.
So much for the majority of
a public body, being always right; and so much for a
journalist meaning well, and yet destroying the
republic
.
It is a truth in nature and a maxim in
philosophy
that from whence our greatest good springs,
our greatest evils arise. A journalist of spirit is a
desideratum in a revolution. But when the new
island
,
or continent is thrown up from the bottom of
the ocean; and the subterranean gass dissipated, why
seek for a convulsion? But rather leave nature to
renew
herself with forests, and rivers, and perennial
springs. But that activity which was useful in the
first effort, is unwilling to be checked in the
further
employment; and under the idea of a
progressing
reform
, turns upon the establishment which
it has produced, and intending good, does harm. The
men are denounced that mean as well as the
journalist
,
and perhaps understand the game better than
himself
though they differ in judgment on the move
.
In a revolution, every man thinks he has done all.
He knows only, or chiefly what he has done himself.
Hence he is intolerant of the opinions of others,
because
he is ignorant of the services which are a proof
of patriotism; and of the interest which is a pledge of
fidelity. Fresh hands especially, are apt to over-do
the matter, as I have seen at the building of a cabbin
in the western country. A strong man takes hold of
the end of a log, and he lifts faster than the other.
From the unskilfulness, and inequality of his exertions,
accidents happen. Prudent people do not like rash
hands. States have been best built up, by
the wise as
well as the honest
.
There are men that we dislike in office. All men
approved Marius, says the historian Salust, when he
began to proscribe, now and then, a bad man; but
they did not foresee what soon happened, that he did
not stop short, but went on to proscribe the good.
It is better to bear an
individual mischief than a
public
inconvenience
. This is a maxim of the common
law. That is, it is better to endure an evil in a
particular
case, than
to violate a general principle
. There
ought to be constitutional ground, and a just cause,
to remove the obnoxious. It will not do even in
Ireland to hang a man for stealing cloth,
because he
is a bad weaver
.
Where parties exist in a republic, that party will
predominate eventually which pursues justice. A
democratic party, will find its only security in this.
If these things are done in the green tree, what
shall be done in the dry. If democracy is not just,
what shall we expect from aristocracy, where the
pride of purse, and pride of family, raises the head;
swells the port; produces the strut, and all the
undervaluing
which
the few have for the many?
Aristocracy
which claims by hereditary right, the
honours
and emoluments of the commonwealth. Who
does not dislike the presumption of the purse
proud, and the pride of connections? And it is for
that reason that I wish my fellow democrats, my
brethren according to the flesh, to do right; to
shew their majesty, the nobility of their nature,
by
their discrimination, and their sense of justice
. For I
am a democrat,
if having no cousin, and no funds;
and only to rely on my personal services, can make me
one
. And I believe this is a pretty good pledge for
democracy in any man. Unless indeed, he should
become a tool to those that have cousins and funds;
and this he will not do if he has
pride
. He might
be made a despot, but this can only be by the
peoples
destroying the essence of liberty, by pushing it
to licentiousness. A despot is a spectre which rises
chiefly from the marsh
of licentiousness. It was the
jacobins made Bonaparte what he now is
.
CHAP. IV.
A cavalcade was coming by, and upon enquiry
it was found to be a croud of people with a lawyer
gaged. The notch
in his mouth was rather long; and
the poor man seemed to be in pain, by the extension
of his jaws. He could not speak; which was a great
privation
, it being his daily employment, and the
labour of his vocation. For the people thought he
spoke too much, or at least was tedious in his
speeches, and took up the time of the court, and
juries, unnecessarily. But this was a new way of
correcting amplification in an orator. It is true that
things strike more than words, and the soldier, in a
Roman assembly, who held up the stump of his arm
lost in battle, pleaded more effectually, for his brother,
the accused, than all the powers of eloquence. But
it was a wicked thing, and intirely, a la mob, to stretch
the jaws so immeasurably. But the people will have
their way; when they get a thing into their heads;
there is no stoping them; especially on a fair day,
such as this was. It is true the thing was illegal,
and he could have his action, but they took their
chance of that. The fact is, the tediousness of
lawyers
,
in their harangues, is beyond bearing, and
is enough to drive the people
to adjustment bills
, and
any thing, to get quit of them. The opener of a
cause, must lead you into the whole transaction,
instead
of leaving it to the evidence to do it. He must
give you a view of the whole scope of his case.
This might be in a few words. But he wants to
make a speech; a strong impression at the first. He
must tell you how he means to draw up his
evidence
;
how to fight his men
. I should not like my
adversary to know this; I would not tell the court,
lest he should hear it. What would we think of a
general who should mount the rostrum in the
presence
of the enemy, and explain the order of his
battle
I love the art of managing a cause for its own sake,
and I like to see it
scientifically won
. The less
speaking
,
almost always, the better for a cause. There
is such a thing, as darkning counsel by words
without
knowledge.
Atticism is favourable to perception
in the hearer
. We do not carry wheat to be ground
before it is sifted of the chaff. Yet there may be
an error on the other side. The declination to
brevity
may be too great. I am afraid to say much
on this head, lest I should be understood to
undervalue
eloquence, and check it altogether. But
certain
it is, that the excess is on the side of quantity,
in speaking at the bar at present. The juries feel
it, and twist, and turn themselves into all shapes to
avoid it. The courts feel it, and on many occasions,
groan for deliverance.
What necessity on a point of law to read all cases,
that have relation to the subject? To give a lecture on
the elementary principle, and adduce cases, from the
first decision to the last. It has been in vogue with
the clergy, to begin with Genesis, and end with
Revelations
;
to prove their doctrine as they go along, by
an enchainment of texts; and to say the same thing
over again, in many different words. But in
demonstrating
the 47th proposition of the first book of
Euclid
we do not lay down every postulate, and
axiom
;
nor do we go through the demonstration of
every preceding problem, on which this is built;
but we refer to such of them as enter into that which
is before us. The demonstrations of Euclid are brief;
and that constitutes their excellence. Ad eventum
festinat. Here is no detour; or winding that does not
accelerate, and force the conclusion.
In the mean time, the blind lawyer, being at hand
delivering a lecture, had heard of the tribulation of
his brother the gag'd lawyer; and for the honour of
the profession, stretching out his hands to the
people
,
had obtained his enlargement; and the
removal
of the peg. But it was said, this would be a
warning to the advocate, to shorten his speeches
for the future. The branks which had been upon
his head; that is, the woodys which had tyed the
knob, were laid aside for another occasion.
O
CHAP. V.
It
was a legal proceeding, in this village, that
when any one was suspected of insanity, a commission
of lunacy issued, and an enquiry was held to
ascertain
the fact. An inquisition was holden at this time
on the body of a man, and it was the right of the
defendant, when the evidence on the part of the
commonwealth
was closed, to be heard in his defence.
On this occasion the accused person made use of his
privilege.
THE MADMAN'S DEFENCE.
Fellow Citizens;
It is an aukward situation in which you see me
placed, to be obliged to maintain that I am in my
right mind
, and not out of my senses. For even if I
speak sense, you may attribute it to
a lucid interval
.
It is not a difficult matter, to fix any imputation upon
a man. It is only to follow it well up. Line upon
line; precept upon precept; here a little and there a
little. There is nothing but a man's own life, and
a course of conduct, that can rebut the calumny. It
is therefore in vain, to answer in gazettes, or to go
out into streets and call out
falsehood
. The more
pains you take to defend yourself, the more it is
fixed
upon you. For the bulk of mankind are on the
side of the calumniator, and would rather have a
thing true, than false. I believe there would be no
better
way, than for a man to join in, and slander himself,
until the weight of obloquy, became so great, that
the public would revolt, and from believing all, believe
nothing. I have known this tried with success. But
how can one rebut the imputation of madness? How
disprove insanity? The highest excellence of
understanding
,
and madness, like the two ends of a right
line, turned to a circle, are said to come together.
Nullum magnum ingenium sine mensura
dementi
.
Great wits to madness sure are near allied;
And this partitions do the bounds divide.
Hence you will infer that I may appear rational,
and quick of perception, and even just in judgment
for a time, and yet be of a deranged intellect. What
can I tell you, but that it is the malice of my
enemies
,
that have devised this reproach, in order to
binder my advancement in state affairs? It is true
there are some things in my habit, and manner that
may have given colour to the charge; singularities.
But a man of study, and abstract thought, will have
singularities
. Henry Fielding's Parson Adams; and
Doctor Orkborn in Mrs. D' Arbray's Cammilla, are
examples of this. A man of books will be abstrait,
or absent in conversation, and sometimes in business.
A man of books, said the Foreman of the Jury!
a scholar! Ah! You are a scholar, are you. Ah, ha;
that is enough; we want no more. If you are not
a madman, you must be a
knave
, and that comes to
the same thing. Say, gentlemen, shall we find him
guilty? What say you, is he mad?
1. Juryman; he seems to be a little
cracked
.
2. He does not appear to
be right in his head
.
3. I cannot think him in his
right mind
.
4. He is
beside himself
, doubtless.
5. Crazy.
6. Out of his reason.
7. Deranged.
8. Insane.
9. Mad.
10. Stark mad.
11. As mad as a March hare.
12. Fit for Bedlam.
Verdict,
Lunacy
.
The Court to whom the inquisition was returned,
thought it a hard case, as there was no other
evidence
than his own confession of being
addicted to
books
, and gave leave to move in arrest of judgment;
and ordered him before themselves for examination.
You are a man of books
A little so.
What books have you read?
History, Divinity, Belles-letters.
What is the characteristic of history?
Fiction.
Of Novels?
Truth.
Of metaphysics?
Imagination.
Of natural philosophy?
Doubt.
What is the best lesson in moral philosophy?
To
expect no gratitude
.
What is the best qualification of a politician?
Honesty.
The next best?
Knowledge.
The next best?
Fortitude.
Who serves the people best?
Not always him
that pleases them most
.
It seems to the Court, said the Chief Justice, that
the man is not altogether mad. He appears rational
in some of his answers. We shall
advise upon it
.
O 2
OBSERVATIONS.
There
has certainly been a great deal of
vain
learning
in the world; and good natural sense has
been undervalued. Too much learning may make
a man mad. It may give him a pride and vanity
that unfits for the transaction of serious affairs. I
would rather have a sober sedate man of common
sense in public councils, than a visionary sciolist
just from the academies. But solid science is
ornamental
,
as well as useful in a government. Literary
acquirements may be undervalued. A man may not
be a
scholar
himself; but he may have a son that
may.
The child may rue that is unborn.
A check given to the love of letters.
The
offspring
of a plain farmer may be a philosopher; a
lawyer
a
judge
. Let not the simplest man therefore
set light by
literary studies
. The bulk of our youths
are sufficiently disposed to indolence of themselves.
It requires all the incitement of honours and
emoluments
to trim the midnight lamp. The rival hip of
the states ought to be in their public foundations; in
producing men of letters
. Popular distrust of them
ought not to be promoted. The coxcomb; the
Macaroni
springs up in the cities: The illiterate in the
country village. Legal knowledge, and political
learning, are the stamina of the constitution. The
preservation of the constitution
is the stability of the
state
.
Political studies ought to be the great object with
the generous youth of a republic; not for the sake of
place or profit; but for the sake of judging right, and
preserving the constitution inviolate.
Plutarch's
lives is an admirable book for this purpose
. I should
like to see an edition of 10,000 volums bought up in
every state. Plutarch was a lover of virtue, and his
reflections are favourable to all that is great and good
amongst men.
CHAP. VI.
The
madman
being out upon bail, walked about
seemingly disconsolate; and fell in with a
philanthropic
person, who endeavoured to console him.
You may think yourself fortunate, said he, that the
charge had not been that you
were dead
. You might
have been tumbled into a coffin, and buried before
you were aware. When a public clamour is once
raised, there is no resisting it. People will have
the thing to be so, lest there should be no news.
For the stagnation of
intelligence
is equal to the want
of breath. I will venture to say that in three days,
were I to undertake it, I could have it believed that
the soul had gone out of your body, and that you
were a walking mummy. It is only to insist upon
it, and spread it, and a part will be credited; at
first, and finally the whole. Thank fortune that you
are upon your feet upon the earth. You are not
the first that have been buried alive. On opening
a coffin, the corps has been found turn'd upon its
face. In a tomb it has been found out of the coffin,
and lying where it had wandered, thinking to get
out.
Good heavens! said the madman, this is enough
to turn one's brain indeed. I begin to feel my head
swimming. Is it possible that without the least
foundation
,
such a proposition should come to be
believed
?
Believed; ay; and people would be found to
swear to it. You have no conception from how small
beginnings great things arise.
Ingrediturque solo, & caput inter nubila condit.
You have seen a
wood-pecker
. It is astonishing how
large a hole it makes with so small a beak.
It is
owing to successive impressions
. Since common fame
has begun with you, it is well that it has taken that
turn; and made you
only mad
.
If that is the case, said the
man of books
, I ought
to be reconciled. It might have been worse.
CHAP. VII.
IT may seem strange that in the present current
of prejudice against learning, and learned men, the
school-master had not been taken up,
that spoke Latin
. The fact was, the people did not know that it was
Latin. Some took it for one language, and some for
another. Thus, when he accosted persons in the
street, with his puzzling phrases to translate, either
on account of the peculiarity of the idiom, or the
elipsis of the sentence, answers were given
correspondent
to the mistake. Thus;
Nil admirari
I do not understand Spanish.
Simplex munditiis
I never learned Welsh.
Ambiguoque vultu
It is all Greek to me.
Lacrim rerum
I do not understand Dutch.
Mea Valentiam, si quis
I have never been among the Indians.
Esse Sua
Parati.
Potatoes are very good.
As for the blind Lawyer, humanity interposed on
his behalf. There is a generosity in the public mind
that leads them to pass by the unfortunate. The
sovereign people, like other sovereigns do not make
war upon
bats
. His lectures were short also, and
did not cost much. The loss of money, leaves a
bite behind it worse than the sting of the wasp.
It is this that excites a prejudice against lawyers;
and yet people are, themselves, to blame. It is their
own self-love, and unwillingness to think themselves
in the wrong, that leads to law. Every man, in
his own cause, seemeth just, but his neighbour,
cometh, and searcheth him. Covetousness, deceives
the person.
O, si angulus ille, mihi foret
I must have that nuke of woods, that rins out
there. It will mak, a calf-pasture.
I admit that
bar oratory
is carried to excess, and
there is too much of it occasionally; it is valued by
the quantity, more than the quality. But there is
a great deal of excellent speaking to be found, at the
bar. There are Stamina, though retrenchments
might be made.
Cum luculentus flueret,
Erat quad tollere posses.
The great defect is, the making many points;
the cat that had but one way to escape, stood as good
a chance, as the fox that had a thousand. Seize the
turning point of the cause; if it can be done, and
canvass that. The stroke of the eye, or coup d' eil,
which characterizes the great general, is the being
able to see, at once, the commanding point of the
field
of engagement;
to abandon out posts, and
concentrate
his forces. Why need a man be taking time
to shew, in how many ways, he can kill a squirrel?
If he can take him down with a rifle ball, at once,
it is enough.
Oratory has no where a finer province than at the
bar. In a deliberative assembly, there is no such
scope. Questions of finance have nothing to do
with the heart. No man can be an orator at the bar,
that has not a burning love of justice; that is not
of perfect honour and integrity. For it is this gives
the soul of oratory. An advocate thinking merely of
the fee can be no orator. The soul must be
expanded
by the love of virtue.
In a deliberative assembly, it is difficult to be
honest.
Party will not suffer it
. At the bar a man
may be honest. For, in a cause he is not supposed to
speak his own sentiments, but to present his side of
the argument; and with truth in his statements.
The attempting to hold what is not
tenable
, is a mark
of
weakness
. Why then a prejudice against lawyers,
who may be called
the light of the country?
I exclude
attornies that are mere
money-gatherers;
or
professional
men, that screw the needy, and grind the faces
of the poor. Such there will always be.
But nature
presents nothing without an allay of evil
.
As to the blind fiddler if it should be asked, why
he was not accounted mad, it was because he was
not
denounced
. There is a great deal in calling out
mad dog
. Besides, the insignificance of the scraper,
protected him in the republic. He was so busy
scraping
,
that he never
meddled with politics
, and this was
a great help. And as he played every tune to every
one that asked, having no predilection for Langolee,
above Etric banks, he gave no offence.
Nunquam contra torrentem, brachia,
Direxit, sic octaginta annos vidit in aula.
P
CHAP. VIII.
A Cattle-driver
had come from the
western
settlements
,
to exchange at the fair, stock, for salt, iron, and
women
. In barter for the last article, a cow was given
for a girl. The settler went out, in the first instance
with a rifle, a hatchet, and a knapsack. Having fixed
on a spot at a spring head, the next thing was to fall
saplins and construct a hut. A small piece of ground
was then cleared of the under wood, and this formed
into a brush fence to inclose it. He returned then
to the interior of the country, and the next summer,
going out with a hoe, and a stock of provisions, on a
pack-horse, he began his cultivation. Having tamed
a buffaloe, or got a cow from Padan Aram, he had
in due time, milk in abundance. This put it into
his head to get a
milk-maid;
in other words a
wife
.
The traders in this article, usually chose those of the
less opulent
, whose dress answered all the ends of
fashion without the affectation. The
elbows were
bare, because the sleeves did not reach; and the
folding doors of the bosom were undrawn, because
they had been always open. There was no occasion
for flesh-coloured pantaloons; for the pantaloons were
the natural flesh itself, discovered through the rents
of the muslin, by the waving of the wind, like a
light cloud upon a bed of air, in an April day.
When these virgins, nothing loath, had been
conducted to the bowers mantled with the natural
vine, an offspring arose in a few years, such as that
from whence the Poets have drawn their best fictions.
You will have no occasion to read Ovids
Metamorphosis
,
to have an image of Daphne, or Proserpine; Diana
and her nymphs; the Dryads, Hamadryads, or other
personages. Just cross over into these new forests
and there you have them in reality: Maids bathing
their snowy limbs in transparent streams; climbing
the mountain top, collecting flowers, or gathering the
berries of the wood. Nature is here in her bloom;
no decay or decrepitude. All fragrancy, health, and
vivacity.
The stripling of these woods, is distinguished from
the city Beau; but it will not become me to say who
has the advantage: whether the attitude of the
presented
rifle; or that of the segar in the teeth, is the
most manly? Which looks best, the hunting shirt
open at the neck, or the rol of muslin that covers it,
and swells upon the chin? These are things to be
canvassed
by the curious. I am of opinion however that it
is better to be clear sighted than purblind, and to be
able to see a deer in a thicket, than to have need of a
glass, before the nose to direct the steps where there
is nothing to stumble over.
It can be no slur upon the descendant of a western
settler, that his mother was obtained in barter, with her
hair depending to her girdle; or waving in ringlets
on her shoulders; and the moisture of her eye
brightened
with a tear at the emigration; when he considers,
that, in all times, and in all places, matrimony, to use
the pun of Bishop Latimer, has been, in a great degree,
a
matter of money;
and the consideration of the
contract
not always what the lawyers call a
good
consideration
that is affection; but a valuable one,
wealth
.
Even if the circumstance should be considered as less
honourable than
a marriage settlement with forms
, and
perfect equality, in the transaction; it will be
forgotten
in a century or two, and it may come to be
doubted
whether there was ever such a thing as barter at all
.
A noise of a different kind was now heard in another
quarter. It was occasioned by a brick-bat which had
fallen from the heavens, or the top of a chimney; or been
thrown by some one, which is just as likely, and hit
the stall of an honest Frenchman who sold hair-powder.
He construed it an insult, and insisted upon knowing,
what no one could inform him of; or if they could,
was not disposed to do it; that is, whence it came?
Diable! Diable! Said he, in a rage. Si j' etois, d'
en la France. If I vere in my own contreeLe
miserable
police. Dish contree has une ver bad police.
A I'en enfer,Foutre, Foutre, Foutre!
Parce que je suis un jacobin. I be de jacobin.
Dish ish de enrage. Vill kill all de honest republican.
Ah! Messieurs aristocrats; c' est que vous voulez
me tuerC' est une terrible conspiration. It ish van
terrible conspiracy.
Civility to a foreigner induced the multitude to
interpose
,
and endeavour to pacify. But strangers are
jealous, and it was an hour before he could be
persuaded
by some that spoke the language, to believe
that the thing might have been a matter of accident.
He had threatned to make a representation to the
government, and demand the interposition of the
executive
.
There is reason to think that he had dropped it;
as we have seen no diplomatic correspondence on the
subject.
A seller of patent medicines gave out that he had
bought them from a chymist who had
invented a new
vegetable
. Discovered, you mean, said a
naturalist
.
No;
Invented
, said the patent Doctor. He made it
himself. I have some of the seeds in my pocket. Out
of what did he make it? Hydrogen; oxygen; carbonic
acid, and muriate of soda.
It is beyond my comprehension: What does the
seed look like, said the naturalist? Coriander seed;
or mustard, said the Doctor. Here is a sample of it,
giving him a grain or two.
P 2
And it is out of this you make your drops, said the
naturalist? Certainly, said the Doctor.
And a new seed will produce new drops, said the
naturalist; and perform new cures in the world.
Undoubtedly, said the Doctor: what use could
there be in inventing it, if it did not?
I wish he would invent a
new planet
, said the
naturalist. That he could do readily enough, said the
Doctor; but there are more than are good already.
They shed
malign influences
.
Aye, quo' the Scotchman; there is such a thing as
evil stars
.
CHAP. IX.
A company of village players were acting a
pantomime
.
Harlequin represented a politician with the
people on his back. Incurvated and groaning, he
seemed
to feel the pressure exceedingly.
I like burlesque very well, said a spectator. A man
must imagine himself Atlas, forsooth,
with the
Heavens
on his shoulders!
The people would walk on their
feet if he would let them alone. What matters it, if
by attempting to sustain them, he gets his rump
broke?
That is all the thanks a patriot ever got, said a
wise man.
Are not the people strong enough of themselves,
said the spectator?
Strength of mind is improveable, said the wise
man. Hence strength of mind differs more than
strength of body. The aggregate of mind is one
thing and a distinguished mind another. It is not so
absurd, to suppose that one mind, in a particular case,
may excel another. The social compact is a noble
study. He who has devoted himself greatly to it,
may be supposed to have made some progress. Why
should he not have credit for his good intentions?
Why make him the object of a public exhibition,
because
he thinks himself the support of the
community
Public spirit ought to be supported, and hints
well meant,
well taken
. It is but an innocent
hypocondriasis
for a man to apprehend that he is doing
good, by his lucubrations. That he is a pillar of the
commonwealth.
See how he grins, and balances, said the
spectator
,
speaking of the Harlequin,
because the people, in
his opinion, are too much to the one side
.
It is an easy thing to turn even virtue into
ridicule
,
said the wise man. But selfishness was never
an amiable quality. And can there be a nobler effort
of benevolence than to seek the public good? If one
individual misses it; another hits; and the principle
is salutary. It is not him that sails with the wind of
popular opinion that always consults the interest of the
populace. At the same time,
I am for keeping up the
spirit of the people. It is the atmosphere of liberty
. And
though this atmosphere
is the region of lightning and
engenders storms, yet in it we breathe, and have our being
.
But I speak of the Angel that guides the hurricane;
the good man of more temperate counsels; and
who, from age, experience, or extent of thought, sees
the consequence of things, and applies the prudence
of restraint to the common mind in the violence of its
emotions.
Why shall we censure such a man should he
indulge
the ambition of restraining the people; or
rather
of supporting them by counseling moderation.
He is sometimes the best friend that reproves
. A
flatterer
never was a friend. The caracatura of a man
having the people on his back, is an aristocratic fetch
to discourage a love for the people, and a disposition
to promote their real interest. This Harlequin is set
on by the enemies of the people, and with a view to
disparage republican exertions.
The spectator was silent.
While the Harlequin was acting
the oppressed
politician
as the pantomime was called, a pedlar had
thrown himself into nearly a similar position; and
though it may seem strange, an accidental conjunction
of attitude. He had got his stall on his back; and
gave out that he had taken an oath, not to set it down,
until the people at the fair, had bought off all his
goods. He was on his hands, and feet, and bellowing
like the bull of Phalaris, affecting to be overcome,
with the load of his pack. The people, out of
humanity
;
credulous to his distress, came from every
quarter
to hear his complaint, and ease him of his goods.
A partner was handing out the merchandize, and
disposing
to the customer, as fast as he could come at the
articles. The back-bent man, in the mean time, in
his inclined posture, was gathering up the dollars,
thrown upon the ground, and puting them into his hat;
not omiting, the groans necessary to attract a
continuance
of commiseration.
Christian people, said he, ease me of my wares, or
I shall have to break my back, or
to break my oath
.
You had better break your oath than your back,
said a man passing by; I have no money to throw away
upon a rogue.
A rogue! Said the burthened man. If I were a
rogue I could break my oath; but it is conscience keeps
me here. I cannot break my oath; and my back must
be broke. Help good people help; buy my wares,
and ease me of my load.
You son of a whore, said a rude man, cannot you
stand up, and your pack will fall off?
Ay but it is my oath, said the Pedlar, that keeps
it on, until all my goods be bought.
It ish a tam sheat, said an honest German; he
ish a liar and a rogue. His back ish not broke more
ash mine. His pack ish light ash a feather; wid shilks,
and sich tings, dat weigh noting. He ish a tam sheat
and a rogue.
I am muckle o' your way o' thinking, said Donald
Bain, the weaver; it is a' a stratagem, to get his
hand in folks pockets, and wile awa' the penny.
The deel an aith has he ta'en. It is a' a forgery.
It ish a devlish contrivance, said the German.
It is all de love of de monish, said a Jew. His
conscience is monish; I go anoder way to de
exchange
dish morning.
Nevertheless credulity prevailed; and some
continued
to purchase.
If at the hundreth edition of this work, a century
or two hence, it should be published with cuts, like
Don Quixotte, and other books of an entertaining cast;
the figure of the Pedlar and his pack may afford a
good drawing; and the Harlequin, at the same time,
with the people on his back.
The moral of the
distressed politician
is obvious to
every one. It is natural for us to suppose that the
world cannot do without us. O what will they do
when we are gone, is the language of almost every
man's heart in some way or other. I will venture to
say there are chimney sweepers, who think that all
will go to pot, when they drop off. Yet the world
goes on its gudgeons, and all things that are therein
revolve just as before!
What will we do for a general, said one to me,
when Fayette deserted to Sedan.
What? when Dumourier went off, said another?
He may be yet in the ranks said I, who will
terminate
the revolution
. It came nearly to pass; for the
Corsican was at that time but in the low grade of
what we call a subaltern
I have reflected with myself whence it is that men
of slow minds, and moderate capacities, and with less
zeal and perhaps less principle, execute offices, and
sustain functions with less exception, than others of
more vigour and exertion; and I find it owing to a
single secret; laissez nous faire; let us be doing:
that is, let subordinates, do a great deal themselves. He
is right; it is well; and if it is wrong, self-love saves the
error: men had rather be suffered to be wrong, than
to be set right against their wills. What errors of
stupidity have I seen in life, in the small compass of
my experience, and the sphere of my information;
and these errors the object of indulgence, because
there was nothing said or done to wound the pride of
the employer. This is a lesson to human pride and
vanity. It is a lesson of prudence to the impetuous.
The sun lets every planet take its course; and so
did General Washington. That was the happy
faculty
that made him popular.
His fort was, in some degree, the laissez nous
faire; The not doing too much.
Yet the lovers of an art, may be excused in being
hurt when they see the artist err. The lovers of the
public may deserve praise who wish to set the world
right and do a little towards it. It is the error of
vigorous
minds, to say the least of it; and oftentimes,
the excess of virtue.
Sometimes, it is
an instinctive impulse of spirit
that cannot be resisted
. Alcibiades superseded in the
command of the Athenian army, but remaining in the
neighbourhood could not avoid pointing out to the
generals
who succeeded him and who were his enemies,
the errors they were about to commit, and which
advice
,
neglecting, they were overthrown with their
forces
by the Lacedemonians under the conduct of
Lysander
,
and disgraced. Moreau though superseded
by the directory, and serving only as a volunteer,
stepped
forward to an unauthorized command, and saved
the army on the defeat, and death of Jubert.
The critic will say, what use can there be in such
representations? We do not write altogether for
grave, or even grown men; our book is not for a day
only. We mean it for the coming generation, as
well as the present; and intending solid observations,
we interlard pleasantry to make the boys read
.
Q
CHAP. X.
Containing Explanations.
In
my observations on
the licence of the press
in
the early pages of this book, it may be seen that I
have had in view
personal
, and not
political
stricture.
The difference of these I cannot so well express as in
the words of the greatest orator in the knowledge of
history,
Curran of Ireland
. I quote him to give
myself
an opportunity of saying how much I admire him.
It is on
Finerty's
trial for a libel, that the following
correct sentiments are beautifully expressed.
Having stated to you gentlemen, the great and
exclusive extent of your jurisdiction, I shall beg leave
to suggest to you a distinction that will strike you at
first sight; and that is the distinction between public
animadversions upon the character of private
individuals
,
and those which are written upon measures of
government, and the persons who conduct them;
the former may be called personal, and the latter
political
publications. No two things can be more
different
in their nature, nor, in the point of view in
which they are to be looked on by a jury. The
criminality
of a merely personal libel, consists in this,
that it tends to a breach of the peace; it tends to all
the vindictive paroxisms of exasperated vanity; or to
the deeper and more deadly vengeance of irritated
pride.The truth is, few men see at once that
they cannot be hurt so much as they think by the mere
battery of a news-paper. They do not reflect, that
every character has a natural station, from which it
cannot be effectually degraded, and beyond which it
cannot be raised by the bawlings of a news-hawker.
If it is wantonly aspersed, it is but for a season, and
that a short one, WHEN IT EMERGES LIKE THE
MOON FROM BEHIND A PASSING CLOUD
TO ITS ORIGINAL BRIGHTNESS. It is right
however, that the law and that you, should hold the
strictest hand over this kind of public animadversion
that forces humility and innocence from their retreat
into the glare of public view.That wounds and
sacrifies
;
that destroys the cordiality and peace of
domestic
life; and, that, without eradicating a single
vice, or a single folly, plants a thousand thorns in the
human heart.
It will not give universal satisfaction to have
introduced
the name of Porcupine, or Calender. For
though no man can respect these characters; yet,
consciousness of having once favoured them from
other motives, will touch the self-love of some, as it
will be said the one is dead; and the other run away;
and it was not worth while, or perhaps liberal, to
make use of their names even in a dramatic way; or
as a character in a fable. As to Porcupine, it was
said at the time, that though occasionally coarse in
his language, and gross in his reflections, yet such a
spirit and stile of writing, was necessary to counteract
the excess of democratic principles; that in fact, it
did good. I doubt upon that head; or rather to the
best of my judgment, it did harm to the cause which
it was thought to serve. Indignation is insensibly
tranfered from the advocate to the cause.
It has been said, in the British Parliament, that
He deserved a statue of gold for the services
rendered
here. This is a great mistake. He did
injury
to the character of British manners and liberality.
It produced something like a personal resentment
against the whole nation whence such a writer came.
An intemperate partizan in public or in private life,
can never serve any cause.
But it was not with a view to pourtray this spectre
of scurrility that the name is introduced; but because
it suited to the counterpart, Pole-Cat. I had thought
of Peter Panther; but Porcupine, could be drawn
from real life, and was at hand.
I will not say, that before Porcupine came and
since, there has not been a portion of scurrility in
some gazettes,
unworthy of the press
. There has
been too much; but I believe the example and the
fate of this monster, and his successor Calender, has
greatly contributed to reform the abuse. It is a check
upon an editor, to be threatened, not with a
prosecution
;
but to be called,
a Porcupine; or a Calender
.
It will be natural for a reader to apply in his own
mind, the history of the Village and its agitations, to
the State where we live; and it will be asked, what
ground is there for the idea, that here we talk of
pulling
down Churches; or burning Colleges. There is
no ground so far as respects Churches; but it is
introduced
by way of illustration. What if any one
should say, Let us have no books, and no doctrines,
but the Ten Commandments, the Lords Prayer, and
the Apostles Creed? Give us the gospel in a narrow
compass, and have no more preaching about it. This
would be no more than is said of the law; Why
cannot
we have it in a pocket-book, and let every man be
his own lawyer? Our Acts of Assembly fill several
Folio Volumes; and yet these are not the one
thousandth
part of our Law. Why not, at least, put the
Acts of Assembly in a
nut shell?
Ask our
Legislators
.
What else law have we but the acts of the
legistive
body? The law of nations forms a part of the
municipal law
of this state. This law is of great
extent
,
and to be collected from many books. The
common
law, before the revolution,
made a part of our
Q 2
law
; and by an act of our legislature of the 28th
January
,
1777, it is recognized and established to be a
part of our law, and
such of the statute laws of
England
as have heretofore been in force
. This law must
be collected from commentaries, and decisions. It is
of an immense extent. Because the relations of men,
and the contracts of parties, are of an infinite variety.
But how is Turkey governed? Do the Muffti
require
such a multiplicity of rules? No, nor the Cadi
in Persia; because having no law, they are a law
unto themselves. There is no jury there. It must
be a profession, a business of study to understand our
law: we cannot therefore burn the books of law, or
court-houses, any more than we can dispense with
sermons, and commentaries on the Bible; or pull
down religious edifices.
I will not say, that people talk of burning
colleges
;
but they do not talk much of building them
up. The constitution provides, Art. 7. That the
legislature shall, as soon as conveniently may be,
provide
by law for the establishment of schools
throughout
the state, in such manner that the poor may be
taught gratis.
Sec. 11. The arts and sciences shall be
promoted
in one or more seminaries of learning. We do
not hear of much exertion on this head; either in
the legislative body, or out of doors. But what is
more exceptionable; or at least unfortunate, in the
opinion
of literary men, and perhaps in the opinion of
some that have the misfortune not to be learned, is
that learning does not seem to be in repute
universally
.
The surest means in some places, as is said,
to make your way to a public function, is to declaim
against learning. It would be a libel on the body
politic
,
if a state could be the subject of a libel, to say,
or to insinuate that this is general.
But it is heard
in some places
. I do not know that it is carried so far
that a candidate for an office will affect not to be able
to write, but make his mark; but it is not far from it;
for he will take care to have it known, that he is no
scholar; that he has had no dealings with the devil
in this way; that he has kept himself all his life,
thank God, free from the black art of letters; that
he has nothing but the plain light of nature to go by,
and therefore cannot be a rogue; that as for learned
men that have sold themselves to the devil, they may
go to their purchaser; he will have nothing to do with
Old Nick or his agents. This is not just the language
used; but it is the spirit of it. It may be a
caracatura
,
as we distort features to mark deformity more
deformed
But the picture is not without some original
of this drawing. To speak figuratively, as we say of
fevers, it may be in low grounds, and about marshes
that we have the indisposition;
that is, in secluded
parts of the country
. But so it is that it does exist.
It is true, the savages of our frontier country, and
elsewhere dispense with the use of letters; and at a
treaty, Canajohalas, and other Chiefs make their marks.
They are able counsellors, and bloody warriors,
notwithstanding
.
The Little Turtle defeated General
St. Clair, who is a man of genius, and literary
education
;
and yet the Little Turtle can neither read nor
write, any more than a wild Turkey; or a water
Tarapin. But let it be considered, that the
deliberations
of the council-house, at the Miami Towns,
embrace
but simple objects; and a man may throw a
tomhawk, that holds a pen, but very aukwardly. So
that there is nothing to be infered from this, candidly
speaking. I grant that Charlemagne, made his mark,
by diping his hand in ink, and placing it upon the
parchment. It was his hand, no doubt; but it must
have taken up a large portion of the vellum; and
it would have saved expence, if he could have signed
himself, in a smaller character. But what may pass,
in an illiterate age, with an emperor, will not be so
well received in a more enlightened period, and in
the case of a common person.
It is not the want of learning that I consider as a
defect; but the
contempt of it. A man of strong mind
may do without it;
but he ought not to undervalue the
assistance of it, in those who have but moderate parts
to depend upon. It is a bad lesson to young people;
who had better take a lesson from their books. At
any rate, it is good to have the thing mixed; here a
scholar and there an illiterate person; that the honesty
of the one may correct the craft of the other.
How comes it that a lawyer in this state seems to
be considered as a limb of Satan? There is a great
prejudice against them. It would seem to me that
it is carried to an extreme. An advertisement
appeared
some years ago in a Philadelphia news-paper
of a Ship just arived with indented servants;
Tradesmen
of all descriptions; Carpenters, Joiners, and
Sawyers
The error of the press had made it
Lawyers
.
It gave a general alarm; for the people thought, we
had enough of them in this country already.
But if we have Lawyers at all; it is certainly an
advantage to have them well educated. Were it for
nothing else but the credit of the thing, I should like
to see an enlightened, and liberal bar in a country. It
is thought that learning makes them make long
speeches. If that should be made appear; I bar
learning
;
for I like brevity: with Shakespeare, I think it
the soul of wit.
I attribute the making
long speeches
, to the taking
long notes
. When every thing is taken down, every
thing must be answered, though it is not worth the
answering. This draws replies long into the night;
and we labour under the disadvantage of not having
wool-sacks to sleep upon as they have in England,
while the council are fatigueing themselves; or at
least the juries.
The prejudice against lawyers stands upon the
ground with the prejudice against learning.
The
majority
are not lawyers, or learned men
. A justice of
the peace is a deadly foe to a lawyer; for what the
one looses, the other gets. The chancery jurisdiction
of a justice is hewn out of the jurisdiction of the
courts of law, and abridges the province of the
lawyer
.
It is well if it does not edge out the trial by
jury. How? This mode of trial is retained by the
courts of law. But who are at the bottom of this
hostility
to the courts of law. I will not say the
holy
army
of justices; though some may break a spear
at it. I believe there are of them, that think their
jurisdiction is sufficiently increased:
but there are
others who would not object to a little more
.
In China there are no courts of law or lawyers;
all justices of the peace. They call them
Mandarins
.
In capital cases, there is an appeal to the emperor.
There is no jury trial there
A limb of the law, is a good name for a lawyer;
for we say a limb of Satan; and a lawyer in a
free
country
is the next thing to it: a thorn in the flesh to
buffet the people. There is freedom enough in the
constitution; why need we be afraid of aristocracy in
practice? Every man is brought up to the bull-ring
in a court of law, be he rich or poor; but the scheriff,
in Arabia, who is a justice of the peace, not like our
sheriff here, though it is spelt the same nearly, can
summons no jury
; at least he takes care not to do it.
But the governments of those countries, are arbitrary,
not free. It is an astonishing thing to me, that
a free
government, and the exclusion of lawyers, cannot well
be reconciled
.
How can the overthrow of a judiciary tribunal,
affect
liberty?
No otherwise than as it militates
against a branch of the government. Take away a
branch from a tree, and the shade is reduced. What
is a branch that is born down by the rest? But
suppose
the judiciary branch goes; the legislative and
executive remain. There are two springs to the
legislative
branch. Which is strongest? That of the
house
of representatives
. Is there no danger of this
outgrowing
the other two? There is half a sprig in the
executive. But the great sprig of the house of
representatives
is the rod of Aaron that will swallow up
the other rods. There is a talk now of abolishing the
senate. That will be talked of, unless it becomes an
enregistering office
. It is hoped that will never be.
In this I allude not to any disposition that has yet
shewn itself in the house of representatives; but to
what I have heard broached out of doors.
Despotism is not a self-born thing. It has its
origin
in
first causes
. These not perceptible, like the
gass that produces the yellow fever. Why call out
against the fever? It is the gass that is the cause.
Whence sprung the emperor that now
affects the
French?
From the
mountain
of the national assembly.
It is the madness of the people that makes emperors.
They are not always aware when they are planting
serpents teeth
. Reflecting men saw the emperor, in
the insurrections of Paris; in the revolutionary
tribunals
;
in the dominancy of the clubs; in the
deportations
to Cayenne. Whether it springs from the
seed, or grows from the plant; is oviparous, or
viviparous
,
despotism is not of a day;
it is of gradual
increase
Will not the people give him credit that can
point out to men,
where a germ of it exists
.
In what is hinted at, in several pages of the
preceding
chapter, of hostility to laws and a disposition
to overthrow establishments, and judges, I have in
view, not the proceedings of a public body, but the
prejudices of the people. It is talk out of doors that
I respect. And this is the fountain which is to be
corrected. Representatives must yield to the
prejudices
of their constituents even contrary to their own
judgment. It is therefore into this pool
that I cast
my salt. It is to correct these waters that I write this
book
. I have been in the legislature myself, and I
know how a member must yield to clamours at home.
For it comes within the spirit of the principle,
to obey
instructions
.
In the song which I have put into the mouth of
Clonmel
,
I have nothing else in view but to give a picture
of the excess of the spirit of reform. It is taken from
the life; for though not in verse, yet I have heard
similar sentiments expressed by the
uninformed
.
One thing however I must correct. Speaking of
liberal and enlightened lawyers, I have said they may
be called the light of the country!! I was thinking
of the revolutionary period, when a constellation of
lawyers, rose from one end of the continent to the
other, and in public bodies, were
the light of the country
.
But the phrase would have been less exceptionable,
because more just, to say,
lights of the country
. For
the particle the, greatly alters the meaning. It is
intensive, and gives a distinction and superiority which
was not intended. The phrase is taken from the
Scripture
ye are the light of the world! This was
spoken
of the Apostles, whose successors the
Clergy
, the
Ministers of revelation, are doubtless
the
lights of the
world, and to them the phrase is particularly
appropriate
.
The light of the world, as we call Homer the
poet, or Aristotle the stagyrite. Or, of Coke's writings
we say the reports.
The talk of
abolishing
the courts, and the judges,
is a language which I put into the mouth of Tom the
Tinker; yet is more general than is imagined. I
am afraid it may affect ultimately the democratic
interest
;
to which I feel myself attached; for I aver
myself to be a democrat. No Perkin Warbeck, or
Lambert Simnel; but a genuine Plantagnet. Hence
my concern for their honour and existence, which can
alone be supported by their wisdom, and their justice.
R
Judges are impeached, and violent persons will
have them broke before they are tried. But
accusation
and condemnation are not the same thing. It is
not on every bill that is found by a grand jury that
there is not a defence.
There is nothing to be collected from any hints of
mine that I arraign the justice or policy of the
impeachment
;
much less, that I wish to see it quashed,
or withdrawn. I have it only in view to arraign
preconceived
opinions, and
the forestalling the public
judgment
.
Sublime is that tribunal that is to
judge judges
.
The highest judicature of the body politic. It
presents
an awful, but majestic spectacle. Our senators,
in this capacity are the representatives of heaven. I
see them seated on a mount fast by the throne of
God; the stream of justice issuing at their right
hand; full and equal in its current; crystal in its
fountains, and giving vegetation to the groves and
gardens on its borders: The stream of injustice at
their left, bursting like a torrent of enflamed naptha,
scorching and consuming all before it.
It lies with this sublime court to give its lessons
of impartial justice to the subordinate judiciaries. I
rejoice in this power of the constitution. I shall
submit
to its decisions.
I have spoken of judges being impeached; and of
the
consequential contempt
as too delicate to touch upon.
The fact is, that it relates to the ground of their
impeachment
;
which, at the time of this present writing
August 1804 is depending before the senate of the
commonwealth. But nothing hinders to canvass the
general principle, without an application to the facts
under consideration: or rather to explain the
meaning
and effect of a
consequential contempt
. For it is a
thing buried in obscurity by the very phrase that is
used to express it. A contempt of the court! One
would suppose that it can mean only, treating the
court with contempt. That is the meaning of what
is called the
direct
contempt; which is an open
insult
and resistance to the powers of the court, or the
persons of the judges who preside there. 4 Black.
283. But there is what is called the
consequential
contempt
, and which is but constructively a contempt,
and does not mean a disrespect of the court, but
of
the law
. The court which administers the law, is
put by a figure for
the law itself
.
It is the technical term, the word contempt that
misleads. It is not the court that is despised. Nor
do they feel it as such. It is the law; it is the
administration
of justice that is
slighted
. Common sense
can understand this. The Scripture has the idea, and
the language of the constructive contempt. He
that despiseth you, despiseth me; and he that
despiseth
me, despiseth him that sent me. It is not the
court that is despised; but the law which they are
bound to administer. We say against the peace
and dignity of the commonwealth, in an indictment;
and yet the commonwealth, that is the body of the
people, know nothing of the matter, and feel neither
peace nor dignity affected. A tall man which, in the
old language means a strong man, impels another
with his foot upon what are called the posteriors.
The commonwealth, in fact, that is the body of the
people, never hear of it, or take any heed of the
consequences
;
nevertheless the law pursues, and punishes
in the name of the commonwealth.
But a principal of these contempts, is
an
interference
with a case depending in the courts of justice
. It
is the policy of the law to provide against this, by
giving the suitor a right to call upon the court, for
a summary interference to restrain it.
But why not turn the matter over to a jury; and
let them in the first instance find a bill? I grant that
where the libel is upon the court itself, it might be
prudent, and would answer the end as well, to let the
fact come forward established in that way. But where
the cause in court is affected; where any blemish is
thrown upon that while it is depending; the right of
a third person intervenes: the right of the suitor
who calls upon the court to interfere by a
summary
proceeding
. Can the court refuse in this case? I
call upon you Messieurs Judges, for protection; for
redress; you have the power; it is
the law of the land
.
You are sworn to dispense the law; it is your duty.
I demand my right. My case shall be considered
pure until it is determined otherwise by a final hearing
and decision. Will you tempt me to break the peace;
to murder this man that has attacked my interest and
my honour, by his publication, relative to the
controversy
that is in law between us. If you withhold the
summary redress, which the law gives, you tempt me
to break the peace; and his blood be upon your heads.
Shall I lie by, and let the imputation rest upon my
cause, or affect the decision, and take my chance of a
circuitous prosecution, when the law gives me an
immediate
protection, in the shape of supporting your
dignity? I have a right in the power which you
possess
;
and I call for the exercise of that power.
This is called the power of the court; but it is
founded upon
the right of the citizen
. It is the duty
of the court to proceed in this way, when called upon;
because the suitor has the
election
of the proceeding,
by calling on the court; or by
indictment for the libel
.
But under an attachment, you call upon a party to
say whether he is not the author of the writing. That
is against a principle of the common law; no one is
bound to accuse himself; and by a clause of the
constitution
,
no one is compellable to give evidence against
himself. But the parts of the law must be taken
together
:
exceptions subject to the general rules. The
proceeding by attachment, and compelling to answer
on interrogatories put, existed under the common
R 2
law, whose maxim it was, no one is bound to accuse
himself. It is a
special case
out of the general
principle
:
and there is good reason for the exception. But
whether reason, or not, the exception is as old as the
principle. For this proceeding, and such
interrogation
is of immemorial usage; it is as old as the
constitution
of the courts themselves. If our constitution
had meant to do away this exception, it would have
voted it in express terms; more especially as it had
been exercised by the courts before the formation of
the constitution; and by implication recognized by the
legislature itself, in the case of Oswald, taken up by
the house. But the constitution gives the courts,
the
powers usually exercised
. This power was usually
exercised, and therefore it is given.
But there is reason for it, independent of law, and
constitution. The administration of justice requires it.
How can I fix a libel on the author? The
presumption
is, that my adversary in the cause depending, is
the author of the
writing
that affects the merits of it.
On this presumption the law gives me a right to call
upon him. Who else can be supposed to interfere
but my adversary; or some one with his privity?
The necessity of the case justifies this exception to
the general rule. He may go on behind the scene
and prejudice the public mind against me and my
cause, and leave me to my redress afterwards. The
law will not allow this. If it is not a principle of the
law, it ought to be a principle. But it is a principle
as old as our Saxon ancestry, from whom the trial by
jury is derived. It is coeval with the trial by jury,
and necessary to its preservation. It is a safeguard
of the trial in which the bulk of the people are
especially
interested. Before they give it up let them think.
Leave it to the suitors in court, and at least one side
will always object to it; probably both. All that wish
a fair and unprejudiced decision will object to it.
They will not be satisfied with being turned round to
an indictment, and the slow process of a jury trial to
establish the fact of the libel. But they will wish
more, that the party interested, shall be purged on
his oath, as to his agency in the publication. In this
case, they have the conscience of the party to
establish
the guilt. And the looking forward to him, will
lessen his hope of
escaping detection. It is a great
privilege
to an honest man. It is the rogue only that needs
fear it
.
But though the bare circumstance of being a
party
to the suit depending may found such
presumption
of being the author of the writing, as will justify the
calling on the party to answer, by a rule to shew cause
why an attachment should not issue, yet it is never
done, and perhaps ought not to be done, without an
affidavit of
some fact to lay a ground for the motion
.
This in the case of a third person, is absolutely
necessary
;
for no presumption of the nature already stated,
can exist.
But the negative of the party to the suit
depending
,
or of a third person, on oath, dissolves the rule,
and there is an end of the summary interposition.
This is a
privilege peculiar to this special proceeding:
and not possessed in the case of an indictment by a
grand jury
. It softens the extraordinary remedy, by
suffering a man
to be a witness for himself; and what
is more; taking what he says, to be the truth, and so
far as respect the attachment, incontrovertible
.
But if this power, though founded on law, and the
constitution, should be deemed contrary to the
spirit
of liberty, or good policy
, a clause of a few lines, can
put an end to it: viz. That in the case of
consequential
contempts, by interference in a cause depending
,
the proceeding shall be by indictment, in the first
instance
;
and in no other way. It will relieve the court
from a burden, which they conceive a duty; and
experience
will determine whether the alteration of the
common law in this particular be
an evil or a good
.
But of what use can a rogues' oath be? He is not
supposed to have a conscience. But he can look to
an indictment for perjury. But suppose he did not
know, or at least think there was a cause depending;
and that he did not mean a contempt. It is not what he
thought, or what he meant; but was there
a case
depending
,
and what did he do?
But at this rate you abridge
the liberty of speech,
and of writing:
you make it dangerous to canvass a
general principle of law; for some suit may be
depending
on which it may turn. The law goes no such
length. I am at liberty to convass a general
principle
.
It is a consideration of
the particular case
from
which I am excluded; or the application of
the facts
to the law
. The legality of general warrants was
abundantly canvassed, at the time Wilkes was the
subject of one of them; and no exception taken to
the freedom of the press in this particular. The
constitutionality
of the
Sedition Law
of the United States,
was brought into view pending indictments under it;
and no exception. I am canvassing a general
principle
at present; and there are impeachments
depending
where it may be brought into view. That is
nothing
;
for it is
the facts of the case
that will be
ultimately
considered.
The courts may have this power, and yet may
exercise it with
partiality, oppression, and tyranny
.
This
will render the exercise of any power impeachable
.
For this the accused must put themselves upon the
country; or if clearly and palpably,
a court have no
such power at all
, and yet exercise it, it is a
midemeanour
.
For error in judgment where there is a right to
judge, is not impeachable; but the exercise of a
power unknown to the law, even though
unaccompanied
with express malice, is impeachable, and will
subject to a
reprimand, &c. according to the
circumstances
.
The rights of the citizen are thus secured;
and far be it from me to abridge them, even in idea,
by any reasoning I may offer.
But if the law guards against a party
endeavouring
to pre-occupy the public mind, on the merits of a
cause, that may come to trial; humanity and good
policy will forbid, the raising a clamor against men
in office whose conduct may be called in question, and
depending before the highest judiciary tribunal. I
therefore object to the toast on the 4th of July last;
Chace the judges from the bench
. I am sorry that it
came from the state of Pennsylvania.
This is a pun upon the word
Chace;
refering to
Samuel Chace of Maryland: A judge of the supreme
court of the United States, and against whom articles
of impeachment are prepared by the house of
representatives
.
In the month of May 1774; Having come up the
bay of Chesapeake, I landed at Annapolis. There,
for the first time I saw Samuel Chace, with papers in
his hand, haranguing the citizens. It was on the
Boston port bill.
The cause of Massachusets became popular
because
it was the cause of America. But it required
sense to explain, and spirit to enforce resistence. It
was not the mild temper of Paca; nor the cool
reasoning of a Johnston. It was the ardent mind;
the impressive vigour, the undaunted resolution of a
Chace that led a state into the war. Shall even the
excess of qualities that profited, not receive quarter,
and be gently scanned, when great objects are
accomplished
?
his error has been in the
heat of times
, if
error there has been, and shall the
heat
of
other times
,
as posterity may think,
takes its turn
. For the sake
of the democracy, I am not clear that the prosecution,
has been
necessary, or judicious
. Be that as it may,
this I know, there is a dormant body of republicans
who have seen the revolution, and do not rejoice in it.
Those who have not had a political, or perhaps a
personal
existence at the period may feel it less. It is
sufficient to have said this; I leave the result to the
constituted authorities.
But be the demerit of the judges' conduct what it
may, I think the allusion to his case, in the public
libation
,
Chace the judges from the bench
, was
unjustifiable
Great delicacy becomes brave men, and they
will not insult the accused, or triumph over the
unfortunate
.
In the parable of supposed offence to the St.
Tammany
,
or, Cincinnati Societies, I will acknowledge that
I have in view my own case with the legislature;
the only complaint against whom is that I had not a
citation to explain
. I think that when I come to
explain
the circumstances of my situation, and the
motives
of my conduct, which I mean to do at large in
the second volume of this second part, they will
themselves
be sensible that
through an over-jealousy of
honour
they took fire too hastily
. It is a maxim of
Rochefaucault
that when a wise man does not know
what to do, let him do nothing. This maxim I
thought of at the time, and the truth is, I was greatly
at a loss what to do; but I did, what I now think,
notwithstanding
all that has happened, was
necessary, and
unavoidable
. But what is more, I am confident
that when the situation is explained, there will be
found few who can think otherwise.
It may be thought that I allude to my own case,
and that of the impeached judges, in several places of
this book. It is possible I may have been led to this
train of thinking, and of course writing, a good deal
from what has happened, though I mean no reflection,
or invective. But I cannot say that I have any direct
reference, where it is not expressed in terms.
But in no place have I a reference to the language,
or conduct of the delegated bodies; but to popular
prejudice
,
and declamation at home. I have been led to
write on this subject; because I was thinking on it.
John Carmichael, a Clergyman of Brandywine; some
years ago; took his text in these words, It is not
good for man to be alone. For, said he, having
been lately married, as you all know, I can preach
best on what I think most about.
But while I am thinking about giving offence,
which I do not intend, it occurs to me, that I shall
have all the lawyers on my back; becaue I have said
to them, as was said to the Pharisees, Use not vain
repetitions as the heathens do: for they think they
shall be heard for their much speaking. By the bye
the heathen with us, that is, the savages of North
America, are not long speakers. They call it a talk,
it is true; but it is raised above a common
conversation
.
And they are not tedious speakers; short, clear
and pithy are the characteristics of their eloquence.
The heathen
are the Gentile nations here meant,
that bordered on Judea? or does it refer to the
redundance
of the Greek and Roman eloquence? The
loquacious Greek
was proverbial. When a language
becomes copious, the speakers become verbose.
But the lawyers will say, how can we hlep it? we
are not our own masters, we are bought with a price.
The client will have talk for his money. He purchases
his plantation by the acre; he sells his wheat by the
bushel; or if a shopkeeper in the city, he measures
tape by the yard. Omnia deus dedit, says the Latin
scholar, Numero, mensure, et pondere. God hath
given all things by number, weight, and measure.
He will have quantity, let what will go with the
quality
.
For of that he is not a judge.
S
I admit it is difficult to get a man to understand
that the cause is oftentimes won, with judgment, and
silence like the game of chess. All depends upon the
move. A client will say, You ought to refund me
something; or take less than I promised. You had
no trouble. Or he will go away, and say, lawyer
McGonnicle
took twenty dollars from me, and did not
say a word.
He was six hours on his feet, says a man coming
from the court. This sounds well, and it looks as if
the man was a great lawyer. So that
self-preservation
is at the bottom of long speaking. Or is it in
accommodation to false opinion.
I admit something in all this. An advocate will
occasionally find himself under the necessity of saying
more than is necessary, in order to save
appearances
,
and to satisfy his client who is not like the
court and jury, weary of the harangue. But this is
not the great cause of prolixity. It has a deeper root;
it is a false stile of eloquence that has been introduced,
and is become fashionable. I have asked chief justice
Shippen, if he could recollect and trace, the origin
and progress of it. Is it imported, or of domestic
origin? He thinks it was introduced by John
Dickinson
,
who was an agreeable, but a lengthy speaker.
At nisi prius; or at bar in England, there was no
such thing. But whether there is or not; is of no
account. The thing ought not to be. Because it
will lead to the loss of the
jury trial
.
A lawyer must say every thing that his ingenuity
can suggest on the subject. The strongest reasons
are not sufficient; he must bring up the weaker. After
throwing bombs, he must cast jackstones.
There is more sense in the common mind than is
imagined; and close thought in strong words will be
understood, and a few will suffice.
The bar of this state is said to excel in legal
knowledge
;
but certainly is behind none in liberality of
practice; and delicacy in argument. In practice, no
catches, or as the common people call it, snap
judgments
;
lying in wait at the docket; making
surreptitious
entries, and giving trouble to get slips set right.
This the meanest lawyer can do. A rat can gnaw
the bow-string of Philoctetes. The drawback in the
opinion of foreigners, and the feelings of the people
here, is the length of speeches.
I will not say that hence arises wholly the
prejudice
against lawyers. A prejudice against the liberal
professions, exists in all countries; or they are made
the subjects of invective from the occasional abuse of
their privileges. Woe unto you lawyers, is a
scripture
expression, and applies to the priests among the
Jews who were the interpreters of the law of Moses.
The physicians of all countries are said to kill people.
And as to advocates they get no quarter in any
country
.
Wits will exclaim even without ill will. Don
Quivedo, a Spanish writer, in his vision of hell, tells
us, that he observed a couple of men, lying on their
backs asleep in a corner, with the cobwebs grown
across their mouths. He was told these were porters,
and had been employed in carrying in lawyers, but
there had been no occasion for their services, for a
century
past, these cattle had come so fast of themselves,
that the carriers had laid themselves up, in the
interval
of business, to take a nap there.
As to the length of speaking, how can it be helped
in advocates? Not by any act of the legislature,
constitutionally
,
at least in criminal cases;
for it is
provided
by the constitution that in criminal cases, the
party
shall be heard by himself and his counsel. But
this provision was not meant to exclude the right in
civil cases, which existed at the common law; but
because
in capital cases, in the courts of criminal
jurisdiction
in England, counsel was not allowed to the
accused, except on law points, arising on the trial.
In civil cases the legislature may change the law or
modify it; but I am not able to say, what regulation
by an act of the legislature, might be expedient; or
what practicable by the courts themselves. The safest
and most easy remedy would be in the bar themselves;
cultivating a stile of eloquence of greater brevity, and
endeavouring to be more laconic in their speeches.
They are not aware that this length of speaking
has become unsufferable. That resentment against
the bar on that account, has been accumulating, and
is now ready to overwhelm their existence. It is a
great cause of that obloquy against the proceedings of
the courts of justice, which is heard in this state.
Delay
is the effect; and delay, is an obstruction of
justice
.
But delay is the cause of loss to the lawyer. It is
a vulgar idea, but founded in mistake, that lawyers
delay causes for the sake of fees. It is their interest
to have speedy trials, as much as with merchants to
have quick returns. It is the interest of the advocates
that I endeavour to promote, in suggesting a reform
in the length of pleadings. I am endeavouring, in
the scouted language of some reasoners, to save the
lawyers from themselves. It is on this principle that
I attempt to school them a little on the point of
oratory
at the bar.
Some one will say, that I but affect to treat them
thus cavalierly. That it is like the case of an Indian
in a skirmish, of which I have heard, on the west of the
Ohio, who on his party being defeated, pursued one
of his own people, with his tomhack lifted up, ready
to strike, and was mistaken for a volunteer. In the
heat of the affair seeing him alert, and pursuing, they
thought the one before him was in good hands, and
they let them both escape.
To apply the story. It may be thought that I
affect
to school the profession, to save it from
arbitration
laws, in the spirit of what has been called the
S 2
adjustment bill
. I am not one of those with whom it
has been clear that the adjustment bill passed into a
law, would do any injury to lawyers. It might
winnow
off some of the chaff, but better corn would come
to the mill. I have no idea that any thing can hurt
the profession, but the overthrow of liberty. Council
to advise, and an advocate to speak, will be always
wanted where
the laws govern and not men
. Rules of
property and contract in civil cases, and the
principles
of law in matters of life, liberty, and reputation,
will always call for the assistance of the head, and the
powers of speech, in a republic.
My concern in the case of innovations, doubtless
meant for improvements, has been that the
experiment
would not shew wisdom in the framers; but, on
the contrary, discredit the administration by which
they had been introduced; or, if tolerated, and
approved
,
would lead to aristocracy, and despostism in
the end. This by gradations insensible, as opiates
unnerve the constitution. It would take a volume to
trace gradatim, how, and why this would be brought
about; and after all it may be a spectre of the
imagination
.
Let the wise determine. Were I a practicing
lawyer, as probably I may soon be, I should
apprehend
little from it on the score of profit, and loss to
the profession. My idea is, that eighteen months
would put an end to it, and it would, by that time
have sowed a pretty fruitful field of controversy, that
would last as many years. As to the
constitution
, it
seems to be in vain to talk to the people about it,
when
it is in the way of what they wish, and must have
.
But hinting as has been done with regard to the
exuberance of oratory at the bar, it is to be taken
subject
to the exception of cases which cannot be
considered
in a few words; either where the facts are
complicated
,
and the evidence extensive; or where a point
of law embraces an extensive scope of argument. The
elucidation in some cases, must be drawn from the
law of nature; the law of nations: the municipal law.
Statues, commentaries and decisions must be
examined
at full length.
It is not half a day, or a day that will suffice
always
,
to do justice to a question. The court
themselves
will stand in need of the careful preparation,
and the minute investigation of the council. The
bringing forward lucidly, and arguing a matter well,
is a great help to a court. It is doing for them, what
they would have to do for themselves, without their
assistance.The labour of the council is the ease of
the court. Many a midnight thought is expended by
the laborious lawyer, of which the court feels the
benefit
,
in the light which he throws upon the subject of
the litigation. It is the
Rudis indigestaque moles,
of the unprepared that wastes the most time.
It is the highest effort of a strong mind to condense.
Having taken a comprehensive view of the whole
horizon
of the subject, the man of talents
collects the
principles
that govern and illustrate the case
. To state and
press these, is the effort of the great orator. To
reduce
to generals, and bring forward the result.
But in order to speak short upon any subject
think long
. Much reflection is the secret of all that is
excellent in oratory. No man that speaks just enough,
and no more, ever wearies those that hear him. And
that is enough which exhausts the subject, before the
patience of the auditory.
There is such a thing as alarming
the patience
.
A speaker branches out his subject. It is all proper
that this should be done in his own mind. It is
necessary
that he should have a system of argument, and
a certain order of arrangement. But I do not approve
of an explanation of this. I remember the alarm
which I have felt listening to a speaker in the pulpit,
when he has spread out the table of his doctrine into
heads and sections. When he had done with the
first, that is well, thought I. But then, there is the
second head; will he be as long upon that? Now if
he had said, This point of doctrine arises from the
text, I would have heard it out without fore-casting in
my mind that the ulterior divisions were to come yet.
It is not in the language of nature to have such
compartments
.
It is well enough in a book of didactic
dissertation. For there is one can lay down the
volume
,
and amuse himself otherwise when he is weary.
The Indian in his talk has an order in his mind, and
pursues it by the wampum belt, as the Catholic says
his prayer by his beads. It is not the secret of
persuasion
,
which does not steal upon the heart; and
whatever the effect in matters of the judgment, may be
the annunciation of method; it is unfavourable to all that
interests the heart, and governs the imagination. You
will see no such thing in Demosthenes or Curran.
Cicero has something of it, but I always thought it a
blemish. Ars est celare artem.
There is no such thing in the works of nature.
Artificial gardens sometimes present that view, but
these are not in the best taste.
The hills and mountains, vales, and extensive
plains are dispersed with a beautiful variety. The
stars of the heaven are not at marked distances.
There is a concealed regularity, order and proportion
in all that affects. The mind remains cold where
there is nothing that surprises and comes
unexpectedly
upon it.
CONCLUSION OF THIS VOLUME.
These concluding pages I had written, and had
printed off, to this point of the game, if I may so
express
myself, this 19th of Nov. 1804; and had
intended
to publish; but it struck me that it might give
offence to the legislature, and it might be as well to
let it rest until next spring after they had risen; and
if any thing should give umbrage; though I cannot
possibly see what, they might have a summer to think
of it before they met again, and so could do nothing
hastily. I asked the printer boys what they thought
of it. For I could communicate to no one else lest it
should get out. In the language of John Bunyan;
in the preface in verse to his Pilgrim's Progress,
which I remember something of, having read it 30
years ago,
Some said John print it; others said no.
And I said not so.
It is said of Moliere, that he recited his
comedies
to an old woman in his house; and when
she smiled the audience never failed to smile
also. This is an appeal to simple nature. On that
ground I took the opinion of an old man about the
shop, that wore spectacles. It was his opinion that
it might be thought
I was making a dash at somebody
.
He thought the lawyers, and the Irish might take
offence; and perhaps the legislature themselves for
any thing he knew. This last was the most delicate
consideration, and at the present time, I would not
think it advisable to add the bar and the Irish to the
weight against me. For that reason, nonum
prematur
,
say, in mensem. Six or nine months hence, it
may be safer to let it come forth.
I had the curiosity however to ask the man what
possible offence it could give the Irish? He thought
Clonmel's song bore hard upon them. It was in vain
that I explained to him that no reflection was intended
on the nation, or the Irish character; and indeed little
else than an incident to enliven the history. He still
thought, as he expressed it, that it was a
double
intendre
,
and something might be taken out of it. It is
thus,
That learned commenators view,
In Homer more than Homer knew.
Or, that good theologists can make a text yield more
than was in it, independent of cultivation.
The book then rests for a period; lest the
publication
should
do myself harm
. It will depend upon
circumstances whether I do not burn it altogether; or
put it off at the book fair, with some New-England
man, who will give it a circulation in the Northern
States; and keep it away from Pennsylvania.
How a man feels himself cramped in such a fear,
and trembling of mind! I am positively more afraid
at this moment of the mistake of the honest, than I
was of the resentment of the
knave
at a former period.
During the reign of terror my strictures were very
free; but I begin almost to call this a reign of fear,
which is the same thing with the former reign.
A word to the critic seems necessary in some part
of a book. It happens to come here at the end of it.
It is now ten years since I last put pen to paper in
any thing above dissertation in the gazette or a
news-paper
paragraph. I am well aware that there will
be found a great falling off since my last about that
time. I am not conscious to myself that my vigour
of mind has abated in matters of judgment; for, as
would seem from the story in Gill Blass, I shall not
be the first to discover that. But I must acknowledge
that I am not sensible of the same powers of
imagination
in that respect,
Non sum qualis eram.
No wonder; for the snow of age has come upon my
head; and winter has taken possession of my brow.
My fancy is as cold as it was once warm. My
inclination
leads me to metaphysics, chiefly. But that
subject is exhausted; or, so many have written well,
that it is discouraging to come after them.
It is on account of the decline of fancy; that I have
confined myself in this volume, to mere narrative,
which is the province of old age. Here, and there, I
have interspersed a maxim, or an observation; but
these are the saws of age, and have not that brilliancy
of thought, or terseness of expression, which quick
and lively wit gives. There is some attempt at
humour
;
but seldom have I been able to reach it. A
salutary bon mot, or jeu d'esprit, may sometimes be
found. Nevertheless it may serve to let people know
that I am yet alive.
Were it not that the captain had enjoined on me
to continue his story when he delivered his papers into
my hand, I believe I should not have taken up the pen
again. But I must go through with it, and complete
the history; which I hope to comprize in another
volume
.
It will be observable that Latin quotations abound
more than a reader of English may be disposed to
relish. But the fact is, that I have forgot almost all
the reading of my middle age; and recollect chiefly
my academic studies. Hence it is that the classics
are more in my head, than Shakespeare; or Milton.
END OF VOLUME FIRST.BOOK III.
CHAP. I.
AS the Captain was lounging through the fair, he
saw a tall thin man, of a lean visage, and sallow
complexion
,
talking at a stall with a chapman. He had
under his arm a piece of new, or, as it is called,
green linen
. In fact he was a weaver, and had linen
claith, as he called it, to sell. For he was what we
call a Scotch-Irishman, and of the name of Oconama,
which is not a Scotch-Irish name; but an aboriginal
Patronymic; nevertheless it came to be his name:
perhaps, by the mother's side.
He had on him what we call a
spencer;
that is a
coat with the tail docked; though some have this
kind of garb made so in the first instance; that is, a
juste au corps, or jacket to go over the coat, instead
of being under it; so that it seems to be
but a
half-coat
.
Now Oconama is pronounced with the final vowel
soft; and hearing it so pronounced, the Captain took
it to be
oeconomy:
especially as he saw that his dress
corresponded with the designation; and the small
scratch wig on his head, but half covered his brown
hair, which was seen underneath, supplying the
defect
of covering by the caul, which was piss-burnt,
and had but a few stragling hairs on the top of it, which
was as bald otherwise, as the pate of a Capuchin.
Oeconomy, said the Captain; for such I see you
are; and I might have known you, even if I had not
heard your name; I am glad to have fallen in with
you; having often heard of you, and wishing to see
you, and to be acquainted. There was said to be
great want of you a few years ago, under the
presidency
of John Adams, who, though a good man, yet
it has been understood, did not sufficiently consult
you. I am glad to hear that you are in request with
President Jefferson, though it may be as some say,
that he consults you too much, and that you carry
things too far.
Adams! Said Oconoma. I was not in the country
when Adams was President. The more the pity,
said the Captain. There was great want of you.
You were much called for. There is a want of
oeconomy
,
said one. There is no oeconomy, said another.
But I am happy that you are now here. Great things
were expected from you, and great things you have
done. But there are good men who think, to use their
own phrase, that we are oeconomizing over-much,
and that by the weight of your reputation, you have
A 2
misled our councils, in some particulars. A
judiciary
law was said to be repealed on
the principle of
oeconomy
The
constitutionality
of the repeal has been
questioned, much more the
expediency
. The suitors
are obliged to come from the most remote parts of a
state, to some one place where the circuit court is
held, which under that law was brought, if not to their
own doors, yet at least nearer home.
The Constitution
must be amended as to the jurisdiction of the Federal
Courts;
or a like law must be re-established. The
army has been reduced on the
principle of oeconomy;
the marine also. Our armed vessels have been sold
off, and turned into merchantmen. Hence a petit
guere with the Bashaw of Tripoli, for several years,
whom we could have put down, and burnt up like a
wasps' nest, if we had kept our ships, and men
together
.
But I will not say, that there was not good
reason
at the time, to justify the retrenchment, I mean
that appearances were such as to justify it. It is easy
to judge after the event, and though I think the thing
was wrong, yet I do not arraign the motive. The
public mind leaned so strongly to retrenchments, and
called for it so loudly, that it was not easy to resist it.
But the spirit of oeconomy is said to have invaded
the legislative part of the administration, and to be
about to fall upon the executive itself in
the reduction
of salaries
. And not the administration only of the
general government, but of the states, confederate,
and subordinate. For imitation is the faculty of man;
and we imitate those whom we respect. Hence it is,
that we every where hear of oeconomy. An old
woman
cannot set a hen to hatch but on the
principle of
oeconomy
.
It is a check to all improvement in any system;
the judiciary, for instance, that it does not consist
with
oeconomy
. Now query, Mr. Oeconomy, whether
this may not be carrying things too far. I know well
that fault will be found with all measures. For all
systems have their draw-backs. This world that we
inhabit has its physical and moral evil though the
work of infinite wisdom. What perfection then can
we expect from man? But it is well to weigh, and
to know whether what is attempted, comes as near as
may be to the expedient. This is all I have in view.
You have been praised, and you are blamed. And
so it has been with all men in all ages who have
endeavoured
to serve the public. Their integrity, and
their exertions have not been sufficient to secure them
against obloquy.
Romulus et liber Pater, et Cum Castore Pollux,
Post ingentia facta, Deorum in templa, recepti,
Dum Terras, hominumque colunt genus, aspera bella
Componunt, agros assignant, oppida condunt;
Ploravere suis non respondere favorem
Speratum meritis.
Of this Smart's translation is as follows:
Romulus, and Father Bacchus, and Castor and
Pollux, after great atchievements, received into the
temple of the gods; while they were improving the
world and human nature; composing fierce
dissensions
,
setling property, building cities; lamented that
the esteem they might have expected, was not paid
in proportion to their merits.
The weaver, at this rhapsody, especially the last
part, the Latin sentence, stood amazed, with his eyes
staring, and his mouth open. He took him for the
madman of whom he had heard, and who had been
said to have been tried that day; and, on the
principle
of self-preservation, if not of oeconomy, began to
recede, and to ensconce himself behind the Pedlar,
who accosting the Captain took upon him to explain.
It must be a mistake of the person, said the
chapman
.
This is not the man you take him to be.
Who is he then! Said the Captain. It is not
Gallatin;
[1]
for Gallatin does not wear a wig, as I have
understood, but his own hair; and Maddison
Secretary of State
.
is a
small man.
It is neither Gallatin; nor Maddison, said the
Pedlar; but an acquaintance of mine from the county
Wicklow in Ireland. He has been in the country
about two months, and has never seen Jefferson; or
given him advice to do good or harm.
I ask his pardon, said the Captain. Calling him
Oeconomy, I took it to be him that is said to be at the
seat of government, helping on with retrenchments
and expenditures. His garb corresponded with his
designation, as he seemed to
cut his coat according to
his cloth;
and had curtailed the dimensions of his
periwig, substituting a little of his own hair; or
rather
leting it grow, to make amends for the want of
caul, which bald as it is, come but half way down his
occiput, and
leaves his neck bare
.
REMARK.
This pleasantry with which I have introduced the
name of Gallatin, and Madison, I hope will not offend.
I respect them both; Madison with peculiar amity
and good will. It is so extremely difficult to engage
attention to any thing serious, that one must enliven
with something singular, in order to be read. These
names seen in a page will induce the reading seven.
This is all I have in view by the use of them.
OBSERVATIONS.
It would be a gratification to myself, and it might
be of use to others, to give some notes of
political
history
in this state
. Those
just grown up;
or lately come
amongst us, from abroad, would better understand,
why it is, that
democracy
has been occasionally the
order
of the day; and again put down. It has always
had numbers on its side, and yet has not always
possessed
the administration. I use the term democracy,
as contradistinguished from the aristocracy; that is,
a union of men of wealth, and influence.
In the state constitution of 1776, the democracy
prevailed in carrying a
single ligislature;
but this laid
the foundation of their overthrow; because experience
proved that it was wrong.
Wisdom is justified of all
her children
.
The constitution of 1776, gave way to that of 1790,
and the aristocracy obtained the ascendancy; or rather
having obtained it, they brought about a convention,
and carried the constitution of 1790;
which is the
present
.
But connecting themselves with the errors of the
administration of the federal government, in 1797, 1798
they lost the state administration, and the
democracy
prevailed.
Five years has it retained the administration; and
will, an interminable time, provided
that wise measures
are pursued, and justice done
.
This, I am not addressing to the legislature, or
executive
power of the government; but
to the people
.
It is for them my book is intended. Not for the
representatives
of a year or four years, but
for themselves
.
It is Tom, Disk, and Harry, in the woods, that I want
to read my book. I do not care though the delegated
authorities never see it. I will not say, it is to their
masters
that I write; for I reprobate the phrase. I
I have no idea of masters, or
servants in a republic
.
But it is to their constituents that I consider myself
as applying, in the observations I make. At the same
time professing, which,
after what has happened in my
case, is perhaps necessary
, that I have not the slightest
disrespect for the representatives
that have been
, or may
again be; I only wish them to support a character in
their deliberations, which the
world must approve
. Or
rather I wish the
democracy
supported which can be
done only, on the basis of
wisdom
, which contains in it
truth, and justice.
Error is always weakness. Integrity cannot save
error. It can only reduce it from misdemeanour to
frailty.
In what is the democracy likely to err? How do
men err when they run from one extreme to another?
There may be
an extreme in oeconomy
, as well as in
expenditure. The
oeconomists
are a good description
of persons; but they may not always be the
illuminati
.
There is such a thing
as oeconomy over much
. A
man of spirit, and enterprise in his private affairs, will
be sensible that it is no oeconomy to stint his
labourers
of wages; or to higgle in his bargains. More
depends
upon judgment, and expansion of mind in his
plans, than in niggardliness in his contracts. Laying
out well, brings in,
and improves his
plantation.
The federal government, in the opinion of some,
taxed too much, or injudiciously. We will not
tax at all. Rather than tax, we will bend our minds,
to reduce
offices and salaries;
at a time too when the
purchase of commodities proves to us, that the value
of money is reduced, and the price of living advanced
one half.
The jurisdiction
of the justices of the peace
proves this; for it must have been a good deal, on
this ground, that it has been increased from fifty, or
thereabouts, to
one hundred dollars
. But it is not
merely the deduction of offices and salaries, that is the
evil, but the wounding a principle of the constitution;
or
straining a principle, to
get quit of these: for, it
cannot be dissembled, that it is broached in many
places, to overthrow the whole judiciary
establishment
,
and put men upon the bench that will take the
honour of it, for the compensation. This might look
well at the first glance; but it would ultimately
destroy
the democracy by which it was accomplished.
But suppose nothing of this, in contemplation, or
attempted; who are they that oppose an amelioration
of the judicial system, competent to an administration
of justice, by an increase of the districts, or the judges?
The
oeconomists
. Though, it can be demonstrated,
that a pound is lost to the community, where a penny
is saved. But it does not come by the
way of direct
tax;
but insensible filching, in the way of
the expences
of attending courts
.
But the
justice of the thing is more;
the dispatch of
trial, and decision. The delay of justice, is the denial
of justice. It would be for the credit of the democratic
administration, to have just ideas on this head.
There
are amongst them who have; but it is not universal
.
Well; the fact is, that it will not always be borne;
and
their adversaries will triumph
.
Were it not for the name of the thing, I do not
see that a judge in this state, need care much about
being broken; for it is but a pack-horse business at
present. It requires as much sitting as a weaver, and
as much riding as a carrier of dispatches. I often think
of the language of Job, in more senses, than one,
my days are swifter than a post.
In riding from one court to another, it is necessary
to be at a certain point by a certain hour, though rain
falls, flood swells, and roads are bad. Even in good
weather there are bad roads. Why not make good
roads? Here again the
oeconomists
present
themselves
.
B
The roads are left to the
townships;
even the
great state roads;
and no improvements of a public
nature are attempted, or thought of:
oeconomy
is the
order of the day. It would seem that democracy had
no soul; that it views things on a narrow scale. That
it has not the knowledge, or the ambition to make a
great state out of a small. I would wish it to stretch
a little in its views, as to the amendment of the roads,
and the improvement of the judicial system. But this
is not a building up,
but a pulling down time
.
I know what it will pull down eventually; the
democracy
.
People will be as much dissatisfied, by and
by, with
oeconomy
resisting all improvements, as they
were of late with
provisional armies
, and a house tax.
A
false oeconomy
, not resisting merely the
accomplishment
of public objects, but sacrificing to itself the
establishments
that do exist
. It is the Moloch that is
calling
for the constitution that it may devour it. It is to
this idol that the third branch of the government must
be offered up in one shape or another. For what is
it, whether a judge is broke upon the bench;
or has
his neck broke upon the roads?
This is not intended against
the representatives
. I
am pleading their cause. Three dollars wages for an
Assembly man, in the great and wealthy State of
Pennsylvania: a state which has in it
the great
emporium
of the Union
. It is a contemptible allowance.
Yet it would excite a clamour to
raise
the allowance,
unless the public mind is prepared for it. This is my
object. Ye are the salt of the earth, say I to
the people. It is you that must season, and give
freshness to our councils, infuse a spirit into our
republic
.
What enlargeness of heart can there be in
men that are oeconomizing on three dollars a day, at
a time, when, by the institution of banks, and other
causes, the exchange of money, and commodities is
altered, in so great a proportion from what it was.
Four dollars is the least that ought to be mentioned.
It is time to raise it to that. Charity begins at home.
I should have some hope if I saw that done.
Oeconomy
over-much, like Pharaoh's ill-favoured, and
lean-fleshed kine, eats up all that is generous,
and liberal in the commonwelth.
Oeconomy
may save the representatives for the
time being until by feeling, the people come to have
a sense of the policy. But, it will affect the credit,
of the democracy; and in the end bring it down. It
is a paralytic that will terminate in a convulsion of the
public mind and change the administration. It is in
the nature of things that this will be the case;
for
great is the force of truth, and it will prevail
.
In what I have said on this head; I will
acknowledge
that I have in view, chiefly that oeconomy which
resists an improvement of the judicial system. Though
probably before this is read, it will not be of consequence
to me but as a citizen, and perhaps not even in that
capacity, whether it is improved or not.
C H A P. II.
I FEEL a disposition in writing this bagatelle, to
introduce something solid, and therefore have
contrived
to bring about a conversation on the part of the
captain, with the principal of the college. It was on
the subject of education: not education generally, but
particular points of academic institution.
I do not like said the Captain, the enjoining, or
imposing
,
to use a stronger term, tasks of original
composition
It is well to instruct in grammar, and the
elements of writing so far as respects arrangement,
perspicuity, and the choice of proper words: and in
this I have but one rule, which is to think first, and
endeavour
to have a clear idea, and then to put it down in
such expression as to be best understood. The
definition
of stile given by Swift, nothing can surpass;
proper words in proper places. And for this
purpose
translation is the best exercise. It is absurd to
require of youth thoughts before they have any; or at
least, correct thoughts. Help me out with my
description
;
assist me with my theme, says one. What shall
I do for an oration, says another? Is it ever a
complaint
in common life that men want tongues? Are
you obliged to urge them to write in news-papers?
The difficulty is to keep them from it. They will be
talking and seribling before they know what to say, or
to write. The seven years silence of Pythagoras was
a noble institution. What an excellent improvement
it would be in our public bodies, that a man should
serve, say two years, before he should have leave to
open his mouth, save just to say aye or no.
But we begin our system of errors at the very
schools. The student must compose. It is true we
have improved upon the system of the last century in
this particular; and do not now insist upon it that it
shall be in verse. It is sufficient that it be in prose.
I mean that making Latin hexameters, or English
hendecasyllables, are not now a task. But it still remains
that the boys must write. And yet the poet which
you put into their hands says,
Recte scribendi, sapere principium est, et fos,
Good sense is the foundation of good writing.
I do not like much, your declaiming in colleges;
though doubtless the ancients had this practice;
Ut inter discipulos plores, et declamatio fias,
says the poet in his apostrophe to Hannibal. But is
this arbitrary speaking calculated for any other
purpose
,
but to make a Pedant? You must stretch out
your hand, at this; you must draw up your leg at that.
Here you must say Ah! There, Oh! It is the feeling
of the heart only that gives attitudes; it is passion
only that can swell out the breast, or agitate the
members
.
I have seen an old woman angry, or moved with
grief, play the orator very naturally. The emotions
B 2
of her spirit, distends the arm and stretches out the
muscles. She clenches her fist at the proper period,
and lays her emphasis upon the proper words. She
says Oh! or Ah! in its proper place, without being
taught it by rule, or pedagogue.
Passion blows a man up like a bladder. He grows
as big as himself. His hair rises on his head, and his
breast heaves. Will rules give a man passion? Will
a man that feels, stand in need of rules?
I preceive, Captain, said the Principal, that you are
no slouch at supporting a paradox. Polybius tells us,
that the Romans exercised themselves on shore,
learning
to keep stroke, and to feather their oars, while their
gallies were building, to encounter the Carthagenians,
in the first punic war. Can it be of no use to stretch
the joints a little even without passion? Or cannot
passion be called up by the exertion of the speaker,
even in a feigned case? It is something to accustom
youth to stand up, and face an audience. At all events,
it is an amusement, and it can do no harm to the boys
to spout a little. At the same time it is no proof of
eminence in real speaking that the youth spouts well.
For that as you say, it must come from sentiment and
feeling. But there is something in a habit of
declaiming
,
at least to assist the voice and gesture. But I
have always thought it preposterous in our
Young
Ladies Academies
, to put little misses forward to
speak. I have thought it an indelicacy to suffer them
to declaim. It is unnatural; for what occasion can
they have to harangue?
I am of the same opinion, said the Captain. I could
never approve in a family to see a little miss called
up by a silly mother, or weak father, to hold out her
hand, and speak a passage which the blockhead of a
teacher had instructed her to commit to memory. It
is indelicate, and out of nature.
To what assists the memory, I have no objection.
But for this purpose, there are sentences in
Scriptures
,
in the Proverbs of Solomon, especially; The
Gospels, and the writings of St. Paul. In Shakespear, are
fine thoughts drawn from human nature; moral
observations
consolotary, or instructive. Let them be got
by memory, because recollected, they will guide,
conduct
,
or embellish conversation. These would be a
good substitute for catechisms, containing points of
faith, which the young mind cannot comprehend; and
which the divines dispute about themselves.
Catechisms
might be laid up for grown persons. The
fact is the early catechumeni, were all grown persons.
It was not until the time of John Knox that they began
to teach children the dogmata of the scholastic
theology
.
The Jews had it in command from Moses, to teach
their children sentences; or precepts of the law. They
were taught to bind them on their arms, or about their
necks in slips of writing which they called
phylacteries
.
But do we hear of teaching them the Talmud of
Jonathan
,
or the Targum of Ben Onkelos? The
commentaries
of Rabbi David; or Eben Ezra the Jew, never
superseded, amongst them, the preceps of the
decalogue
.
I had no idea, Captain, said the principal, that you
had so much knowledge of the Pentateuch.
A little only, said the Captain. But I go on to
observe
that in Turkey, they commit to memory only the
moral lessons of the Alkoran; or of the Misnud in
Persia. The Vedam of India is a book chiefly for the
Priests; and so with us ought to be the greater part of
the
confessions
. At least mature years, only can dijest
them.
But these dogmata planted in the memory, grow
up to fruit in the understanding afterwards, said the
Principal.
That is, said the Captain, commit to memory
now, what you will understand afterwards. I would
have memory and understanding go together. But
this leads me to
say a word
, on memory, as you divines
say when you preach. For you talk of saying but a
word, when before you are done, you make a sermon
out of it. Memory is a thing improveable, and ought
to be improved, I do not therefore approve of this
thing of
taking notes
. You read your lectures, and
the student must take notes. It spoils his hand; for
trying to keep up with you he writes fast, and runs
into scratches like short hand, or the Coptic alphabet.
Sometimes the student copies the lectures, to a
great waste of time, and unnecessarily; for learned
professors thought they had done a great great deal
in geting them out of manuscript into
print;
and now
the labour is to get them out of print into
manuscript
again. But the principal disadvantage, is the neglect
of the
memory
. And when a man gets a thing in his
book, he neglects to put it in his head. Let the thing
rest in the brain if possible.
Pedagogues that teach the first elements of
arithmetic
will instruct the youth to work their sums, as
they call it, on the slates; and afterwards put down
the figures in their books. This is to take home to
shew to their parents, that they may seem to be doing
something, and the master get a good name. But
it is a loss of time and of paper.
The same pedantry is carried up into higher
institutions
;
and the classes copy lectures, to make
themselves, or others believe that they have been
doing something.
Just at this instant a gun went off, and thinking
somebody might have been shot, they broke off the
conversation.
OBSERVATIONS.
IT may be asked, of what use, a great part of
the preceding book? Some things may have a
moral
,
and carry instruction to the mind. But a great
part can have no meaning or effect; farther than to
raise a laugh, or to make a person smile for a
moment
.
That itself is something; and may conciliate
the reader to what is more solid. An ingredient, not
in itself savoury, may give a relish to substantial
good. Assafetida gives a flavour to a beef-steak.
Let me get a man to laugh, and I put him in good
humour. The whole book from beginning to end,
has a moral, which, if any one has not found out, let
him read again.
It may argue a light airy mind in the writer; and
yet, these things are sometimes the offspring, as in
the present case, of a mind, far from being at case;
on the contrary, it is to get case, and allay pain, that
it is written. Pain of mind is relieved by an
abstraction
of solid thought. The early paroxism of deep
grief, may be incompatible with a playful fancy; but
gradually and insensibly, the heart-ache may be
cheated
of its sensations. What else effect has
conversation
or music? Neither of these can assuage great
pain; or torture; but will be felt to alleviate, in a
lesser degree of pain, of body, or mind. The mind
is drawn off, and kept from reflecting. We use
laudanum
to allay acute bodily pains; and it gives a
pleasing delirium, and insensibility for a time. But
in the case of a mental suffering, it is much safer to
attack the imagination by an intellectual paregoric.
There is less danger that the use will grow to excess,
and induce habit.
Scarron wrote his comical Romance under great
bodily pain. But ease to the mind has been more
frequently
sought by the amusement of writing. It is
a fortunate thing for the writers, that it keeps off
hunger; for many of them in the garrets of cities,
if we may believe themselves, while they lived, or
their friends after they are dead, are reduced to short
commons. Certain it is, that the occupation of the
mind saves food. Literary men, are in general but
small eaters. The spirits are exhausted in the
thought of the brain, and are less active, in the juices
of the stomach. So that from a man's eating, I can
give a pretty good guess, whether he thinks, or speaks
most.
But it may be said, this book might have been
written, from the motive suggested; but why let it go
to the press? Because there is a pleasure in seeing
what you have written appear in a book; and the
correcting
the proof sheets as you go along, pleases.
It is on the same principle that the child is delighted
with its baby house; the grown person with the
gratification
of his fancy in architecture or gardening.
All the objects of men, are in great part to please the
imagination. Utility is but one half. I admit at the
same time, that he who comprises both, hits the nail
on the head, and carries all votes. But it is even
something to attain one of these. This much it may
suffice to say, as an apology for the publication.
But it may be said, why not cast the salt of your
pleasantry upon some substantial food to the mind of
a young person, and not upon vapour, which constitutes
little nourishment. You would seem to be a
moralist
;
and to have some knowledge of practical
philosophy
Hence we should expect in your page,
observations
conducive to regulate life, and to form manners.
If for instance you had taken a youth from his early
age, and conducted him to manhood, insinuating by
example
,
or precept, the best lessons, it might have been
a school book. I answer; there has been a great deal
in this way already; and my mind led me more to
give lessons to grown people. Was I to set myself
about such a work as is suggested; I do not know that
I could mend the matter. I believe, I would change
a little the system of education; in one particular;
but, it might not be for the better. As already hinted
by some things put into the mouth of the Captain, I
could make it a principal matter to form the heart to
a republican government
. And in order to this; keep
out of view all that nourishes
ambition
, the poison of
public virtue. In honour prefering one another, is
an apostolic, and christian injunction. But it is as wise
in philosophy, as it is true in religion. Honour is the
principle of monarchy, distinction of rank, titles,
dignities
.
In the American republics, we retain yet a
great deal of the spirit of monarchy. The people are
not aware of the
phraesology
itself, in some instances.
When an individual solicits a vote, his language is,
that he will
serve
the people. They take him at his
word, and when he is sent to a public body, he is
called, their
servant
. He goes farther himself, and
will talk of the
majesty
of the people.
No disgrace is supposed to attach itself to the
soliciting
votes, any more than petitioning the
monarch
for
a place. This is not in the spirit of a republic. It
is contrary to the nature of it; it is subversive of it.
But I would begin at the foundation by inculcating, the
folly of coveting a public appointment. The private
interest of a man is better cultivated by staying at
home. The first lesson I would give to a son of mine,
would be to have nothing to do with public business,
but as a duty he owes to his country. To consider
service
in civil life, no more to be desired than service in
the military
. In this last, there is danger of
rheumatism
,
and ague; or of a wound, or of death in battle;
but in civil trusts, there is danger of obloquy and
disrespect
.
C
But an individual that accepts a trust, is no
servant
.
He is an agent; a delegate, a commissioner. Nor are
a house of representatives
the people
. Nor can
majesty
be predicated of them. It is a monarchial phrase, and
I would not apply it, even to the people themselves.
But take away the spring of ambition; that is
distinction, and preference; and you relax industry;
you increase indolence. I grant it. But it saves the
heart. There may be less eminence; but there will
be more goodness. It is on this principle that I
condemn
the distribution of honours in academics. It is
beginning by corrupting the affections. It is planting
the poison weed of
ambition
; the upas tree that taints
the breeze, and kills the visitant. I shall have
accomplished
something by this book, if it shall keep some
honest man from lessening his respectability by
pushing
himself into public trusts for which he is not
qualified
or when pushed forward into a public station, if
it shall contribute to keep him honest by teaching
him the folly of ambition, and farther advancement;
when in fact, the shade is more to be coveted, and
the mind, on reflection, will be better satisfied with
itself for having chosen it. This is in great part, the
moral of this book; if it should be at all necessary to
give a hint of it. Will not an honest man feel
compunction
,
when, after some experience, he comes to
look back, and see the mischief he has done in a public
station; sapped, perhaps the foundations of the
constitution
;
misled by the ambitious; when at the
same time, he thought he was establishing the
republic
.
Understanding is therefore requistic; not
common
sense
merely; but knowledge of the subject.
But what is knowledge without integrity? And how
can there be integrity, where there is ambition? Is
there not the ambition of doing good? I do not call
that ambition. The praise of doing good? I do not
even like the word, praise. I would say the
pleasure
of doing good. For it is the greatest possible pleasure
to a mind rightly informed; properly cultivated, to
have done good. A consciousness of this, consoles
under public obloquy, and ingratitude.
CHAP. III.
A
Fracas
, in the mean time had taken place,
at the sign of the New Almanac. The cause of this
tumult at the public house, was the circumstance of a
disagreement which had taken place between the
apothecary
and his tumbler, the Bog-trotter. The latter
having got upon the stage first, insisted that the
himself
was the doctor, and the apothecary the tumbler;
and, indeed it seemed to be the most consistent;
for the apothecary had the appearance of being, by
far, the most alert man. Active and nimble he could
leap like a monkey. It was for this reason, the public
took the part of Teague, and insisted that he should
retain his station of doctor, and the apothecary should
play the part of the tumbler. Accordingly, he was
under the necessity, however reluctant, to take his
place upon the plat-form, and begin his pranks
previously
to the opening of the sale of drugs.
The bog-trotter in the mean time, acting in the
capacity of Doctor Mountebank, had displayed his
boxes, papers and phials. But saying nothing of
these, he made it known to the multitude, that he
had a good will for the people of that village; that
having been long absent, he had at length returned, with
the knowledge which he had acquired by his travels,
and with some wealth which he had encompassed by
means of that knowledge; that in consideration of
natural love and affection he was about to bestow a
dollar upon every man present.
At the sound of the word dollar every ear was
ereccted. No conventicle ever had hearers more
attentive
.
God love you, said he, my dear country paple and
name sakes, hold out your hands, and your purses at
the same time, and take dis dollar, dat I hold in my
hand before every one o'd you. For here is dat
famous
powder tyed up so neatly here every paper by
itself, which I sell to all de world for two dollars;
you shall have, dear honies, and much good may it do
you; for nothing at all, but the half o'dat, one dollar
a pace, and the devil a worm will ever trouble you
afterwards
.
Here is two dollars going for one dollar;
just out of love and kindness to the paple o'de place.
The multitude, who had expected the bounty in
hard cash, were somewhat disappointed; but
nevertheless
considering the bargain, the greater part that
could muster a dollar, took the gift, and gave it in
exchange.
The apothecary was so much pleased with the
success
of the new partner, that though on his part
degraded
C2
to the inferior station, he counted it no
misfortune
but began to tumble, with more good will, if
not with a better grace than before; submitting to
the Doctor Mountebank, who affected now and then
to chastise him with a cow-skin, to teach him
manners
,
and alacrity in his profession.
CHAP. IV.
THIS being the day of the annual election, the
Captain apprehensive that Teague might be taken up
in the borough, as the people are ever fond of new
things, and the late gift of a dollar in the sale of the
drugs, had made him popular; though what he sold
for a dollar was not more in the apothecaries shops,
than a few cents; apprehensive of trouble, I say, as
on former occasions, when he had seen less of the
world, and was not so well qualified for a
representative
,
the Captain thought proper to withdraw the
bog-trotter
for a day or two from the village, and take a
journey in the country, where his merits were less
known, and there was less danger of his being
kidnaped
for such a purpose.
But whether owing to themselves, or to the times,
the office of a judge, happening to be peculiarly
obnoxious
;
there was danger of being taken for one of
them in their rambles; and therefore it became
necessary
to be on their guard, more especially, on
account
of the bog-trotter; so as not to go near an
assembling
of people; whether for the sake of an
election
or for other purposes.
With all his caution, and circumspection, keeping
the bog-trotter in the middle of the road; and
warning
him against what might happen; nevertheless,
going too near a place where a poll was holden, the
unfortunate scavenger, as I may call him, was
recognized
by some present, as having been upon the
bench. The rumour soon went out, that one of the
ci-devant judges, was making his escape, and the
populace
were called to apprehend the fugitive. Teague,
denial being, in his way of thinking, a main point in
the law, even had it been the case, was ready to swear
by the holy poker, and the fathers, and every oath
that could be put to him, and with great truth, that
he had never been upon a bench in his life; or had
been in the capacity of judge, or justice, since the
day that he came into the country.
Thy speech bewrayeth thee, said one of the
people
called Quakers; I saw thee on the bench; and
heard thee give thy charge to the grand jury.
By the bye, he was mistaken; for it was a Scotch
judge that had given the charge; but he mistook one
brogue for the other.
But the Quaker was believed, and the bog-trotter
stood convicted.
Yes, said the multitude; he has the very
physiognomy
of a judge; you may see it in his face. Hang
him at once, and be done with his judge-ship.
A rope-maker brought a new cord, with which
never man had been hung, and throwing it over the
limb of a tree, was about to attach the other end to the
neck, when the sudden squall of a pig, that some one
had hit with a stick, drew off the eyes of the
multitude
,
and the attention of the man that held the
halter
and the bog-trotter seeing an opening, made a
sudden spring, and escaped from the croud. He was
pursued but a little way; no one chusing to tire
himself
,
not understanding that any reward had been
proffered by the government for the taking up a judge.
The Captain seeing Teague clear, and running
now almost out of sight, began to expostulate with the
multitude, and upbraid them for this violence.
Do you call in question the right of the people,
said one of them, to hang their officers?
But are you the people? said the Captain. A few
mad caps get together, and call themselves the
people
;
and talk of the majesty of the people. You do
not appear to me to be a very discerning people; to
take my bog-trotter for a judge; nor can your majesty
be deemed very gracious, and merciful, that would
hang him up, not giving time to say his prayers, or
to have the conversation of a clergyman. Had he
been a spy come into your camp, in the war, on the
eve of an engagement, you could not have shewed
signs of greater dispatch in taking away life, than in
this instance.
Captain, said a man who knew him; do not think
so hard of these young men; they had no intention
of hanging him outright.
But even half-hanging, said the Captain, is no
pleasant sport to him that is the subject of it.
With that turning round his horse, he left the
ground, and returned to the village; reflecting with
himself on the danger of wandering far from the place
of his abode; or at least venturing where he was not
known; lest he might be mistaken for a judge also,
and brought to a hasty end, by the limb of a tree, as
was near being the case, with his unfortunate
bog-trotter
,
a short time ago, in the place which he had
just quitted; and which he never wished to see again.
CHAP. V.
HAVING composed himself at home some time,
the Captain took an opportunity, at a leisure hour to
pay a visit to the blind lawyer, and entering into
conversation
,
ventured to put the question, whence the
rage against the Judges? Had it always been the case,
or was it a late matter that had broken out? Did it
depend upon moral causes; or was it a matter of
accident
,
unacountable by man?
There is in the human mind, at all times, said the
blind lawyer, a disposition to throw off shackles and
revert to the natural simplicity of early ages; not that
we relish even in imagination, the oak, and the acorn;
but we pass over these which were the food, and the
covering of the primitive inhabitants; and we think
only of their liberty. How delightful it is to ly on
one's back, and whistle; having no care, and no laws
to trouble us. Down with the lawyers, has been the
language of the human heart ever since the first
institution
of society. It breaks out into action, some times,
as the history of Jack Cade informs us.
A spirit of reform
, is, unquestionably, a salutary
temper of the times; because there is at all times,
need of reformation. This is the angel that descends
into the pool, and troubles the waters; so that
he who slipeth in afterwards, is made whole.
But troubling does not mean muddying the waters;
but giving them motion, and exciting a current. It is
by the spirit of the atmosphere, the wind, that the
waters
of the ocean are preserved salutary. But from
the same cause springs the tempest, and hurricane.
The spirit of reform is terrible in its excess. It is a
matter of great judgement to stay it at a proper point.
Is not the right of universal suffrage, said the
Captain
,
a great cause of this excess in our councils:
Persons young in the world; young in the country;
or such as have but little property put upon the same
footing with those that have a greater stake in the
preservation
of the laws, and in the stability of the
government
.
It is extremely difficult if not altogether
impossible
;
said the blind lawyer to adjust this matter to
general satisfaction, and at the same time, general
safety
.
with regard to age, it cannot well be carried, later
than the age which gives the ownership, and
disposition
of real estate; and as to qualification of property,
it has been found impracticable to carry it into effect.
For how can the value of estate clear of all
drawbacks
,
which any man possesses, be ascertained?
It seems inhospitable to hold the emigrant to a
Quarantine; and postpone the exercise of suffrage, to
a distant day, and yet it is natural for an individual
whom we admit to become a co-tenant of our
habitation
,
to think that he can serve us, and himself also,
by some alterations in the structure, or compartments
of the cabbin. The German inhabiting a cold country,
naturally thinks of accomodation to the winter; the
Briton also, anticipates the heat very little. Neither
of these are aware of the particular winds that blow,
or of the rains, at certain periods that usually descend;
or of the diseases of the climate. The older resident
ought to be consulted, and his notion of things not too
lightly undervalued.
The idea of reform delights the imagination.
Hence reformers are prone to reform too much.
There is a blue and a better blue; but in making the
better blue, a small error in the proportion of the drug,
or alkali, will turn black. A great enemy to a judicious
reform is a distrust of those skilled in the subject of
the reform; and yet there is ground of distrust where
those skilled in the subject, have any possible interest
in the reform itself. One would suppose that an old
lawyer out of practice; one who had been a judge,
and no longer on the bench, might be trusted in all
questions of amendment of the judicial system. But
the legislative body is the organ of amendments; and
it is natural for one branch to endeavour to absorb the
independence of another; or to be suspected of it.
Hence jealousy, and distrust, which an enlightened
policy
can alone dissipate.
But the present idea of reform seems to be to pull
D
down altogether, said the Captain. I do not know
that you will see down with the judges just written
upon fence-rails; or scored on tavern windows; but
it is a very common language, among the more
uninformed
of the community. The danger is that it may
be mistaken
for the voice of the people
, and under that
idea, influence the constituted authorities.
That would be an error, said the blind lawyer.
For it does not follow, that, because a thing seems to have
advocates, that it is the voice of the people. The noisy are
heard; but the dissentients are silent
. Hence it is that
those who hold the administration for the time being,
are not always aware of the real inclination of the
public mind. It is at the moment they seem to have
the greatest way, that an under current begins to set.
The truth and justice of the case, therefore is the great
guide; not what may appear to be the popular opinion.
There would seem to be good sense in what you
say, said the Captain; and for a blind man, you
appear
to have a tolerable insight into things. But how
shall the truth and justice of the case be known in a
government?
It is not an easy matter, said the blind Lawyer;
or, as in the present conversation, I ought rather to
call him, the blind
politician
. For there are fanatics,
and there are designing men. The fanatic is an honest
creature, that thinks he is doing God's service; when
at the same time
he is undermining the pillars of the
constitution
. The designing man, sails with whatever
he finds to be the current: or, rather than let the
pool stagnate, he will excite a current. In order to
be something in a government, a man must do
something
.
There is little to be got by doing good; for all
feel the benefit; but no one enquires into the cause
. It
is by disorganization, that reputation is most easily
acquired. The introducing a new law, or the pulling
down an old magistrate, says Machiavel, are the
means by which a young person may distinguish
himself
in a commonwealth. Indeed, even an old person,
will find his account in shewing game. If he cannot
shew a panther, he must shew a hind, and raise the
talliho.
I do not know, whether you call a judge, a hind,
or a panther, said the Captain; but that seems to be
the game at present. Every one must have a whit at
a judge. No festival can be celebrated with suitable
patriotism, without a dash at the judiciary.
There is danger, said the politician, of running
down a branch of the government. It is a delicate
point to restrain and not to overthrow. Wrong or
excess terminates in the loss of liberty.
Individual injury may be done, said the Captain;
but the constitution is a barrier to usurpation.
Our constitutions are yet green, said the
politician
.
Inflexions are easy. It is construction makes
the constitution; and these vary with the men in
power
.
A witch at a mast head is not more dangerous,
than the spirit of ambition. A branch of the
government
,
is no more than a bramble bush before it. A
philosopher is at a loss to know whether to laugh or
shed tears, when he hears invectives against the
immediate
usurpers of a government, when the thing
had its foundation in the errors of the people a long
time before. It is like laying the death of a man
upon
death itself, instead of the primary causes which
had sown the seeds of his disease. The ambition of
individuals out of doors, and afterwards within doors,
to carry particular points, without looking to the
consequences
,
or overlooking them for the sake of the
immediate object, is the invisible gass, or poison,
that with a slow, or rapid process, ultimately
produces
fever, and brings on dissolution. Self-denial is
the great virtue of a republic. It is the opposite of
ambition. Self-denial looks only at justice. It looks
at the public good. Self-denial may not be
accompanied
with information; but it is ready to receive
information
It is not always an apt; but it is at least a
willing scholar. But inordinate self-love, begets
obstinacy
in the weak mind; and ambition in the strong;
both destructive of happiness, political, or personal.
I hear a sound, said the Captain, like that of many
tongues; and I see a man running, whose strides are
like those of my bog-trotter.
It was a tumult in the village occasioned by the
bog-trotter; though he could not be the cause of it.
Talk much about a thing, and you will put it into the
people's heads. The fact was, that in a meeting of
the citizens, it had been proposed a second time, to
make Teague a judge.
Make him a devil, said a rash man, geting angry.
A devil, let it be then, said the populace; and
while one went to get horns, and another hair, to
make a tail, the bog-trotter was left standing in the
midst. But he did not stand long; for understanding
what was about to be done with him, he slipped cable,
and shot a-head half a square, before the people were
under way to retake him.
His object was, to reach the Captain, and the
blind lawyer, whom he saw conversing at a distance.
But was under the necessity of making some doubles,
to elude his pursuers. At length, however, reaching
the scean gate, more fortunate than Hector, he threw
himself under the protection of the Captain; who
being
made acquainted with the cause of this uproar,
was beginning to expostulate with the rioters.
Captain, said they, Is it reasonable that the
people
should be checked in every thing they do? Was
it not enough for you, to throw cold water upon
making him a judge, or the editor of a Telegraphe;
but you must also obstruct his advancement to the
office of a devil.
D 2
Finding the people warm, the Captain thought it
prudent to lay the blame a little on the bog-trotter in
the first instance.
Teague, said he, This is the first promotion to
which I have ever known you to have the least
objection
.
Is it a false pride, or a false delicacy, that
induces
you to decline the appointment? Were it not
more advisable for you to accept your credentials;
the tail and horns, than, through an affected modesty,
to decline the commission; or at least carry the
matter
so far, as to be a fugitive from honour.
In a free government, said the blind lawyer, a man
cannot be said to have dominium directum, or an
absolute property in his own faculties. You owe
yourself
to the commonwealth. If the people have
discovered
in what capacity, you can best serve them, it
behooves you to submit, and accept the trust.
The bog-trotter, on the other hand, though he
could not yet speak from the fast running, was averse
from the proposition; not only on account of the
unbecoming
appearance of the badge of the office, but
lest if made a devil, in appearance, he should be taken
for one in reality. He might be claimed by Lucifer,
perhaps, and ordered upon duty, not having a liking
to the service; whether it might be to tempt good
people, or afflict the bad.
The fact is, he was taken by surprise; and even
when he got his breath, he stood gaping and at a loss
what to say. It appeared to him an unintelligible
matter, how he could be of any use to the
community
,
in the capacity of a devil; or how tails and horns,
should change the endowments of his mind, though
it did the appearance of his body. Hinting this, as
well as he could in broken sentences, he was
answered
by the populace; That he had made no
objection
of that kind when he had been made a judge; or
acted in that capacity; or when it was proposed to
put him at the head of a paper; that in fact, it was a
new thing from any candidate unless, indeed under an
affectation, and semblance of modesty, to alledge
want of parts, or inadaptation to a place of profit or of
power.
But perhaps it is the first time, said the Lawyer,
that it has been proposed to diabolize a man. Even
of offices that are known to the constitution, there are
some, which men of a liberal education, would wish
to decline; though, by the bye, it is not good policy
to decline an office because of the subordinate nature
of it; for submission to the will of the people, in this
respect, is a means of obtaining their suffrages at
another
time, to a more important station; wherefore I
would recommend it to the young man to turn devil,
since it is the public voice.
It will require no great change of mind, said the
Captain, to qualify him. The metamorphose need
only be of his body. His parts otherwise may stand
as they are. But I would ask, is it not a superfluous
alteration in the oeconomy of the world? Is not the
devil that is already made competent to all necessary
purposes. Why apply steam to propel a boat, unless
against the current?
It is true, said the Lawyer, we have it in all
indictments
moved by the instigation of the devil. And
there is no complaint of the want of a devil, to
instigate
indictments.
Were that the case, said the Captain, I should be
unwilling to withhold assistance even to do mischief
when the community required it. But all matters
appear to me to be going on pretty well towards
confusion
in this village. And why increase the number
of devils, I do not well comprehend.
Cui bono, said the Lawyer, of what use? Why
carry coals to New-Castle, or timber to the wood?
It appeared to the more reasonable that there was
good reason in this; and it was agreed to postpone
the making a devil at that time.
But it will not be understood that even the bulk of
the people really conceived that it was in their power
to constitute a devil with the qualities of one. They
had no idea of turning devil-makers, to that extent of
the composition. They had sense enough to know,
that all they could do was to give the form, and
appearance
of one. For however men of superior
standing
in society, may be disposed to undervalue the
common
people, and to reckon them fools, there are as
many knaves amongst them as fools, and perhaps
more, upon a nice scrutiny. These rogues who were
at the bottom of the business, meant no more than
their amusement with the public, and a little mirth
at the expence of the Captain. Nevertheless, the
matter had been carried so far, that had not the
Captain
and the blind Lawyer, assisted with their address,
and parried the proposition of devil-making by an
indirect
argument, the inutility of it, the matter must have
gone on, and a devil, in some sense of the word, must
have been made. For it may easily be conceived,
what a flame it would have raised to have stood
forward
boldly, and alledged that the idea of making a
devil was a wicked conception, and had its origin, in
a design to overthrow the government; that it was a
diabolical attempt, and they must be worse than devils,
into whose heads it had come. Nor would it have
mended the matter much, to have told them that they
were themselves devils, or at least, do the work of
devils in hostility to churches, and schools of learning.
For as by the application of mechanical powers we
gain a force above the direct strength of a man, so
by that mode of speech and reasoning, which flatters
self-love, and hides the application that is intended.
Men deserve great credit, who by skill in science, have
lessened labour; who by the invention of useful tools,
have rendered the life of man more comfortable upon
this globe. But they deserve not less praise, who by
study and reflection have rendered themselves
capable
of managing the minds of men. This is the art
of oratory, which consists not in length of speech, or
melody of voice, or beauty of diction; but in wise
thoughts: and here our orators from the schools fail.
Men of business learn to take things by the right
handle, and to speak with a single view to persuade.
You might as well expect good liquors without
fermentation
,
as a man of real sense without experience in
life. Doubtless all experience will not of itself suffice.
There must be a substratum, or layer of judgment to
begin with, in order to make a man of sense. Some
may ask me of what use it is to have recorded these
freaks of the town's people? It is not pretended that
it is of any use, farther than to keep my fingers going.
But is not that something to a man's self?
There is
a pleasure in writing, which only the man who writes
knows
. Yet I believe no man would write, unless he
expected somebody to read. His own reading would
be small if he did not expect to have it found out that
he had read. Thus self-love is, in a great degree, the
spring of all things. Is it nothing to be able to shew
how easily I can elevate small matters? That is the
very reason why I assume this biography. Any one
can write the campaign of a great prince, because
the subject sustains the narrative. But it is a greater
praise to give a value to the rambles of private
persons
,
or the dissentions of a borough town. One
advantage
is, that these transactions being in a narrow
campass, the truth can be reached with more
certainty
,
the want of which is a drawback upon histories
of a greater compass, most of them being little better
than the romance of the middle ages, or the modern
novel,
Having premised thus much, we go on to a fact
that took place the following Sunday.
CHAP. VI.
THERE had been so much said of devil-making,
in the village, for the last two or three days, that it
had come to the ears of the clergyman, who became
alarmed; and thought he had as many devils on his
hands already as he well knew what do with; not
alluding
to the devil in the Scripture; but to the
diabolicism
of wicked men. He chose a text therefore
from which he could draw inferences on this subject;
a passage of the Scripture which might seem to have
an allusion to the devil they had been about to make
the preceding week, and at the same time, furnish a
clue to some illustrations of the text. The words
fixed
upon, were those in the book of Job.
And Satan came also among them.
It so happened, that just at the giving out the text,
the bog-trotter with his walking pole, made his
appearance
at the west end of the church, which the
people seeing, and mistaking him for that devil of
which the parson spoke, rose as one man, and called
out the devil. For it was seldom that Teague had
come to church; but the Captain had enjoined it
upon
him that day, to see what reformation it might
produce
in his life, and conversation. It was unfortunate
that the clergyman, in pronouncing the word, had
happened to direct his eye toward that end of the
church at which Teague was; which drew the
attention
of the people to the same quarter; and hence the
impression, as sudden as it was universal.
As from a theatre, where the scenery has taken
fire, there is an effort to escape, and the spectators
rush in every direction; so on the present occasion.
The greater part had got out, and were at some
distance
from the church, in disorder, the deacons
endeavouring to rally them like officers, the flying
squadrons of a routed army; but in vain; the panic
had been so great, that every one was willing to make
the best of his way, from the scene of action.
The Clergyman himself, was not a little terrified,
thinking that, contrary to expectation, the devil had
come among them; and though he himself had seen
nothing of him with the naked eye, yet that he had
been visible to the congregation. Accordingly he
had made his escape at an early period of the flight,
and was on a hill, apart in the rear of the church, at
prayers; with his eyes open; not shut, as was his
custom, for on this occasion, he had thought it
advisable
to have a look out, not knowing what might heave
in sight, before he had concluded.
The clerk being a lame man, had sat still in the
desk, and given out a Psalm, so that of the whole, he
E
was the only one who could be said to remain at his
post.
The bog-trotter, was under a more unfortunate
mistake; for he took it for granted, from the words
of the clergyman which he had heard, and from the
alarm of the people, that he had in reality undergone
a change, and had become a devil. His endeavour,
therefore, was to fly from himself; like one whose
clothes are on fire. His howling and shouting, like
that of a beaten dog, increased the disturbance, and
his own peturbation. He was a mile from the village
before he ventured to look back; and even then, he
did not stop, but continued his rout to a greater
distance
in the country; at the same time not convinced
fully of his metamorphose; for puting his hand to his
head, he could feel no horn, nor a tail behind his back,
though he endeavoured to catch at this also. Hence
it was, that he thought it proper to extricate himself,
and ascertain at his leisure, the real state of the case,
as to his being what he was, and the idiosincracy
of his existence.
Certain it is the bog-trotter had no great intrinsic
value in the qualities of his head, or heart;
nevertheless
,
from habit or some other principle, the
Captain had conceived some attachment to him; and
was uneasy at his disappearing, especially under the
late circumstances; not knowing what might befall
him from a mistake of characters. In the present
state of the public mind, with regard to the judiciary,
it might happen to him to be viewed again under that
aspect, and be laid hold upon as before, and put in
fear of his life. Nor was it a thing morally certain
that he might not become a trespasser himself, if not
upon the persons, at least upon the property of men.
The want of food might tempt him to rob hen-roosts,
or break spring-houses, which are used as dairies, or
to keep meats fresh, in the summer season. On these
grounds, he thought it both for the public good, and
that of the individual, to endeavour to reclaim, and
bring him back. As to the idea of his turning
hermit
,
which some thought probable, it never came into
the head of the Captain. For though he knew that
disappointments in love or in ambition, have
oftentimes
made hermits, yet this must have taken place
in the case of persons of greater sensibility than had
ever been discovered in the bog-trotter. Misanthropy
is sometimes the natural characteristic of the mind;
but more generally the offspring of extreme
benevolence
,
hurt by ingratitude. Hence it ought to be
inculcated
to indulge even benevolence, with
moderation
;
and to be careful against sanguine expectations
of gratitude, from those served. Be not weary in
well doing to others, even though a correspondent
mind in those served, does not always shew itself.
But for the sake of self-preservation, it is unsafe to
count too much upon the fruit which good acts may
produce. The seed does not always fall upon good
soil, and the seasons may blight the crop. But the
anchorite is not usually made out of such as Teague
O'Regan, who had rather be among men, geting flesh
and fowl to eat, than living on vegetables in the woods,
and drinking the element of water from the pure rock;
or to trace the matter somewhat farther back, as we
have already hinted, where the natural mind does not
find its enjoyments, in the association of the happiness of
others with its own.
The whole village appeared to take an interest in
the uneasiness of the Captain, from the loss of his
servant
.
The young man who had set up the pole-cat to
counteract the paper of Porcupine, had gone out in
quest of him, and from his knowledge of the woods,
looking for cats, could more readily than others, go to
such recesses, or point out such caverns, as might be
expected to receive him.
The blind Lawyer and Fidler had paid the
Captain
a visit, to console him, the one with his violin;
the other with his conversation. The blind Lawyer
made light of the matter, and thought that taking to
his trotters, was the best thing that Teague O'Regan
could have done; and that the leaving the village,
for a time, though operating in the nature of exile,
yet carried nothing more with it, than had happened
in the case of Aristides among the Greeks, or
Marcellus
among the Romans; and illustrious characters
of all countries, who avoiding envy or yielding to
unjust
prosecution, had been under the necessity of
abandoning their country for a period. Some indeed
had spent the remainder of their lives in foreign
countries
;
and were buried by people, who formed a juster
estimate of their merits, than their ungrateful
countrymen
,
whose happiness had been advanced by their
wise counsels, or heroic actions. But that in the case
of the bog-trotter, there was great reason to believe,
not only that he would be well received by the
neighbouring
states; but that in due time he would be
recalled
to the bosom of his country, with feelings of a
contrary
nature; but in proportion to the ignominy of his
exit.
The Captain felt a degree of consolation from the
observations; but at the same time, could not avoid
expressing his regret that he had not favoured the
ragamuffin
,
throughout, in his pretensions to become an
editor of a gazette; and the proposition of the
citizens
,
to put him at the head of a paper; for though
it might have subjected him to a kick, or a cuff, now,
and then, for a blackguard paragraph, yet he would
have avoided the danger of being taken, as had been
the case, for a judge, or a devil.
But, said the blind Lawyer, as you intended it, for
the best, though it has turned out otherwise; yet there
is no reason, why you should blame yourself; or that
others should find fault. Time and chance
happeneth
to all men. In the capacity of editor, he would
E 2
have been subject to indictments for libels, to which
a want of an accurate knowledge of law in matters of
written slander, might have rendered him liable. He
had some legal knowledge, I presume; having
studied
,
not at the temple, but in this country, perhaps
with more advantage; for I believe it is pretty well
understood
,
that temple study is not of much account.
He understands about as much law, as my horse,
said the Captain; for which reason it was the greater
burlesque to talk of making him a judge. Unless
indeed
all legal knowledge, should be put down, and men
should determine by their own arbitrary notions of
right and wrong, independent of rules, and
principles
.
As to the making him a judge, said the Lawyer, I
do not take it there ever was any thing serious in it;
and even as to the present obloquy against the law,
I am disposed to think, the current has in a great
degree
spent itself. Accusation and condemnation are
not the same thing. It is no new thing to see
accusation
and condemnation mean the same, under an
arbitrary
government. Indeed in a government of laws,
we have seen the power of aristocracy, the influence
of wealth and office, exerting itself, and sometimes
succeeding in running down the accused; so that
while they enjoyed the name, they were deprived of
the substance of trial. Even in a democracy, not in
name only, but in fact, ambitious men have misled,
and pretending the public good, have had in view,
their own purposes. But in the free and equal
representation
of a larger borough, and before a deliberate
tribunal, it is contrary to moral probability that
accusation
and condemnation, will come to be considered
as the same thing. Adversaries may pretend this;
and in order to bring a slur upon a republican
administration
,
may even wish it
. But it is not in the
common
course of things that it should be the case.
I do not know, said the Captain; I have not read
a great deal of history, antient or modern, to be able
to take a view of the judicial proceedings in the case
of public men in republican governments; but there
is a difference in this borough, from the antient
republics
,
in the matter of
representation
. In the Forum
of Rome, the people themselves assembled; and
heard the cause. They had not to look over the
shoulder to see how the constituent, who was not
within
hearing, stood affected; or to reflect in their own
minds, how an acquittal would be taken by the voters,
who had prejudged the case, and had said,
that the officer
must be brought down
. Do you think Sylla, on his
abdication
,
would have offered to submit the necessity of his
proscriptions, to the people
in a representative
capacity
?
And yet, said the lawyer, the chances for justice,
would seem to be in favour of a body removed from
the multitude, and approaching more a
Select Tribu
nal
. But the fact is, there is no perfection in any
human institution. It is the Judge only of all the
earth, that can at all times do right.
It is a great thing to have no private views, and to
have
conscience;
so that no enmity can warp, or
dislike
mislead.
Understanding
also, is requisite to
confine
the consideration to the charge, laying out of the
view collateral suggestions. For if Cinna has not
conspired, he ought not to be
torn for his bad verses
.
But if justice cannot find
a certain residence in a
democratic government; she must leave the earth
. I
despair of finding it any where else. But I have felt
tyranny
, or have thought that I have felt it, even in
the courts of justice. I had thought that I had felt it,
and left a certain bar prematurely on that account: so
that I am not one of those who lean against
the
investigation
of judicial conduct
. It is my object only to assist
the democracy, with general observations; and by the
democracy, I mean not so much the tribunals that are
to judge,
as the people that delegate the judgment
.
It will be a great matter, that the judgment given,
be able to stand the examination of law and reason,
abroad and at home. High cases will come down to
posterity, and fix the character of the administration.
Liberty will be affected as posterity will approve or
reverse the judgment. That is a high and
transcendant
court, with whom it lies to
judge judges;
and
lessons
of high honour and discernment from that court,
will have an effect upon the streams of justice
to the remotest fountains. If the
understanding
of such paramount tribunals, appear not beyond
suspicion
,
from the decision given, it will be a great hurt.
The really guilty may afterwards escape from an odium
brought upon the prosecution
.
An accusation will be less readily sustained, when
accusation
, and
condemnation
, should ever that happen,
comes to be considered as the
same thing
.
CHAP. VII.
NOTHING had been yet heard from the pole-cat
man, who had gone in quest of the bog-trotter; nor
from any other quarter, could the Captain learn the
place of his banishment. Had he known where to
find him, he could have sent him some books to read,
suited to his present situation, and his state of mind.
Bolingbroke on exile; Boethius, his consolation of
Philosophy; these, though he could not read himself,
he could get others to read to him; unless indeed, he
should have happened to have fallen into a very
illiterate
part of the country; or where the German only
was spoken; and so these books which are written in
English, could not be read; the last was written in
Latin; but translated into English. Not having books
to read, he would have to amuse himself with
nine-men's-morrice
,
or cross-the-crown, in the sand, or
upon chalked boards. Perhaps this might answer the
purpose as well to an uncultivated mind, as
dissertations
of wisdom in manuscript, or print. Business is
perhaps the best assuager of melancholy; but the
indolence
of the Owran-Outang, as he may be called,
speaking characteristically, would hinder him from
using this means of cheating his imagination.
Laziness
was his fort; and there was reason to believe,
that he knew it, and would stick to it.
The Captain, however, was not unattentive in his
enquiries in the mean time, and hearing of a conjurer
that had come to town; not having much faith in his
art, but in compliance with the wishes of some who
suggested it, he thought proper to consult this wise
man, and gain from him such discoveries as he might
think proper to communicate. Not that he imagined
Teague had got among the stars, and taken his
station
with the Crab, or the Lyon. But this conjurer,
having more to do with bringing back stolen horses,
or lost goods, than casting nativities, it might fall in
his way, to ascertain the track of the bog-trotter.
The fact was, that O'Regan had been met with by
the conjurer, on his way to the village, and had been
taken into his service as one that seemed to answer
his purpose for an understrapper, having some
knowledge
of the town, and capable of acting the part of
an under devil, whom he might occasionally raise,
and interrogate upon the state of affairs at home, or
abroad. The hair that had been intended for the
devils
tail, sufficed now; for Teague pointed it out the
evening they came into the village; and the horns
were at hand, which had been provided for a former
service.
In the capacity of assistant conjurer, O'Regan
played
his part in the commencement, well; and the
ladies coming to consult, had some things told them
that had happened; a circumstance that gave them
full confidence in the information given with regard to
things to come. It was this that had raised the credit
of the conjurer, and made his art the subject of
general
conversation. For the tongue of a woman is an
excellent promulgator in all that relates to secrets.
There was a widow lady of great fortune, that
wished to see her second husband. The visage of the
Captain, just coming in, was reflected from the
mirror
,
and she saw him.
My dear husband, said she, it must, it will be so.
If the stars have ordained it, there is no getting over
it. I shall be happy how soon it can be brought about.
Can you tell conjurer, how long it will be before the
knot is tyed. How valuable an art it is that can so
easily relieve doubts. By this time she had the
Captain
round the neck, and was kissing him, without
regard
to the company.
The Captain, from natural delicacy, or a good
education, was unwilling to repel the caresses of a
lady
;
at the same time, thought he could not in honour
take advantage of the mistake, under which she
appeared
to labour; but on the contrary, explained to her on
principles of optics, the manner in which his
physiognomy
had been reflected from the lense, and that
it would require another experiment to ascertain the
real husband, which the stars intended.
The conjurer admitted, that his glass had not yet
been applyed to discover invisibles; that in fact, he
had been only bringing it to bear, when the face of the
Captain intercepting the vision.
The lady was satisfied, and disposed to reconcile
herself to the real designation of celestial powers,
conceiving it in vain to struggle with destiny; and
therefore desired the conjurer to lose no time; but to
manifest to her the real object of her hopes.
Applying her eye to the glass, she saw a face that
she did not greatly dislike; for it had the appearance
of freshness, and contentment; but she saw
horns
.
Horns! said she. What can this mean?
Mean, said the Captain; every one knows the
meaning of the emblem. Antlers is a common place
figure for cuckoldom; and that would seem to have
been the case with the poor man in his former wife's
time.
The lady was glad to find the allusion had passed
ascant from herself; as indeed it could not well be
made to her; not being yet married to the
gentleman
.
In fact it was the bog-trotter, who instead of
raising
a picture in the Comera Obscura, had thrust his
own head into the box; and having just before affixed
his tail, and put on his horns, the last were visible
in that quarter, when he presented his physiognomy
through the magic lantern, of the conjurer. His
curiosity
F
to see the lady, had led him to do this; and
expecting that the conversation, before the scenes,
would have lasted longer, before she began to look,
he was surprized, and had not withdrawn his head.
The lady requested the conjurer to inform her,
what length of time her future spouse, would be in
coming down from the constellations.
It is not in our power to determine the orbits of
fortune, said the conjurer; but simply the phases of
the planetary changes.
I should like your faces better, said the lady, if
you would bring them down without horns.
This face that the stars have shewn, said the
conjurer
,
is in the crescent; but if you come a day or
two hence, he may be at the full, and without horns.
In the crescent, or at the full, said the lady, let
us have him soon, since it is what I am to have. So
saying, she withdrew.
The Captain stepped up to put his questions
relative
to the bog-trotter; and explaining at full length,
the circumstance of his absconding, wished to know
the place of his seclusion, and the means of his
recaption
.
He is in my service, said the conjurer, acting the
part of the devil, and is the very figure with the
horns, which the lady that just now left us, has
mistaken
for her future husband; at the same time
explained
to the Captain, the circumstances under which
he found the vagrant, and the manner in which he
had accoutred him for the part he had to act; and
also
how it came to pass that he had got his head into
the box, and shewn his horns, which had given
umbrage
to the lady. He gave him also to understand,
that he had found him a tolerably expert devil; that
he carried his horns, and his tail well; that he had
raised him frequently, in the capacity of devil, since
he came to town, and was to raise him that evening
to some young men who had appointed to consult
him on love matters; that if the Captain would wait,
he might see him play his part, and judge of his
dexterity
in his new office.
As when in an epilepsy, the eye is fixed in the
head, and presents a motionless stare, so look'd the
Captains' at this crisis. He was astonished at the
deception of the fortune teller, and the vagaries of
his waiter; this last adventure had exceeded all the
rest. He could not avoid expressing his
disapprobation
of the foul play which had been shewn the lady;
and the fraud which had been put upon her, shewing
his bog-trotter for a person designated by the
heavenly
bodies, to be her partner in matrimony; and still
more, the iniquity of inveigling an ignorant creature,
to take upon him the character of devil; a masque
which he had been endeavouring to avoid, even at the
risk of leaving the village; but what especially gave
him pain, was the immorality of the occupation into
which he had been led, picking peoples pockets
under
a pretext of discovering things unknown, while
in reality, the whole was an imposition. It was of
lighter consideration that he had degraded himself, and
stooped beneath his former designation, and objects
of ambition.
However, as the conjurer had him in his service,
and some claim upon him, probably to fulfil his
engagement
,
for the season, what could he say, or do?
Contracts must be complied with; unless, indeed, the
unlawfulness of the service, might relieve, from the
condition. For this, it would be necessary to consult
the blind lawyer; and for which purpose, he took his
leave, and withdrew.
The blind Lawyer, was of opinion, no prior
contract
with the subordinate, existing, having been but
a servant at will, no habeas corpus, or other legal
process could lie on the part of the Captain, to take
him out of the hands of the conjurer; and as to the
unlawfulness of the service, that must be a plea in the
bog-trotters own mouth, and not in that of another
for him. Doubtless it was a fraud upon the public: but
the people themselves became a party, by consulting
the wizard, and no action would lie to recover money
back so thrown away. For potior est conditio
possidentis
.
But in foro conscienti, it might be a
question
whether it was a wrong to trick people that were
willing to be tricked. Si populus vult decipi,
decipiatur
.
The Captain thought it an immorality, to take
such advantage of the credulity of the young, and the
ignorant; or even of old fools; for truth, sincerity,
and plain dealing, was the basis of morality.
A quid pro quo, in all contracts, said the Lawyer,
is doubtless, necessary. There must be a
consideration
.
But it is not necessary that this be a substantial
equivalent. One promise may be the consideration
of another. Amusement is a consideration of a great
part of our stipulations. Can any thing amuse more
than fair hopes?
The pleasure is as great,
Of being cheated, as to cheat.
I am not able to argue with a lawyer, said the
Captain, especially on principles of law; but this
much I know, that the conjurer engages to perform
what he cannot do, that is, to tell fortunes, and
therefore
deceives. Hence he is what I call a rogue. Now
that my bog-trotter, low as he is, should be an
apprentice
to a rogue, or worse, an assistant and partner
in iniquity, is a reflection upon me, who have brought
him here; and independent of this, there is the
degradation
of turning devil. A printer's devil, we all
know, means, the lad that cleans the types, or puts
on the black-ball; but this is a different sort of
personage
;
and actually wears horns, and is in the
semblance
of Belzebub; or at least in that representation
of him, which the painters give.
F 2
As to degradation, said the blind Lawyer, that is
matter of opinion. If we recur to popular language,
and take our ideas of an honourable calling from
common
parlance, we shall find nothing of higher
estimation
in grade of profession, than that of the conjurer;
we say of a physician, he is no conjurer; of a lawyer,
he is no conjurer; and so on of other occupations,
meaning that however eminent, any one may be, still
he falls behind the conjurer. But in a republican
government, the trade or employment of a man, is
but little considered. The great matter is, the profits
of it. Does it make the pot boil? If the bog-trotter
finds his account in the service, and makes money,
the world will wink at the means.
To act the part of a devil may be sinful; as a
divine
would say; but as to honour, I do not know it
to be any impeachment to be a devil. The greater
the devil, the better the fellow. It is a cause of
challenge
to call a man a knave; but not to say he is a
devil.
The Captain discovered that the lawyer was
disposed
to be playful, and not serious; and droped the
conversation; still hurt in his mind at the catastrophe,
his subordinate itinerant, who had been on the
pinnacle
of fortune, in point of expectation, having fallen
so low; and gone so far astray, in his pursuits. But
a change was given to his meditations, when, in the
mean time, the bog-trotter appeared, without tail or
horns; or a whole shirt upon his back. He had lost
all these in a scuffle with the conjurer, about the
division
of the profits. A misunderstanding had also
taken place on the subject of alternating offices, the
deputy insisting that he should change places
occasionally
with the master, who should act the devil in
his turn. This the principal refused to do, and hence
the disagreement, which had come to blows, was the
cause of a separation.
CHAP. VIII.
POPULAR obloquy and reproach, had fallen
upon
the Captain, in consequence of his waiter having
been with the conjurer, and acting in the capacity of
devil. Though, by the bye, it was the people
themselves
that had brought the thing about by the
masqueing him with tail and horns. So inconsistent
is the multitude, that they blame to-day what they
themselves have caused yesterday. The Captain
being
hurt at this, and willing to clear off reflections,
for the future, determined to deliver up the
bog-trotter
to themselves, to make of him what they thought
proper. Accordingly having called a town meeting,
and bidding Teague follow him, and addressing,
more particularly, the officers of the incorporation, he
spoke as follows:
Fellow citizens, said he, here is that young man,
whom you have made a devil of in this town; for it
was you that made him a devil, and yet you blame
me, as accessary to the wickedness; or rather, the
principal in the act. Now here he is, strip'd of his
tail and horns; and, I will not say, like the sun,
shorn of his beams, for that would be too elevated
a simile; nor like Sampson, shorn of his hair;
for that would be also pompous. But I will say, like
yourselves, without superfluous incumbrance. Take
him therefore into your custody, and under your
protection
;
and hew him into what ever shape you may
chuse; fashion him as you please. Make him the
editor
of a newspaper; or transform him even to a judge
of your courts. I shall not stand in the way of his
promotion, or of your will any longer.
It was evident that the first impressions of the
people, were favourable to the proposition; and that
they took in good part, the condescension of the
Captain
to the public voice. But a factious man, in a
leathern pair of breeches, who had never had an
opportunity
before of making himself heard, rose to
speak. Captain, said he, Is it fair to attempt a
burlesque
on the democracy, by intruding your servant
on the public mind, for a post of profit, or of honour.
It is true, the greater part of us, are but plain men,
and illiterate, if you chuse to have it so; but yet, it
is to be hoped, we are not just so hard run for persons
capable of civil employments among ourselves, as to
be under the necessity of recurring to your bog-trotter.
Heavens! said the Captain, roused a little in his
mind; for he was not apt to swear; has it not been
yourselves, that have proposed the matter, and
brought all the trouble on my head respecting it?
I did, it is true, in the first instance, suggest the idea
of puting him at the head of a paper; but it was
without consideration; and I retracted it, both in my
own judgment, and in my words, to you, immediately
after. For though the press has been degraded,
by
such as he is, in that capacity
, yet I was not willing
to contribute to the like evil. The making him a
judge came from yourselves; it was an idea that
never started in my brains. It was your own burlesque,
not mine.
Why should I undervalue democracy; or be
thought to cast a slur upon it; I that am a democrat
myself. What proof have I given you of this;
My
works shew my faith
. It is true, I have not
undervalued
learning, or exclaimed against lawyers; or joined
in the cry of down with the judges; but, take the
tenor of my life and conversation, since the foundation
of the village. I was at the first settlement of it. Did
I engross lots of ground? Has there been a necessity
for an agrarian law in my case? Have I speculated
on the wants of men, by forestalling, or regrating?
Have I
made haste to be rich?
That is, have I
overstepped
the common means of industry? Do I
value
myself on my fine clothing? Do I indulge in
luxurious
living? Is my hat off to a rich man, sooner
than to the poor? Do I oppress the stranger; or
rather do I not assist him, and invite him to our
habitations
?
Who has heard me call out against
foreigners
or fixing a prejudice against emigrants?
Captain, said an Irish gentleman, coming forward,
and beckoning with his hand; all dis, dat you tel us,
is very well. But is it a genteel ting, to trow a
ridicule
upon de whole Irish nation, by carrying about
wid you, a bog-trotter, just as you would an allegator;
or some wild cratur dat you had catched upon the
mountains, to make your game of paple dat have de
same brogue upon deir speech; and de same dialect
upon deir tongues, as he has? By de holy faders, it
is too much in a free country, not to be suffered
Phelim, said another of the same nation,
interrupting
him, but a man of more sense, and liberality;
you are a fool, said he, Phelim; if you were my
own born broder, I would say so. You are a fool;
de Captain means to trow no ridicule upon de nation.
Gentlemen of all countries laugh at deir own fools,
and make jokes upon dem; not to shew de follies of
de nation; but of human nature. In Dublin, we have
our jokes upon our Dermots, and our Thadys, and de
devil a duel about it; nor in dis country neider; wid
men that have travelled and can give a joke, and take
one, just for de sake of peace and quietness, and good
fellowship, and ateing and drinking, which is much
better dan breaking heads, wid sticks, or skivering
one anoder wid bits of iron, de call cutlashes; or
snapping
pistols, for notting at all, but de humour of de
ting; when I can see no humour in it but folly, and
nonsense: so hold your tongue Phelim, and let de
Captain spake; I like to hear him, very well. You
might as well take exceptions to Don Quixotte,
because
he had his Sancho, and would make him a
governor
if dere was any ridicule in it, it is upon dese
paple demselves, dat are so imposed upon, to make a
bog-trotter a justice of de peace, or a judge; and not
upon de nation of Ireland, dat have men of sense, and
fools like oder nations. Commend me to de fun o'
de ting. I like de joke very well. De burlesque
consits in comparing de high wid de low, and de low
wid de bigh: and de dialogues, and spaches mark de
charcters. It is de high dat is ridiculed, and not de
low; when you compare de low wid it. De books
and travels will tache you dat, Phelim. Let de
Captain
spake widout interruptions; and tell his story.
I like to hear de Captain spake very well.
Far be it from me, continued the Captain, to
undervalue
Ireland, or to mean disrespect to the nation.
On the contrary, it was from good will to the people,
that I have taken the notice of this young man, that
I have. Much less have I intended a reflection upon
a democratic government, in the countenance I have
given to the proposition of advancing him in grades,
and occupations.
Nor is it democracy, that I have
meant to expose; or reprehend, in any thing that I
have said; but the errors of it: those excesses which
lead to its overthrow
. These excesses have shewn
themselves in all democratic governments; whence
it is that a
simple
democracy has never been able to
exist long. An experiment is now made in a new
world, and upon better principles; that of
representation
and a more perfect separation, and near equipoise of the
legislative, judicial, and executive powers
. But the
balance
of the powers, is not easily preserved.
The
natural
tendency is to one scale
. The demagogue is the
first great destroyer of the constitution by deceiving
the people. He is no democrat that deceives the
people
.
He is an aristocrat; and seeks after more power
than is just. He will never rest short of despotic rule.
Have I deceived the people? Why then am I
suspected
of a want of patriotism, and good will to the
people. Why am I charged with ridicule at their
expence
,
who wish nothing more than to inform their
understanding, and regulate their conduct.
But is it not presumption in you, Captain, to
undertake
this, in any shape? said a man, with a shrill
voice. Is it not an insult upon the people, to suppose
that they can err: or supposing it, that you can set
them right?
It is too much to bear, said a third person, with a
grey coat. I am for repressing all such presumption.
It leads to aristocracy.
The blind Lawyer got up to speak.
We will hear no lawyer, said a man with a long
chin,
and a pale visage.
It is the blind Lawyer, said a friend to the
Captain
.
G
Blind, or pur blind, said the man with the pale
visage
,
we shall hear no lawyer here. The Captain has
bred a great deal of disturbance, since he returned to
the village. He has opposed us in every thing that
we proposed to do. No reform can be carried on, but
he must have his objections, and exceptions from the
nature of government. Just as, if the making, or
keeping up a government, was a thing of mixture, and
composition like a doctor's drug. As if a man must
learn it, as he would to make a watch; or to keep it
in repair like a clock. Can there be any thing more
simple than
for the people just to govern themselves?
What needs all this talk of checks and balances?
Why keep up laws, and judges, at an expence, as if the
people were not competent to give laws, and to judge
for themselves?
Ye need na' mind the Captain, said Duncan,
coming
forward, having a regard for him, and seeing him
in a delicate predicament, the anger of the people
kindling; ye need na' mind the Captain, said he,
for
he's no right in his head
. He has got some kink in his
intellect, that gars him conceit strange things. I was
his waiter twa'ree months; and I found him a wee
thing cracked; and ye canna weel but find it sae,
when ye tak a look at his vagaries, and imaginations.
Just let him go about his business, and mind your ain
affairs. It wad be a shame to fa' out wi' a man,
that's no right in his head
.
If that be the case, said a man with a brown wig,
great allowance ought to be made. None of
ourselves
can tell how long, our natural reason may be
continued to us. To be sure, he talks like a man that
is not just himself. But we did not know but that it
might be a disguise to conceal his views; a masque
of simplicity the better to introduce monarchy.
Gentlemen, said the Captain, there is now nothing
more difficult for a man, than to prove that he is not
mad. For the very attempt to prove it, admits that
it may be doubted; or at least that it is doubted.
Besides
I shall not contradict Duncan, who, I am
persuaded
believes what he says. But since my services
amongst you, at present, do not seem to have been well
received, though from my heart, well intended, I will
leave you for a while, and call off the bog-trotter to
another ramble. Considering it as a banishment in
fact, though not in name; and adopting the language
of some under like circumstances, I will wish,
that the
village may never have occasion to remember me or my
observations
.
CHAP. IX.
THE Captain being obliged to leave the village,
was now about to renew his travels; not, as
heretofore
,
on a voluntary excursion, but in the capacity of
an exile. He was accompanied as usual, with the
bog-trotter; and with several others of the village;
who were willing to share his fortunes in some new
establishment. Amongst these were the blind
lawyer
and fidler; Clonmel the ballad singer; the latin
schoolmaster; O'Fin, an Irishman; Tom the Tinker,
and others: the Captain mounted; the rest on foot.
A blind mare, with a pack-saddle, served to carry their
provisions. This was the whole caravan which was
about to set out for the new settlement.
After two days traveling, they came to a town,
where judges and lawyers continued yet to be
tolerated
.
Nevertheless a judge, just before, had been
driven
from the bench, owing to a fracas that had
happened
on the bench itself, with a brother judge, and
which took its rise from a difference relative to idiom,
and dialect of language. The one was a Scotch
gentleman
,
and spoke with the Saxon pronounciation;
which is still that of the north of England, and the
south of Scotland, The other was a native of France,
and had acquired the English language after his
arrival
in this country, some years before. The Scotch
judge found fault with the gallicisms of his French
associate
,
and said he did na' like the accent, and that it
was an error to bring it on the bench. That it did na'
behoove (the French judge) to open his mouth to give
a charge, especially to a grand jury, wi' sic' a dialec'
upon his gab. The French judge seemed to think
that his gallicisms were as good as the other's patois,
or scoticisms; and observed that the French language
had a footing in the courts, and was even the language
of the law itself, at a very early period. A great part
of the law of the tenure of real property, came from
the Normans, who were French; that England
became
almost a French country under William the
conqueror; that the terms de la loi, or law phrases,
are vestiges of French to this day. Cestui que use: in
pleadings, ne unque accouple en loyal matremonie;
antre fouis acquit, tout tems prit, and many others. Are
there any vestiges of broad Scotch in the law books?
Aye, quo' the Scotch judge, the law was Saxon
before it was French; and it is time that it should
come back to the Saxon again. Ye sha' na' deliver a
charge on this bench, unless ye adap' your language
to the state of society and speak plain English, or
Saxon
;
for they are a' the same thing; and ha' the same
privilege in a' courts of justice.
G 2
The French judge began to address the jury;
when the Scotch judge interrupted, and called a
constable
to take him down
frea the bench
.
The French judge being a choleric man, laid hold
of him by the waist-band of the breeches, and the nape
of the neck, and whirled him with a contortion of the
body from the seat of justice, amongst the lawyers of
the bar. His body having a rotatory motion, and his
legs diverging like the spokes of a wheel, his heels
flew round, and one of them hit the clerk on the nose,
and a barrister above the brow; and caused great
disturbance
,
to the fear and terror of the suitors, and
other good citizens of the commonwealth. The
result
was, that the Scotch judge had to leave the bench
altogether, and go to the bar. The French judge in
the mean time had been sent to Congress. Hence it
was, that a vacancy existed in the place of judge; or
rather two vacancies; but the main difficulty was to
get a
chief justice; or president
. The Captain made
mention of the blind lawyer, whom he had in
company
;
but they were unwilling to have a blind man.
They wished to have a perfect judge; or one at least
in possession of all his outward senses. He then
proposed
the bog-trotter; stating that he had been in
request
for that promotion, before they had set out from
the midland country.
The offer was accepted, and Teague was made a
judge, and took his seat upon the bench.
The Captain had determined with himself, that he
would oppose the advancement of this Teague
O'Regan
no more, having got so much ill-will by it.
Nevertheless
he thought it not amiss to put him under the
care of the blind lawyer, or for some time to give him
instructions for the office, which at least could do him
no harm, if it did no good. Accordingly the lawyer
took him in tow, and began as follows.
Teague, said he, you are arrived to honour and
emolument, which some of your betters have
deserved
,
and could not obtain. However, time and chance
happeneth to all men. You are now on the seat of
justice; and it remains for you, if possible, to
qualify
yourself for it. For I take it, you are yet to begin
to obtain the requisites for the discharge of that trust.
Now I have no idea that you can acquire legal
knowledge
.
That is out of the question. Nor do I think
it possible that you can ever attain the first elements
of jurisprudence. But this is not absolutely
necessary
upon the bench, more than at the bar. I have
known a judge upon a bench, whom I would not trust
with the value of a hob nail, in a cause of mine. It
would be a substitute for sense if you could cite cases.
But you have not even cases to cite, and call
authorities
.
You must therefore begin a peg lower, and
content yourself
with the saving appearances, merely
personal
. Your gate must be steady; your demeanour
slow, gravity is a great cover for stupidity;
stupidity
,
indeed supplies the place, and in most cases, gives
gravity. But still it is to be cultivated. You must
wear spectacles, to make people think you can read.
If you do not take notes; yet seem to take them; for
it is the fashion of the time, to be a great note taker.
At least talk of your notes; that will pass for taking
them. The Areopagi took no notes; for they sat in
the night, and had no candle light. And
justice
herself
is said to be blind
, and can take no notes. But
note taking is now the main part of the qualification
of a judge; so that if you do not take notes, you must
seem to take them. I myself, had I been appointed
a judge, would have had to scratch a little. My fidler
might have been a good assistant to me in note taking,
had he not been blind too; for having the use of his
elbow on the fiddle, he could scratch notes with great
rapidity, could he write; but that he could not do, nor
read either. So that I should have been as much at a
loss as you in this particular. But it would not be
impossible for you, as you have your eyesight, to
learn to write Abracadabra, Tantarara, and pass them
for notes. However, if you cannot acquire all
excellencies
,
you can avoid some defects. You can give
attention, and seem to understand what is said in
argument
,
though it be impossible that you should
understand
a syllable. It is a great indelicacy in a
gentleman
to refuse his ear, or to shew himselsf
inattentive
in private conversation. But in a judge it is
intolerable
,
when you are to decide upon a point which
is argued with much earnestness at the bar, and where
the council expect at least that you will hear them,
even if you should not decide in their favour. For
when they are heard, and are satisfied that they are
understood, they are disposed to be content. But it is
an error of which I hope you will not be capable, to
interrupt the argument by matters of your own
concern
.
As for instance, when an advocate is at the
pinching point of his reasoning, to call out for the
crier, to bring you something. You will see the
advocate
in such a case, turn and writhe himself, and
shew, in his countenance, the irritation that he feels.
But he is obliged to resume his oratory, and go on,
saying your honour, and he would rather say,
cannot
you take advantage of a pause to call for what you
want. It is mentioned of Lord Camden, that he
was in all respects, the most correct of men in his
treatment of the bar, save that he would sometimes,
in the middle of an argument, stoop down to garter up
his stockings
.
It is dangerous in a judge to attempt wit,
especially
if he has none. There are few that have the
talent
and it is not every one that knows that he has it
not. It will be your best way to attempt nothing of
the kind; but preserve gravity, and an imposing air
of austerity. For as far as I can learn from the
Captain
,
you are not happy at a bon mot.
But you must be careful of your mind itself, that it
be not rendered vain by being called your honour. If
the bar discover that you are weak on this head, they
will plaister you with your honour; your honour, and
your honour. They will be careful also to say, the
learned judge
, and this the more unlearned they think
you are. And especially when they mean to impose
upon you sophism for argument, and false
construction
for solid deduction, and conclusion. The
learned
judge upon the bench; when at the same time
they will be at a loss to say, whether they think you
or the bench you sit upon, the most destitute of sense
and understanding.
A man that has been behind the scene knows the
vanity of all this, and how much must pass for nothing
of all that apparent deference which is paid to the
understanding
of a judge. For the council of delicacy,
and refined manners, will pay this respect to the
office
,
on a principle of good breeding, and what
becomes
the profession; others will do the same thing,
and perhaps overdo it, from motives of prudence, and
to gain a point with the court. There is trick in all
trades, and there is craft, in the craft, if I may use a
pun on this occasion.
But you have never been behind the scene; and
have no experience of this play upon travellers; and
managing the weaknesses of men. You are but a young
judge, and likely to be lifted up with vanity, from
your sudden elevation. Because you sit a little higher
than the bar, and the suitors; for the bench is usually
raised a little, you associate your situation with
yourself
;
thence comes arrogance, and insult.
Man, vain man, drest in a little brief authority.
But it will be necessary that you maintain order,
and support authority; because otherwise, the bar
will become a bear garden, and intolerable to the
practitioner. Rudeness must be repressed, and
petulance
overawed. Interruption and bluster cannot be
endured. Rules of priority as to right of motion, and
order of speaking, must be enforced. In questioning,
or cross questioning a witness, the modest and
observant
advocate must be permitted to proceed without
disturbance. All these things, your own good sense,
if you have any sense, good, or bad, must teach you
to consider, and apply.
By my showl, said the bog-trotter, but I will take
de poker to dem, and give dem over de nose wid a
shilelah, if de make any spaches out of deir turn, in
my hearing. It were better for dem dey were
diging
turf in Laugh-Swilly. Dey shall interrupt no good
paple in my presence.
That will not do, said the blind Lawyer; you
must call a constable; and commit for misbehaviour.
It will be descending from your dignity to take a
cow-skin
,
or cudgel in your hand; nor does the law
warrant
it. All things must be done decently, and
in order. You can lay your hands upon no man
yourself
.
It must be by your officers, that you execute the
laws. The sheriff is at hand; the coroner with his
rod; or the constable with his staff. These are the
ministers of the law in your hands to keep the peace.
You can act only by warrant of authority, or what is
called a
precept
.
The bog-trotter thought it hard, that he could not
take a staff from the constable, and preserve the peace
himself. But he was disposed to submit to the
restriction
since it seemed to be the practice of the court.
He enquired, however, whether it might not be
allowable
to take a batabuoy to de officer, or sharvant of de
court, if he did his duty slowly, so as to break de
patience of de lawyers, and, and be waiting for him.
As to this, the Lawyer gave him the proper
information
,
and here
endeth the first lesson
.
OBSERVATIONS.
IT may seem to shock all credibility, that Teague
should have a seat upon the bench.
Quicquid fingis
Sit simile veri.
This is a maxim of the critic, and founded in the
principles of human nature. For a just taste does not
relish what is incredible. But why should it be thought
incredible, that Teague should be a judge? Or why
distrust his capacity since he had a commission? On
the death of attorney Noy, the author of the maxims,
we have the following anecdote. Dining with the
Chancellor, it was lamented by some, that such a loss
had happened: what will the king do for an Attorney
General?
When the company were gone, said the valet to
the Chancellor; why need you be at a loss for an
Attorney
General? I will be Attorney General.
You Attorney General! Said the Chancellor. Are
you fit for an Attorney General?
Let the king give me a commission, said the valet,
and I will see who will dare to say, that I am not fit
for it
.
H
There is certainly a great deal in a commission,
and the possession of power. I was early struck
with this, in seeing the respect paid to the opinion of
a man made a justice of the peace, when none had
been paid before; and yet the commission had but
very little increased his law knowledge; or, in fact,
had left it just where it was; some degrees below
zero.
It may be thought, that I mean to undervalue in a
judge, the faculty of taking notes. On this head I
will explain myself. Certain it is, that the taking
notes, detracts from the exercise of
memory;
but much
more from the exercise of
understanding
. The mind
is divided, and the act of puting upon paper, detracts
something from the operation of puting in the head.
The mechanical, and intellectual are at variance, and
in some degree, however imperceptible, destroy each
other. The revolution, and composition of forces,
produce a line in a diagonal direction. It is
impossible
that the man who writes, can more than half
think. All those relations and combinations of ideas
that present themselves, and are managed by him at
his ease when he gives his whole mind, are lost in part,
or have not justice done them, when they are to be
recovered
,
and adjusted from the partial hints that can,
in the mean time, be thrown upon paper. A note
taker, and a thinker, on the bench might be of use.
The thinker to look over the notes, and assist himself
afterwards. The note taker not to think at all; but
to mind his pen. At the bar, it was my way, to take
in a writer where I had the command of the cause;
but it was understood between us, that he was to
confine
himself to his province for the time being, and
neither speak, nor think.
In the history of ancient oratory, tribunitial, or
judicial, do we meet with any thing on note taking?
In Cicero de Oratore, have we any thing? Has
Quintilian
a chapter on the subject? No man can be an
orator, that dissipates his mind with taking notes. It
is a qualification at the bar, or on the bench,
extremely
subordinate.
Nevertheless, I do not mean to exclude it
altogether
.
A skeleton of the cause must be preserved, for
the sake of a reserved point, a motion for a new trial;
or in arrest of judgment. It is that full body of the
evidence, to which I object. If it is in paper, it wastes
the time of the country to copy, and if oral, it turns
the judge into a mechanic to take down. It is not
necessary
for the purposes of justice, to have all that
comes out in a cause put upon paper. There is
seldom
more than a single particular in the testimony of
a witness that affects the cause. It is the height of
ability to select and take this down. The late Chief
Justice, the Governor, had this talent. I have heard
the present Chief Justice speak of it with admiration
The present Chief Justice himself (Shippen)
possesses
it in a high degree. Perhaps hits the medium
perfectly
.
It is in the case of jury trial, that my exception
chiefly lies to length of note taking, when the
examination
of a witness is delayed until the judge, or the
council takes down; and the mind of the judge
carried
off from the hearing of the evidence, is not so
well prepared to give his charge, which ought to
consist
of
the resulting points of the controversy
, and not a
suming up of the evidence, for that is supposed to
have been done by the council, or by the jury in their
own minds. But a man that is writing all the time
the council are speaking, can but half think. But
these strictures must be taken with a grain of salt;
and it is not to be supposed that I would dispense
with note taking altogether in the case, especially of
the presiding judge. On a motion for new trial, some
detail of the case, is necessary for those who have not
tried the cause.
On an argument upon a law point, where the
decision
is not immediately to be made, and the notes
are taken for the purpose of examination of the books,
it is immaterial of what length, because the council
are not stopped by the impediment of clerk-ship.
After all, as I am not in the habit of taking notes
much myself, and do not like it, and resting a great deal
upon felicity of memory, the result of trusting to it, I
thought it well enough to argue my own cause, and
to see what could be said on behalf of my own way,
in this particular, whether it be a defect, or an
excellence
.
I had forgot to mention, in its proper place, that
though the people objected to the taking the blind
Lawyer for a judge, yet they agreed that he might be
a clerk, and associate the blind Fidler for his deputy.
This arrangement being made, the Captain was
disembarrassed
of this part of the trumpery he had with
him, and which incumbered the caravan.
The settlement in which they now were, was
called
the back settlement; not because it was farthest
back; but because it had been once the frontier. The
name
back
, still continued to be tacked to it; now
when it had become the midland country.
The inhabitants of this country had become wits,
and improved in manners, from society and
intercourse
.
The females dressed better because they
could afford it, than they had done years before.
Their buildings were of stone, or brick, or of sawed
timber, framed, instead of round, or squared logs, laid
upon each other, as was the mode at an early period.
Nevertheless there was still a defect of judgment in
the construction of their houses, for the summer, as
well as the winter seasons. They were placed, in
most cases, as they ought to be, fronting the south;
but without perforations, or a passage for the air, by
means of windows from the west to the east. On the
H 2
contrary, many of them had what they called wings;
and these placed at the east and west end. The
entries
were small, and the kitchen placed in a wing, or
at the east or west end of the house. Yet, a little
thinking on original principle, would say, that it
ought to be at the north east of the building, to
oppose
the storm which comes from that quarter, in the
winter; and because in the summer, it obstructs no
breeze in that direction. But it is not
lawyers or
judges
only, that are enslaved by precedent
.
They take care also, to build in a valley, because
it is near a spring head. But in the winter the court
yard is muddy; and in the summer they want air.
As they proceeded, the quo-he settlement lay upon
the left. This settlement takes its name from the
Quo-hees, a nation of Indians that inhabited the
country
at the first discovery of this part of America. The
Munsees, and Shanees, have a like termination in
the sound of their names, and these are now the
remains
of nations that inhabit the countries on Lake
Erie, and the Ohio river.
Some fanciful writers, nevertheless, attempt to
give a derivation from another source; and think, that
as this settlement is peopled, chiefly with what is
called
the Scotch-Irish, so the name is derived from a
phrase amongst them very common in their familiar
discourse; quo' he, quo' she, and quo' they, &c.
Quo', they suppose to be an abreviation of quoth; that
is, said he, said she, &c.
Butler, in his Hudibrass, uses the word quoth, in
this sense.
Quoth he, there is one Sydrophel,
Whom I have cudgel'd
Of this they boast as a classical authority in their
favour. And, doubtless this etimology is
strengthened
by the names of the rivers in this country, such as
the Sasquehannah, which is a compound of sauce quo'
Hannah; the name of a girl calling out for sauce to
her meat; and also from the Skuylkill, from scull and
kill. For what kills a man sooner than knocking on
the head? But there is great uncertainty in
etimology
,
in deducing the origin of nations. Abarbanel, in
his Jewish antiquities, fully evinces this. Also
Spinazoli
,
in his Asiatic researches; and others. But this
is just as plausible, and nothing more, with the
hypothesis
of some who conjecture that the Alleghany
mountains took their name from an English woman,
of the name of Alley; as we say Alley Croker, in the
ballad. That the Chesapeak was so called from a
Welsh man, who made use of cheese instead of an
anchor; so that instead of saying the anchor is a peake,
said the cheese is a peake; and so fixed a nick name
on the bay. There are some local names of
subordinate
rivers and smaller streams in this particular part
of the country that strengthens these conjectures.
Aughwic, is allied to Aughrim, which is a place in
Ireland. We have heard of the
break of Aughrim;
a
place where the Protestants were defeated.
Maeintanga
;
Macanoy, is evidently Scotch, from the initial
Mac, which signifies son, in the Erse. Juniata is a
compound of English and Irish. Johnny is English;
but ata, or atoy is Hybernian. I knew one Dennis A'
Toy, that used to mow for my father, when I was a
lad.
Nevertheless, I incline to their reasonings, who
think that quo'he is an Indian word, and of aboriginal
derivation.
On the right hand of the rout of the Caravan,
moving back, lay the Fooley settlement.
Etymologists
and antiquarians are here at war also.
African travellers tell us of the Foola country in
the neighbourhood of the Mitomba, or Sierra Leone
river. Winterbottom, and Walls, late travellers, give
a particular description of it. The natives distinguish
the year by
moons
. There is the
sweep-brush
moon;
from the wind that blows;
shun-path
moon, from the
heat; the shakoo, or harvest moon. The line of day
is distinguised by the sun going down into the water,
that is evening; the sun in the bush, that is night,
&c. Their epochas are a town burnt, or settlement
destroyed.
The Burree, or palaver house, is the seat of justice,
where all causes, civil or criminal, are decided. The
test of innocence is the drinking
red water
without
occasioning a qualm to the stomach. A hot iron
applyed
to the posteriors, is also a test. If the culprit
does not grunt, he is safe.
The Mandingo country lies north of this, and
signifies
book-man, because here they read the Alcoran,
and have schools. In the Foola country, they have
no schools, and cannot read.
Now there are authors, who derive Fooley from
Foola; and think that this settlement must have been
peopled by a colony of Africans, and hence derive the
name. It is true they have seats of justice, and
palaver
houses, where the lawyers plead. Jury trials are
in use; and in this mode of administering justice it is
not the accused that is tortured, but the judges; that
is the
jury
. This is not by drinking red water, which
is a composition of the bark of trees of an emetic
quality
;
but by drinking nothing at all, or eating either,
until twelve of them are all of one opinion; which, to
render more difficult, the palaverers, the lawyers, are
allowed to address them a whole day, or longer,
previously
on different sides of the question or fact, so as
to perplex and dash their councils. There are
what are called judges also, who preside, and these
are allowed also to give different opinions on the case.
The jurors being puzzled are ordered off under the
care of a constable, with a staff like a weaver's beam,
and he is to keep them together without meat or drink,
unless with leave of the court, and without speaking
to any one
until they are agreed
.
Notwithstanding this consimilarity in the manners,
and the resemblance in the sound, or speaking of the
word Fooley, with that of Foola, I cannot
immediately
accede to the idea that the inhabitants came from
Africa. Because there is no tincture of the African
complexion. There are negroes and mulattoes
amongst them it is true; but the bulk of the
inhabitants
are of a clear red and white. I take it that the word
Fooley, is derived from the word fool, which signifies
devoid of sense, and was applyed to them, being
originally
a weak people; and still continuing to exhibit
marks of simplicity bordering upon folly. Their
credulity
is amazing, and they are the constant bubble of
candidates for office. They do not sell themselves as
the Foolas; but they sell their votes; or rather give
them away at elections, for whiskey, or deceiving
speeches, replete with the
words liberty and the rights
of man
.
In the course of this day's journey, at the crossing
of the roads, the caravan fell in with a company of
electioneerers, who were coming from the Fooley
settlement
,
and had a number along, taking them to the
election ground, not far distant. They were slapping
them upon the shoulder; clapping them upon the
back; and saying come along my brave fellow; give
us your vote. How are the old people at home? How
came you to get that handsome girl for a wife? Is
your crop good this year? Come take a dram of this
whiskey. How is it that you do not set up for an office,
and not be lying at home in the ashes, supping cyder,
while we are obliged to go to the legislature, and to fill
offices; and keep you at your ease doing nothing. You
must take your turn next year. This will never do.
Fair play is bonny play. It is too much to be always
on duty. But somebody must stand forward, or the
people will be run down by the lawyers, and the courts
of Justice. Come give us a vote.
The Foolies were all smiling, and in good humour.
Not so in the Foola country on the Sierra Leone river,
where the inhabitants are sold or bought. It is with
great reluctance that they go into service; and some
tender scenes take place at the parting of parents and
children. It is there called slavery. Here it is called
supporting liberty, though it is sometimes sapping it,
by puting folly into public trust.
The Foolas on the Sierra Leone, are spoken of by
some travellers, as Cannibals; but I do not find an
agreement upon this head; and the supposition arises,
I would presume, from the Purra, or state inquisition
which is amongst them, when the bandoo woman
denounces
a culprit. The purra then, who are state
officers
take off the culprit, and he must drink red water,
or be subject to hot irons. If he shrinks in the
experiment
,
he is carried away, and never more heard of.
But this affords no conclusive evidence that they eat
him; any more than amongst the Foolas in this
settlement
,
who have been represented by some as Cannibals,
and devouring one another, because in their Kuriouks, or
churches, they are frequently denounced by their priests
as
back biters
. This means slanderers, and not that
they feed upon the haunches of men like venison.
Such are the mistakes of superficial observers, and
credulous travellers; whose accounts writers copy,
and publish as facts, frequently without due
examination
.
It is an epocha in the life of a man when he puts on
breeches. The heart of the mother is glad when she
sees her son run about in pantaloons. A second era
is the going to school. She bids him be a good boy,
and learn his book. It is the father's business more
especially, or at least the father has then more to do
with him, when he puts him to the plough, or to a
trade, or a profession. He gives him lessons and
instructions
of industry, and morals.
But when he comes to be his own man, at the age
of 21; and has a right to vote at an election, what a
change does his situation undergo! What a right
devolves
upon him! I may say a trust for the under age,
and for posterity. What honour attaches to his right!
What delicacy ought to be used in the exercise of it.
In the age of antient chivalry, when the youth had
come to manhood, and was made a knight, it was with
matter of ceremony, and his equipment was by the
hand of a fair lady buckling on his armour; and
inspiring
him by her charms and her sentiments, with
heroic
sense of honour, and the scorn of all that is false
or mean. The chevalier of that day was a
conservator
of the peace. His prowess was instead of laws.
Now the vote of the citizen takes place of the sword
of the adventurer. This is at the bottom of all order
and subordination. Shall the knight of the Golden
Cross be free from stain in his atchievements; and
shall a republican prostitute his vote, or dishonour his
standing in society, by bestowing it on the unworthy?
Shall he give away his suffrage for a fair word, for a
dram of liquor, for a mess of potage?
It is his
birthright
. Shall he give his vote but on the principle
of conscience and of honour. Shall he decline his
duty to present himself at the election? How does he
know but that upon his vote may depend the
duration
of the republic? Who can tell with what particle
of air a pestilence begins? And whether it is from a
quiescence of that particle that a stagnation of the
atmosphere
ensues, or from its activity, by gass from
the earth, that a hurricane is produced. A vote given
wrong, or withheld, may occasion ultimately a
convulsion
in the commonwealth.
But truth, artifice, fraud, meditated fraud in this
noblest of functions, the all of sovereignty, in a vote,
how disgracesul, how criminal! And yet it is not
always
,
or every where that disgrace begins to be
attached
to this the most flagitious of all knavery. If these
strictures, shall have the effect to cultivate a sense of
honour in our candidates and in our voters, it will be
worth while to have written the book.
I
CHAP. X.
THEY were now entering the Lack-learning
settlement
,
where a great uproar had been made on
account
of their coming. It had been given out that the
company consisted of
Scholars and Lawyers
. This,
either from mistake, or the design of wags, who
liked to see misconception, even though it
occasioned
mischief. A multitude had got together, with
sticks and stones, to obstruct the march into their
country.
It was at the opening of a defile they were met,
and could proceed no farther. The Captain himself,
advanced with a flag, and with great difficulty
obtained
a parley, and a conference. Friends, and
countrymen
said he, what do you mean? There are no
scholars amongst us, save a Latin schoolmaster, who
has left off the business, and is going to become an
honest man, in a new country. We have no lawyers;
not a soul that has ever been in a court, unless indeed
as culprits, and to be tried for misdemeanours; and
that, I take it, is not likely to give them a strong
prejudice
in favour of the administration of justice. Here
is Tom the Tinker; Will Watlin; Harum Scarum
the duelist; O'Fin, the Irishman, and several others,
that have no predilection for scholarship. It will be
but little learning they will introduce among you.
There is Clonmel, the ballad singer; he can sing, and
make a ballad, that is, a song for a ballad; but that is
but a small matter.
After all, what harm could learning do you,
provided
that you did not learn yourselves? The bears
and the foxes of these woods do not learn; but they
do not hinder men to read books. They have no
objection
to schools, or colleges, or courts of justice;
because it does not prevent them running into holes,
or climbing upon trees. The racoons, and the
squirrels
can crack nuts, maugre all our education, and
refinement
Every man in his humour, is the title
of one of Ben Johnstons' Comedies. If you do not
find your account, or your amusement in literary
studies, what matters it, if others do? Learning, is
not a thing that will grow upon you, all at once. It
is a generous enemy, like a rattle-snake, it gives
warning
.
The boy feels the birch on his back-side, to make
him learned. The man gets a head-ache, poring over
books. In fact, it requires some resolution, and much
perseverance, to become learned. I acknowledge that
men were at first, like the beasts of the wood, and the
fowls of the air, without grammars or dictionaries;
and it took a great deal to bring them out of that state,
and give them what is called education. At the
revival
of letters in Europe, after the dark ages, it was
thought a great matter to get to be a scholar.
Peculiar
privileges were attached. Hence what is called
the benefit of clergy.
De Clergy, said an honest German. De Clergy
are de biggest rogues of de two. An honest Sherman
minister widout larning, ish better. But de lawyers
are de tyvil; wid deir pooks, and deir talks in de
courts; and sheats people for de money. I sticks to
de blantation, and makes my fence. Learning ish
goot for noting; but to make men rogues. It ish all
a contrivance to sheat people.
The Demagogue amongst the multitude, who had
excited this opposition, to learning and the learned,
was a shrewd fellow, and it was not that he was not
sensible of the advantages of learning; but because he
was a sciolist himself, and did not wish to loose his
influence by the competition of a lawyer, or a scholar,
that he had excited this prejudice. But discovering,
that amongst this company, as the Captain said, and
which he could guess from the manners, and the
countenance
,
there were really no literati; or what the
French call Savans, coming forward, to take a degree
of the meridian, or explore antiquities; much less a
corps of lawyers to establish codes of jurisprudence,
or introduce litigation, he explained the matter to
those around him, and reconciled them to the
proposition
of suffering them to pass through the country.
The Captain expressed his sense of his courtesy,
and opportune assistance, towards the object of their
progression; and making him a present of a box of
jews-harps for the young people, proceeded without
farther molestation.
I 2
OBSERVATIONS.
THE demagogue of all times, and countries, uses
the same arts. The laws are a standing butt of his
invective. He cannot be a sage, or a legislator; and
therefore must find fault with those that are. The
Athenian Cleon, in his harangues, as given by
Thucydides
,
is a perfect model of a demagogue. I have not
the book by me, or I would copy one to give a
specimen
of his art. The oppression of the laws, and the
inequality of justice to the poor, are the usual themes
of his declamation. But where there are laws, there
will be science; and science is the support of laws.
Hence the hostility against these, at the same time.
But the passion of the time changes, like the
fashions
of dress. It is just the same principle that
introduces
the square toe in the place of the sharp, that
also, makes it the rage to be a scholar; or to be
illiterate
.
But the change in the one case is not so much
felt, as in the other. It is not attended with such
extensive
consequences. Of making many books, there
is no end, and much study is a weariness of the
flesh. This is the language of a man that had been
a great scholar, and writer; because in his experience
it had not given perfect happiness, as nothing will,
he speaks in these terms. It is not meant to be taken
precisely as spoken; and is no more than an
expression
of the inanity of the noblest of all enjoyments;
the mental gratification, of
making or reading a book
.
I therefore think the lack-learning people had
been misled in their prejudice against a literary
education
.
At least, it is my simple way of thinking,
and I may be wrong. Admitting this, I shall go on
with my story.
Provisions had begun to fail; and though they
had a fire-arm, or two in company, with a little
ammunition
,
yet they were not the best marks-men, and
nothing had presented itself, in these woods, to take
down and barbacue. Harum Scarum, was the
commissary
;
but he could devise no ways and means of
supplying food, unless by sending a challenge to the
game, and calling them out to a duel, where they
might be shot at pleasure.
It was thought absurd to suppose that deer or
buffaloe
,
or even wild cat, or opposum, would stand
upon
a point of honour
, and come out of the woods, at a
card, in the manner of men, piqued upon their
courage
.
Why not? said Harum Scarum, do not men come
and stand up to be shot at, like a post without
stiring
?
Have not men more sense than beasts? At
least they have more learning, and boast of their
education
.
I can bring a fellow out to me, almost at a
wink; and shall I be at a loss with a brute beast, who
hast not half the prudence, though it may have the
same self-love, and principle of preservation.
You may try it, said the Captain. I shall wonder
a little if the event corresponds with the intention.
Harum Scarum, having made out his challenge,
made choice of Will Watlin, for his second, to bear
the cards, and disperse them in the forest.
No answer came, and no bear, or panther
appeared
,
or came upon the ground.
The next thing was to post them; which he did,
and put up billets upon trees. They were to this
effect
.
Take notice, that I Harum Scarum, gentleman,
do hereby post and publish the beasts of these woods, to
be scoundrels, liars, and cowards, of which let all men
take notice; that no man of honour may keep
company
with them; but consider them as poltroons and
rascals.
This was what is called the mad-cap settlement;
the inhabitants being of an irritable disposition, and
apt to take offence. Accordingly seeing those upon
trees, as they were looking for their cattle in the
woods, they were highly vexed, and put into great
passion. Sundry of them had fallen in with straglers
of the company, gathering roots and berries; or
looking
for a shot; and had come to high words, under
a mutual misunderstanding of the circumstance which
gave offence. Collecting a large party at a pass, the
mad-caps had come forward, and determined to give
battle. The Captain saw the necessity of some
active
measures on his part, and collecting his men,
began
to form. He had with him, the player on the
bag-pipes, and Tom the Tinker, who turned a piece
of tin that he had, into a kettle drum, and beat on it
the rogues march; which was the only point of war
that he could beat. Will Watlin had a saplin of
hickory; and O'Fin had his flail, which he brought
along with him, not knowing but he might get a job
of threshing by the way.
He had now got a job, it is true; but not of the
same kind that he meant, wheat at six-pence a bushel;
but people's brains to beat out, or their bones to
break; a thing as unprofitable as it is unlawful. The
Captain being a military man, was thinking of the
science, and manoeuvres put in practice by the
antients
,
by which they had gained battles. He was at
a loss whether to advance in single column, until
within
a certain distance; and then halt with the head,
while the rear wheeled round, and struck like a
serpent
with its tail, in the manner Epaminondas, gained
the battle of Leuctra. Or whether he should imitate
Hannibal atI forget at what battle, with the Romans;
and oppose a semicircle, with the convex to the
enemy
;
and which yielding in the centre changed to a
crescent, and received the adversary in its horns,
which encompassing the flanks, cut them to pieces.
He was debating with himself whether he should
advance
to a certain height; or rely upon an ambuscade
among the bushes in the plain, when, in the mean
time Clonmel, the ballad singer, struck up a song in
the centre, and the mad-caps began to listen; and
though they had as many arms as a learned lawyer
puts in his declaration; swords, staves, and knives,
they dropped them all, and seemed to return to good
humour.
The song of Clonmel was as follows:
What use is in fighting, and gouging, and biting,
Far better to let it alone;
For kicking and cuffing, and boxing, and buffing,
It makes the flesh ache, and the bone.
But give me the whiskey, it makes one so friskey,
But beating, and brusing makes sore;
Come shake hands my cronies, come near, my dear
honies,
And think of your grudges no more.
We are a set of poor fellows just escap'd from the
gallows,
And hunting a wolf or a bear.
And what with a tail on, except the camelion,
Can live upon fog, or the air?
Some venison haunches, to fill up our paunches,
Come see if you cannot produce,
A barbecued pig; a nice mutton leg,
Or turkey, or bit of a goose.
We have store of good liquor; so bring something
quicker;
And club your potatoes and yams.
We'l make a great feast, and turn all to jest;
So away with your frowns and your dams.
There is nothing like love, which comes from above,
And tickles the youngsters below.
It is vain man's own fault, that he so brews his malt,
As ever to cry out, heigh-ho!
Alexander and Csar, and Nebuchadnezar,
Found out to their cost this was true;
Now who will be fools, to drink at the pools,
Of ambition, and war, we or you?
The mad-caps were settled like a hive of bees, and
coming forward, began to gather in a cluster round
the ballad singer. Some took him by the hand, others
asked for the keg of whiskey, and in a short time
amity
was established, and they were as well acquainted,
as if they had been together seven years. Several of
them knew Tom the Thinker, having served under
him, in the western insurrection, in the year 1794.
Store of provisions were in a short time brought in,
and forage for the Captain's horse and the blind mare.
Having refreshed themselves with rest, a day or two,
maintaining still a good unnderstanding with the
mad-caps, and mixing occasionally with hunting
parties
that shot squirrels, and racoons, who declined to
accept challenges, and fight upon equal terms, they
began to think of the object of their emigration. Orders
were given to put the troops in motion; and taking
up the line of march, the cavalry in front, they set
out and passing through the mad-cap country, no
interruption
happened, until they began to enter that of
the
democrats
.
This is a settlement contiguous to the mad-caps.
The inhabitants are a very happy people, no
demagogues
having yet arisen among them, to propel to
licentiousness, as for instance, to propose agrarian laws,
or an equality of goods and chattels; or to excite them
to contention amongst themselves, or to war with
foreign
powers, in order that they may shew their
oratory
attain power, and become something in the state.
Such had not yet begun to call out against laws, and
the administration of justice; sciolists and young
persons
,
too indolent to acquire solid knowledge,
declaiming
against rules, the policy of which they do not
comprehend; affecting to discuss points in their
lucubrations
,
of elementary jurisprudence, as to form or
substance of which, they are as incapable as half a
tradesman at any other profession, could be of
pointing
out the excellencies or defects of an improvement
on the tools, or machines in use. It takes a great
general to improve tactics; not a half year soldier just
taken from a dril-serjeant. Yet such are the most
presumptuous, and never are convinced of their
incapacity
,
until the experiment forms the rejection. But
in the mean time, the democratic character is leveled,
and incurs the imputation of being unfit for
government
.
The state of this democracy much resembled that
of the Achaean commonwealth; not so much in the
form of the constitution, as the principles of the
government
,
and the virtues of the people. I shall take the
description of it from Polybius. It is contained in the
eulogium which he makes, in the course of his history
upon this people.
From whence then, has it happened, says he,
that, not the people of those countries only, but all the
rest of the inhabitants of Peloponesus, are so well
pleased to receive, not only their laws, and form of
government
,
but their very names also, from the
Achaeans
In my judgment, the cause is, nothing else, than
equality, and liberty
, in a word,
that democratical
species of government
, which, is found more just and
perfect in its kind, among the Achaeans, than, in any
other state. This republic, was at first composed of
a small part only, of the inhabitants of Peloponesus;
who voluntarily associated themselves into one body;
but, a greater number soon joined themselves to them,
induced to it by persuasion, and the manifest advantage
K
of such a union. And, some, as opportunities arose,
were forced into the confederacy. But they were
satisfied
with the violence, by which they had been
comcompelled
to embrace so excellent a form of
government
.
For the new citizens were suffered to enjoy all
the rights and privileges that were permitted to the old.
Every thing was equal among them all
. Thus,
employing
the means that were of all things, the most
effectual
for their purpose,
equity and gentleness
, they soon
arrived at the point which they had in view.
When the Thebans, after the great and
unexampled
victory, which they obtained, against the
Macedonians
in the battle of Leuctra, began, with the
surprize
of all, to lay
claim
to the sovereignty of Greece,
various troubles, and contentions arose among the
people of the country, and especially between the two
contending parties; for the one refused to submit as
conquered; while the other persisted to claim the
victory. In these circumstances, they at last agreed
to yield all the points that were in dispute between
them to the sole judgment and decision of the
Achaeans
.
Nor, was this preference obtained by any
superiority
of thought, or power; for, they were at that
time, the last of all the states of Greece; but was
confessedly
bestowed upon that integrity and love of
virtue
by which they became distinguished above all other
people
.
This is the real character of democracy; and who,
in this view of the character, would be unwilling to
be called a
democrat
. Yet there have been revolutions
in the public mind, with respect to the honorary, or
disreputable nature of this application. It will be
recollected, that after the adoption of what is called
the funding system, by the administration of the
federal
government, societies were instituted about the
years, 179123, under the denomination of
democratic
societies
. It was the intemperance of some
of these bodies, and the insurrection of 1794, which
brought a cloud upon these societies, and caused them
to be discontinued. Prudent men, and patriots, were
willing to avoid a name which had incurred
disreputation
from the excesses of those attached to it.
But the errors of the federal administration, or at
least measures thought to be errors, having
overthrown
that administration, the name, before
buried
began to obtain resuscitation, and to be able to shew
its head in a new existence, and with fresh honours,
instead of insult and degradation. The term
democrat
,
has ceased to be a stigma; and begins to be assumed
by our public writers, and claimed by our patriots, as
characteristic of a good citizen. That of
republican
,
which alone had been ventured on for some time, is
now considered cold, and equivocal, and has given way,
pretty generally, to that of democratic republican.
In a short time, it will be simply,
the democracy
, and
a democrat
.
But how long will this be so, in the United States,
or, in these states? Its duration will be in proportion
to the wisdom of those who occasionally obtain the
ascendency in the government. It is him alone, who
gathereth the winds in his fists, that can calculate the
revolutions that depend upon the temper, and the
passions
of men.
I call myself a democrat. I will be asked, what is
a
democracy?
I take my definition from a speech put
into the mouth of Pericles, by Thucydides. It is to the
Athenian people. This our government is called a
democracy, because, in the administration, it hath
respect
,
not to a few, but to the multitude: a democracy;
wherein, though there be an equality amongst all men,
in point of law, for their private controversies; yet in
confering of dignities one man is prefered before
another
to a public charge; and that, according to the
reputation, not of his power, but of his virtue; and is
not put back through the poverty, or the obscurity of
his person, as long as he can do service to the
commonwealth
.
And we live not only free in the
administration
of the state; but also, one with another,
void of jealousy towards each other in our daily course
of life; not offended at any man for following his own
humour, nor casting on any man censure or sour looks,
which though they be no punishment, yet they
grieve:
so that conversing one with another, for the private,
without offence, we stand chiefly in fear to transgress
against the public; and are able always to be
obedient
to those that govern, and to the laws; and
principally
to such laws, as are written for punishment
against injury; and such unwritten as bring
undeniable
shame to the transgressor. Hob's translation of
Thucydides.
This definition or description, of a practical
democracy
,
is drawn from real life. It is in the mouth of
Pericles, a man of business; a sapient statesman;
who had been bred and born in a democracy; versed
in its affairs, and knew its errors, and its excellencies.
One thing is remarkable, that a particular excellence
which he notices, is the freedom of opinion. Where
a government is founded on opinion, it is of the
essence
of its preservation, that opinion be free. It is not
enough that no inquisition exists; that no lettre de
cachet can issue; but that no man shall attempt
to
frown
another out of his exercise of private judgment.
Is it democracy to denounce a man in a paper, because
he thinks differently on a measure of government with
the editor? It is tyranny; and the man who can do
this without reason, or moderation, is a tyrant, and
would suppress the right of private judgment, if he
had the power. I distinguish between stricture, and
abuse. All depends upon the manner, and the
toleration
.
A man is not always a deserter from just
polities
because he cannot agree with me in opinion, on
a particular subject. Mutual toleration and
forbearance
,
in our sentiments, with regard to the legality, or
expedience of measures, is the soul of democracy. It
K 2
is that which distinguishes it from despotism, as
polite
manners the fine gentleman in polished life; in
civilized society. In a despotic country, it is the boot,
or the thumb screw, or the cord, that brings a man
to reason; at least the wheel and the pulley, are used
for this purpose. What better in a republic where a
man is this day a patriot, and the next day a traitor,
at the whim of him who bestows the appellation? In
the livid dens of despotism, state prisons are the
seminaries
of submissive citizens. In a democracy, shall
terror issue from lamp-black, and patriotism be put
down, under the name of opposition. When a man
frowns upon me because I have dissented from him in
opinion, on a political matter, I discover clearly the
grade of his political standing, and democratic
improvement
.
He is no democrat, say I, as another
would say, he is no gentleman.
But it will be said, are not your democrats, all
noisy
,
vociferous, intolerant and of a persecuting spirit?
I say such are not democrats; they are spurious, and
usurp the name. In a government founded on
opinion
,
nothing ought to be a reproach, that is the
exercise
of private judgment. It is subversive of the
essence
of liberty.
A frown is the shadow of force, and
he that uses the one, would have recourse to the other
.
These observations allude to what is practical in
democracy, and cannot be established or prohibited
by the laws; but constitute the manners which a
democratic
government inculcates, and is calculated to
produce; and it will be observable, that there is a
great deal of this among the body of the people, who
have been accustomed to liberty. It is chiefly amongst
the young in
the world
, or young in
the country
, that
the contrary spirit shews itself. I am amongst those
who carry my ideas in favour of the naturalization of
foreigners, perhaps too far. I am for exercising the
rights of hospitality to them, to all extent at once;
making them citizens, and giving them the right
of suffrage, and even office, the moment they set
a foot upon the shore. For I cannot see on what
ground, we can justify a refusal. But I do not mean
to discuss this point at present. I introduce it to shew
that I am liberal in my notions, with regard to the
privileges of foreigners. But I admit, that it takes
some time to give them correct ideas of the limits of
liberty. It is, I believe, a faying of the Grand
Pensionary
,
De Wit of Holland, that it takes a man half
an age to enjoy liberty, before he can know how to use
it. Nevertheless, I cannot see the inexpediency of
admitting
to a vote, the emigrant that comes amongst
us, the first day he presents himself. He will be
instructed
by those that have been here before him.
He must take his ticket from some one.Is the ocean
afraid of the rivers? Even when they come turbid
with the swell of the mountains? The sea clarifies,
or they are lost in it. Who complains, out a sea, of a
spring flood muddying the waters? This ought to
be a lesson, at the same time, to emigrants, that they
use their liberty, so as not abusing it. It is a strange
thing to see a man come in the other day, undertake
to set all right; and to denounce men of age and high
standing, as guilty of defection. But what good is
there in the world without an allay of evil? What
exercise of right without abuse? If I am wrong it is
the excess of liberality.
But I find another principle in the oration of
Pericles
,
in the justness of which, I am more confident.
That is,
the equal right of office to all the citizens
. As
the greater contains the less, this involves the right of
vote. The only
qualification
of which I can have any
idea, as justifiable, is that of age; and I should have
no objection to see this restricted to a greater age than
that of 21,say 45 years. At this time men cease
to be fit for the militia, or other ministerial services.
Let them then become legislators, and have the right
of vote in
making laws, or chusing those that represent
in making them
. This would take off a great deal of
wild-fire in our elections, and it would keep away vain
young men from our public councils.
What absurdity does the idea of a qualification of
property involve! It unhinges the ideas of the ancient
republicans; that it was honourable to have enriched
the republic, and to remain poor themselves. To be
wise, a man must be rich. No but to be honest, he
must have an estate. But in geting this estate, he
may have been a rogue. In general, he must, in some
measure, have neglected the improvement of his mind.
At least, it does not follow, that in proportion as a
man is poor, he is not to be trusted. They are
frequently
the most generous souls who have amassed
little wealth; on the contrary, the most ignoble, who
have acquired great property. The man that has set
his heart on riches, is lost to benevolence, and public
spirit. In the possession of office, he is thinking of
what can be made by it. Nothing can be great,
says the critic Longinus, or the stoic philosopher
Epictetes, I forget which,
the contempt of which is
great. It is great to despise riches. These cannot
therefore be great
.
But how can we measure the value of property,
and fix the criterion? Shall it be real property, a free
hold? Is my acre worth more than yours? Shall I
have but an equal right? What are the drawbacks
upon my estate? My debts and credits? It is the
surplus that makes my property, even in the case of
the substantial fund of free-hold. But property is not
the only stake. Person and character, are stakes.
Every man that has a head has a stake. There is no
proportioning it. In what is impracticable we can
have no election. It is therefore an excellent
principle
,
of our excellent constitution, that all men have an
equal
right of suffrage, and an equal right of office
.
I should not like to live in a republic where a man
must be worth so much, to have equal rights; even
could it be ascertained what I am worth; which, as
I have said, is impracticable. How many men have
I passed in life, less industrious than myself, and yet
richer. They have had better luck, as we express it;
or they have been more selfish, and kept what they
got. Can a man that is looking at the stars, mind
what is under his feet? We read of most of the great
statesmen of antiquity, and virtuous heroes, that they
were poor. It is no uncommon thing to find it added,
that they themselves were buried, or their children
educated at the public expence. The love of science;
and the love of the public, is at variance with
attention
to private emolument. Shall it then be
disreputable
in a republic to be poor? Shall it operate as a
crime and disqualify from the noblest function in
society
,
the enacting laws? But I enlarge upon this
only to shew that I am, in my way of thinking, a
democrat
.
But it is not so much, in the extension of the right
of suffrage, as in a delicate and just use of it, that the
democratic character consists. Will you see a
democrat
practice unfairness in an election? Go upon the
ground to canvass for himself, unless in the case of a
ministerial office; and even in this, with great caution,
and forbearance. Will you see a democrat,
substitute
,
or change a ticket; much less introduce and
obtain a vote for an unqualified individual; no real
democrat was ever capable of this. It is with the
aristocracy
that these arts are practised. They count it
robbery to be stinted at an equal vote; and think it no
injustice to make themselves whole by taking a
plurality
by whatever means in their power. This is all a
usurpation of the sovereign authority; and in some
republics has been punished with death. I own it
is a misdemeanour; at least a disgrace; and no real
democrat will be guilty of it.
In countries where
the government is a fraud upon
the people
, and the right of suffrage where it even
partially exists, is but a name; it may be thought
innocent to deceive, and to slur our votes. For it is
a buying and selling throughout. The candidate
buys the vote, and has in the mean time sold himself.
He is oftentimes purchased, and paid in advance, and
bribes with a part of the money that he gets. Not so
in this heaven of liberty, where other stars glitter,
where other suns and moons arise; this beautiful
world of liberty, in these states. Perdition on the man
that saps its foundation with intention; forgiveness,
but reformation of error, to him who destroys it by
mistake. And yet these last are more to be dreaded
than the former. At least as much; because the
error
of opinion is equally fatal, though originating
from a different principle of the mind, and oftentimes
founded in virtue.
Who ever saw a democrat keep an open house at
an election for a place in the legislative body? They
are too poor, says an aristocrat. They are poor
because
they are honest, says a democrat. At least,
being poor, they are honest. I have seen open houses
kept in a republic; and private friendship, or personal
safety has sometimes stood in the way of my endeavors
to bring the persons to account. But disapprobation,
and a portion of contempt has invariably attached
itself
to the transaction. What man can set the world
right? The greatest self-denial is obliged to yield
sometimes to personal considerations. Hence it is,
that I have often been silent when I saw fraud, and
unfairness before my eyes. Fraud in elections, is at
the root of all wickedness in the government of a
republic
.
A man of just pride, would scorn the
meanness
of succeeding by a trick; a man of proper sense
would know, that in the nature of things, no good
can come of elevation obtained by such means.
Success
by fraud, will never prosper. All men despise
cheating at cards, or other games. He is turned out
of company that is found guilty of it. And shall we
restrain our indignation; or can we withhold our
contempt
when an individual is found cheating, not at a
game of chance or skill amongst idle men; but in
the serious business of real life, and the disposition
of our lives, characters and fortunes? I pledge
myself
no democrat is guilty of this; at least those
guilty
of it are not
democrats
. They are not true brothers;
real masons. They have been made at a false lodge;
and will not be acknowledged. Thus it must be seen,
I found democracy in virtue; that is in truth, honour,
justice, integrity, reason, moderation; civility, but
firmness and fortitude in the support of right:
Quarter
to error of opinion; and the aberrations of the
heart; but death to ambition, and the vain desire of
honour, without just pretension; and death to all
knavery, and meditated hostility to the
rights of men
.
Digressing a little, or rather returning to what I
have said on the first point, the right of naturalization,
I admit that emigrants, come when they will, are
likely
to be in opposition to the existing government, or
rather, administration. This depends upon natural
principles. The governments of Europe, are most of
them oppressive, and it is oppression that drives, in
most instances, the inhabitant from amongst them.
The poor or the most enterprising, are those that
emigrate
.
They have been in the habit of thinking of a
reform, in the state of things in that country, from
which they come; it is natural for them to think that
a little touch of their hand may be still necessary here.
Did you ever know a new physician called in that would
not be disposed to alter the prescription, or to add to
it? What occasion for him, if there was not
something
to be added, or retrenchment made? Or how can
he shew himself, but in changing the medicines, or the
regimen. Extremes beget extremes in opinions, as
well as in conduct, The extreme of government,
where he has been, leads to licentiouness in his ideas
of liberty, now where he is.
L
Besides it is in this revolution of administration, if
he is an ambitious man, that he finds his best chance
of ascending. He is therefore a demagogue before
he becomes a patriot. I acquiesce, therefore, in the
policy of our constitution, and our laws, who prescribe
a kind of mental quarantine to the foreigner; though I
incline to the generosity of those who think it
unnecessary
,
and that such a great body of people have
nothing
to fear from the annual influx of a few
characters
,
that may for some time, carry with them more
sail than ballast. We had half Eurpe with us, in our
revolution. We had all Ireland, the officers of
government
excepted, and even some of these. I therefore,
do not like to see an Irishman obliged to perform a
quarantine of the intellect. I think it contributes to
sour his temper, and to fix a prejudice against the
administration, under which the limitation has been
introduced. However, this may be more splendid in
theory than safe in experience, and I sumbit to the
policy
that has been adopted until the constituted
authorities
shall think proper to regulate it otherwise.
in the mean time, if this book should be read by any
foreigner of high parts, and spirit, I would
recommend
it to him to suspend his judgment upon men
and things, until he has examined well, the ground
upon which he stands: to repress ambition and the
desire of office, until unsought, it comes to him,
during
which time he may have become qualified to
discharge
it; and will have had an opportunity of
finding
out what he will finally discover,
that the best men
are the most moderate
.
Intemperance of mind, or manner in a foreigner,
gives colour to the imputation, that all are
incendiaries
.
It becomes therefore, a matter of discretion,
and just prudence, on his part, to be cautious in
coming
forward to take a lead in politics, until he has
well examined the field of controversy. But because
foreigners may abuse the privilege, I would not
exclude
them by a law, did the matter rest on first
principles
I should think myself justifiable in
excluding
from my society, and the government I had
formed, the inhabitants of another planet, could they
come from thence because I do not know the kind of
nature they are of; but men of this earth, of similar
forms, and of like passions with ourselves, what have
I to fear from them? What right have we to exclude
them? We are not born for ourselves; nor did we
atchieve the revolution for ourselves only. We fought
the cause of all mankind; and the good and great of
all mankind wished well to us in the contest. With
what anxiety did we look to Europe, for assistance.
We derived assistance even from the good will of
nations
.
It is an advantage to have a popular cause in
a war. Have we a right to shut ourselves up in our
shell, and call the society we have formed, our own
exclusively
?
Suppose we had a right to the
government
exclusively, have we a right to the soil? That is
ours, subject to
the right of all mankind
.
Pre-occupancy
can give a right, but to a small portion of the soil to
any individual. To as much only as is reasonably
necessary
for his subsistence. All the remainder is a
surplus, and liable to be claimed by the emigrant.
If he cannot get his right under the great charter of
nature, without coming within the sphere of our
government
,
and we hinder him to establish a society
for himself within ours, why abridge him even for a
moment, of the rights, immunities, and privileges of
that which we have instituted? But I had not meant
to take up this subject, though I have inadvertently
fallen into it. I shall drop it here, and go into the
sequel
of this important history.
CHAP. XI.
THEY now began to approach the new settlement.
This bordering on the Indian country, the inhabitants
were presumed to be half savages. It was thought
proper therefore, to approach them with a
talk
.
Accordingly
Harum Scarum, was appointed for that
purpose
and taking a saddle girth for a belt of wampum
he set out for the frontier.
Passing through a wood, he heard the scream of
a panther, and advancing, saw it on a tree. Taking
this for a back-woods man, or half Indian, he
accosted
him in the vernacular idiom of a savage, which he
had learned, from the Indian treaties published in the
news-papers. Brother, said he, do you want
whiskey? We have a little in our keg at the camp.
We have come here to bury the hatchet. It is two
moons since we have been travelling. Our squaws
are all at home, or we have none. Have you got a
little killicaneeque, that we may smoke the calumet
of peace; brighten up the chain of friendship, and
sit round our council fires? Our young men are
behind
with their tomhacks. But the great spirit has
taken off the cocks of their guns, and they come to
shake hands, and set their traps on these waters.
L 2
At that instant a settler, on the other side the
wood, shot the panther, which Harum Scarum
observing
,
ran in to help off with the hide, and became
acquainted with the marks-man. This was an
introduction
,
and no farther was necessary. He took the
skinning
to be scalping;
and that it was one savage
that had shot another, and, as is the way of the world,
he determined to take part with the conqueror.
Assisting
to flay the panther, that was lately his brother,
he learned the news of the county town, of the new
settlement, and gave account of the Captain, and his
new-comers, and brought the hunts-man along, to
taste their whiskey, and conduct them to the village.
It may seem strange that we hear nothing of the
Latin schoolmaster all this time; but the fact is, that
coming through the lack-learning settlement, they had
gaged him, to keep him from speaking Greek; and his
mouth was sore for a long time after, so that he could
not even speak Latin; but as soon as he got into the
village, he began to ejaculate.
In nova fert animus, mutatas dicere formas
Italiam, fato profugus, Lavinaque venit
Nos patriam fugimus: Tu Tityre lentus in umbra
There were several Indian traders in the town, who
understood Delaware, Shanee, Munsy, and Mingo, but
they took this for Chippewaw, or as they pronounce it,
Jibway, and did not understand it. They gave him,
however
,
some boiled corn with bears oil in it, and threw
him a skin to ly down upon. Closing his mouth, with
Odi profanum vulgus, et arceo,
he fell asleep.
The first thing a settler does, when he goes to the
new country, is to look out for a spring. Hard by he
builds a cabbin, of the stocks of trees, laid at right
angles
,
and forming a square, or parallelogram. A
stone serves for a back-wall, and an aperture over it to
give vent to the smoke.
The settler brings with him few implements of
husbandry, because he is poor, and has them not to
bring; or the carriage is not in his power, from the
want of draught cattle. An axe, a mattock, a
cornhoe
without a handle, perhaps plough-irons, an augre,
and a saw.
His household furniture is a pot, a frying-pan, a
kettle, and sometimes a grid-iron. A few blankets,
and a bed-tick to fill with oak leaves, is a luxury.
A cow to give milk, is almost indispensable; and
the rifle, with a little ammunition sparingly used,
supplies
flesh for the family. He must occasionally take
a turn to the settlement to get a bag of flour, and a
quart or two of salt.
His horses, if he has any, range in the woods;
and a good deal of time is spent in looking them up,
when wanted for service.
A breeding sow is an admirable acquisition, big
with pigs. If he can bring one with him, which is
most generally accomplished, he has soon a herd of
them, living on the pea vine, that supersedes the
casual
supply of hunting, and covers the sides of the
chimney
with hams, just at hand to cut off and broil.
It is of great advantage to the settler to be able
to handle a tool, and to lay a stone. It would
be advisable, therefore, in a father who means to send
out his son, when grown up, to the new country, to
put him some time to a carpenter, and to a stone
mason
.
His own smithery he cannot well do, as an anvil,
a pair of bellows, &c. are heavy to be carried; but the
greatest drawback is, that he cannot resist the
solicitations
of his neighbours, to assist them occasionally,
and this takes him from the main branch of his
improvement
and cultivation.
The settlement is usually begun in this manner,
and carried on by poor, honest, and industrious
people
.
The town on the other hand, at the
commencement
is usually a nest of adventurers, that have more
wit than money, and more experience than industry.
A tavern-keeper, or publican, that passes for
a
republican
, to get custom; a horse jockey, a
store-keeper
,
and a young lawyer, are the first that you find
domiciliated in this metropolis.
The young lawyer that had got to this place, was
half starved, either because there was no other
to help
him to breed suits
; or rather, which is most probable,
because the state of society had not yet so improved,
as to draw with it the inevitable consequent of
valuable
,
and individual property, litigation, and law suits.
The small controversies that had yet arisen, were
determined
by
arbitration
. These related chiefly to
occupancy
and the rights of settlement; or contracts,
as simple as the subjects of them, and involving no
intricacy
.
But the inhabitants, either from the love of
novelty, or finding the system of arbitration inadequate
to the administration of justice, began to wish to have
fixed principles and permanent tribunals
, to govern and
guard life, reputation, and property.
Not many months after the Captain had fixed himself
in this place, and began to have weight among the
people, there was a town-meeting on this subject, and
it was proposed to have a code of laws, a court, and
advocates
,
as in other settlements.
Is it possible? said the Captain, being in the habit
of speaking his mind freely. In the mid-land
settlements
,
they are going to burn the lawyers, as they did
the witches in New-England; and as to judges, it is
as much as a man's life is worth to resemble one;
either in the brogue of his tongue, or the cut of his
jib, I mean his hat; or coat that he wears; such is
the odium, under which that profession, or corps of
men labour. Arbitration is in every bodies mouth,
and
down with the courts
. A lawyer indeed! Raising the
devil was in vogue in the middle ages of the church;
but has been laid aside in Christendom, since black cats
became scarce, as without them there is a difficulty in
laying him; but what can lay a lawyer, when he is
once up? The hurricane which carries away the
haystack
,
is nothing to the breath of his mouth, that bears
away people's property, by the fees which he exacts.
It was thus the Captain laboured to dissuade them
from the proposition, with as much earnestness, and
similar success, as Samuel dissuading the people of
Jewry, not from a jury trial, but from monarchy, in
the days,
when they wished the kings to succeed judges
.
And the fact is, that tyranny gets her best foot-hold on
the backs of courts of law, and judges. But those
judges had ceased to let the people every man do
what was right in his own eyes, and therefore they
wished for monarchs and despots. For if they were
not to have perfect liberty, it was as well to be
hanged
for an old sheep as a lamb, and were unwilling to
halt between two opinions.
But the people of the settlement before us, had an
idea that courts of justice were the best preservatives
of a republic; and barriers against monarchy, and
despotism
.
They had got a maxim in their heads,
pronounced
by the Latin schoolmaster when he rose out of
his sleep.
Misera est servitus, ubi Jus Vagum, et incognitum.
It is the worst slavery where the law is unknown, or
uncertain. And they had found arbitration to decide
like the oscillation of a pendulum, and all began to call
out for something more stable.
OBSERVATIONS.
WHENCE does the uncertainty of law arise? Let
us trace it. There is the
letter of the law
. Litera
scripta manet.
What is written lasts
. But there
is the spirit, that is
the construction
of the laws. This
depends upon the mind of the construer; and two men
may not in some cases, construe alike.
There is again the
application of the rule to the
case;
And it is the mind that must apply. The
history
of these constructions, and applications, are found
in what are called
reports
. But this history, like other
histories, is not always the truth. No two judges, or
two lawyers, will agree precisely in their statements
of the same decision. Some particulars, omitted, or
added, makes the variance. Yet these are helps to
establish the decision.
What is it that can correct the construction, or the
application as it was originally made, or as it appears
in the report? Reason. It was this at first made the
construction, or the application. Hence the maxim,
that nothing which is against reason, can be law.
When the
usage and custom
which makes
unwritten
law, like the laws of a game at school, are in the
memory of men, and the application of them to the
case, depends upon two minds, it is morally, but not
physically certain, but the application will be the same.
But in all these cases, both of usage and custom, or of
written law, there is a
higher degree of certainty
than
where there are no positive institutions, or rules at
all. Which is most likely to establish certainty in the
transmission of usage and custom, or construction of
statutes, the occasional application of the law, by
arbitrators
,
who have little knowledge of positive
institutions
or tribunals in which records of legal
proceedings
are preserved, and men are employed, who have
devoted their lives to the study, and to the perfect
knowledge of which, they do not find a life sufficient?
Visionary men, like Rousseau, and Godwin, have
seldom more in view than to support paradoxes. The
ability is shewn by the novelty or extravagance of the
proposition. Godwin, in his Political Justice, with great
brilliancy, supports the idea of deciding every case
on its own peculiar circumstances
, according to the
notions
of equity, which lie in the breast of the judge.
This is what is done in Constantinople. But it is to
avoid this that
laws
are enacted, and means used to
procure uniformity of construction, and application in
a free country. The object is to produce
certainty
.
The imperfection of human judgment produces
uncertainty. This must be greater in proportion as
there is no buoy to steer by; but a great difficulty
arises, in the administration of the laws,
to guard the
consciences of men
. Which is most likely to secure
this? Tribunals open; and it is a principle of our
law,
that the courts shall be open; and shall be held at
known times and places
. Can arbitrations have this
requisite? It is a principle of jury trial, that the
jurors who are to try a particular cause, cannot be
known until they go upon it; and after hearing, they
are to be kept together without speaking to any one,
until they are agreed. There is not that opportunity
for labouring, a jury, that arbitration presents.
At the same time, I am not one of those who frown
upon arbitrations; or think those unworthy citizens
who meditate, or, inculcate the idea of what has been
called an
adjustment bill
. I profess myself a
reformist
;
and with regard to others who attempt reforms,
I am not ready to cry out, they that have turned the
world upside down, have come hither also. I have
been for leting the experiment be made. I know the
consequence that it will soon be laid aside. Perhaps
something might be retained of it that may be found
wise. But the difficulty of geting men together, that
act not immediately under a compulsory process, and
thus keeping them from being tampered with;
independent
of arbitrary notions of right or wrong, and
unassisted reasonings, will be found to be such, that
men, who in the sincerity, and benevolence of
patriotism
,
have called for the system in the extent
contemplated
will be the first to recede, and
acknowledge
M
that there is a difference between what is
rational
in theory, and practical amongst men
.
No one can have a greater contempt of Pedantry,
and opposition to reform
in principle, or practice
, than
I have. A professional man thinks himself learned,
because he is technical, and knows the terms of his
art, as a workman his tools; but has become
shackled
in forms, and a slave to precedents, and has no
horizon of original thought and comprehension. He
cannot recur to the correctress reason, or to
experiment
,
the scource of improvement amongst men.
At this particular time, there is a fermentation of
the public mind with regard to the administration of
justice. I have no fear for liberty, provided
the form
of the government is left untouched;
for a generous
constitution will soon give warning of the malady, and
on an error in reform, a fever will ensue, and demand
to be expelled
. The wounding, or destroying
a
principle
of the constitution,
affects liberty, as taking away
the trial by jury in the courts of law;
or placing the
tenure of a judicial commission
on other grounds than
on what the constitution has placed it;
and the like
vital
parts of the system.
To reform with
safety
requires a perfect knowledge
of the subject of the reform. To reform the law, either
in its principles, or administration, requires a lawyer;
a scientific, and philosophic lawyer, not a pedant,
even though on the bench of justice. Natural
narrowness
of mind, or technical contraction, unfits for this.
But an unreasonable jealousy of professional men is
to be avoided. There is such a thing as patriotism even
on the bench, and on the bench,
what interest can
there be but to lessen service?
Interest therefore here,
is not in the way of extending settlement by
arbitration
,
so far as it may be practicable, and
consistent
with the preservation of the
democracy
. For be
assured,
that the recoil of a measure, hurts the authours
more than those against whom the ordnance may have
been directed
.
But difference of opinion produces ill will. A man
and wife will separate on a disagreement which has
taken place about the fixing a hen-coop, or laying out
a bed of parsley. Christians have burnt each other
because
the one would say
off
, and the other
from
, and what
man of sense doubts, but the burner, and the burn'd
were equally good men. The creeds, confessions and
commentaries of the one were just as orthodox as the
other, but not precisely the same;
and the nearer they
came together the more wrath
. This ought to teach in
polities, at least,
concession, and forbearance
.
If objects of sense, mock the senses, and deceive
vision, how much more, things in the political or
moral world, which we cannot comprehend, but by
reasoning
. What a farce it was in the year 1779, in
America, to see committees formed from the one end of
the continent to the other, instituting regulations of the
prices of commodities, at a standing value when the
medium
of circulation continued to depreciate. The thing
was absurd; yet, I recollect Thomas Payne, an
uncommon
,
but uninformed man, was a secretary to a
committee
and an enthusiast in the project. The
committee
regulated that a measure of fine flour should
be sold for a shekel, and two measures of barley for
a shekel, in the gate of Samaria; but neither
barley
nor flour were brought to market, and as there
was no reasoning with the belly, the space of ten
days, undeceived the projectors.
The chymists tell us of substances that
decompose
,
which is a process in order to the composition of other
bodies; but that it depends upon a knowledge of the
properties and quantity, whether the ingredients
constitute
a
poison
, or a
medicine
. So may it be said of
the
spirit of reform
.
The practice of the courts in Pennsylvania, is
rendered
simple
to what it is in England; and could be
still improved, as it would seem to me; either by the
law of practice, which the courts themselves have the
power of making; or with the aid of the legislature.
But it is only a scientific man that understands the
system, as a farmer knows his grounds, who can
easily
and with safety complete the reformation. The
law itself, is much improved in Pennsylvania, both
criminal and civil, and I am not sensible of much
wanting, but in
the organization of the tribunals for its
administration
. Now it will not do, to make a law that
there shall be no
litigation;
or,
that every man shall
know the law;
for such a law cannot be carried into
effect. I doubt then, whether it will be found
satisfactory
to provide that every man shall be his own
lawyer, and his neighbours' judge in the capacity of
arbitrator
.
The excellence of jury trial is sanctioned by
immemorial
usage; and is secured to a certain extent
by the constitution. What is that extent?
Trial
by jury
shall be as heretofore. This mode of trial
has its laws. Does the constitution mean that
the laws
of this trial
shall be as heretofore? or, does it mean
any thing more? It may mean that it shall be the
mode of trial
in the same tribunals as heretofore; that
is,
the courts of justice
. Does it mean to bar
extending
the jurisdiction of the justice of the peace,
in point of action? This is a great question.
I admit that screwing up the construction of the
constitution too tight, the public mind will revolt
against it. Driven to a contention, much that is
valuable
in the constitution might be lost in that torrent
which an overstrained construction had produced, like
waters in a dam without a flood-gate. The discretion
of the legislative body must not be too much disputed.
It produces the very effect in some way or other, which
the over cautious apprehend. While the great
boundaries
of the constitution are unbroken, I do not fear
M 2
much from those lsws, which regulate the police of
justice, and may be enacted, and continued as the
experiment
may seem to justify. But I wish to see the
democracy move in the groove of our noble
constitution
;
like one of the heavenly bodies preserving its
orbit, and biding fair for perpetuity. For this reason,
I am afraid of even experiment, in a case where there
is doubt, and which is of great moment and delicacy.
BOOK IV.
CHAPTER I.
IT is full time we return a little, and see what
became
of the bog-trotter, whom we left in the capacity
of judge. This will best appear from a report of a
case tried before him, and which has been kindly
furnished
us by lawyer Tarapin who was council in the
cause.
Report
.
Slouch
, vs.
Crouch
.
This was an action of assault and battery, with two
counts; the first for assault and battery; the second
for an assault. The case as it came out upon the
evidence
,
was as follows.
Upon some ill words given by Crouch, as villain,
Grouch, made a blow at him with a cudgel. Crouch
crouching, as the name imports, let the blow slip over
him, which lighting upon Slouch, broke his head.
Upon
this Slouch had brought his suit against Crouch.
Lawyer Tarapin moved for a non suit, on the
ground that the action ought to have been against
Grouch, whose stick, though intended against Crouch,
yet trespassed, and hit upon Slouch.
Lawyer Heberden for the plaintiff, thought the
action
was properly brought, and that Crouch, who gave
the ill words that occasioned the outrage, was
responsible
for all the consequences; that he had no right
to take his head out of the way; but that it ought to
have remained at its post, which had it been the case
no blow could have fallen upon Slouch.
What with the names with terminations, of a like
sound, and the intricacy of the case, the judge was
puzzled
,
and geting in a passion, snatched a staff from a
constable, and fell upon the suitors. By my showl,
said he, I will be after bating de whole o'd you
togeder
.
A parcel of spalpeens and bog-trotters, to be
coming here and bodering me wid your quarrels, and
your explanations: better fight it out like men of
honour wid a shilelah, and not come here to trouble
de court about it.
He had broke the heads of several, and was laying
about him with the constables staff, the clerks not
being
able to interfere because they were blind, and the
citizens not being willing because they were afraid;
saying the culprits were in the hands of the judge,
and it did not behoove them to take the law into their
hands, and resist the execution.
However, the result was that the proceeding broke
up the court, and the blind Lawyer, Fidler and
bog-trotter
had to leave the country.
The bog-trotter followed the Captain, and the blind
Lawyer and Fidler followed him, to the new
settlement
.
It was just at this time they came in, when the
people were in commotion about the courts of justice.
It was opportune, and occasioned them all to be
provided
for by the influence of the Captain. Things
were reversed in some measure, from what they had
been in the country below; for the blind Lawyer, was
made the judge; the Fidler the cryer of the court,
and the bog-trotter a constable. The piper of whom
we have spoken, and who was an emigrant with the
Captain, there being no bell, or drum in the town,
opened the first court at this place, with his
bag-pipes
.
There was nothing now wanting but a Lawyer, and
that was not a want long; for as one rat brings
another
,
so lawyer brings lawyer. The one here already
was soon paired, and these two like stool pigeons,
attracted
others; so that, in a short time the whole
settlement
was full of them.
There was now a talk of encouraging a printer.
Some thought there were typographical errors enough
in the world. However, the people were disposed to
multiply them, and accordingly a printer was
encouraged
.
He set up a paper which he called the
Twilight
For, as there was a dawn in the east, it
seemed reasonable there should be a Twilight in
the west. The Evening Star, and the Western Star
have been names of Gazettes; but Twilight, for any
thing we have heard, would seem to be original.
The dawn.
That sweet hour of prime,
In the language of Milton. One of his most
beautiful paintings is that in which he speaks of it as
introducing the Sun,
Jocund to run
His longitude through heavens high road;
The grey dawn and the plieades before him danc'd
Sheding sweet influence.
The Dawn is a modest appellation for a paper,
bespeaking the beginning of light. The Twilight
not less so, meaning that small degree of it which
remains
after the sun is set. The device was an owl, a
cat, and a bat; the owl an emblem of wisdom, the
cat of vigilance; the bat of impartiality being of
equivocal
formation, and doubtful whether bird or beast.
At the same time these animals are all of the
Twilight
,
and therefore appropriate.
The motto by the Latin school master,
Si quid superesset agendum.
Clonmel the ballad singer furnished a few verses
to introduce the publication. The composition was
not the best; but, it was suited to the occasion.
The dawn and the twilight, have both but small
sky-light,
Yet pleasant are both in their prime,
For think of the moon, and the hot burning sun.
O' this is a far better time.
Hence name we the paper, and light up a taper
To lighten the clouds of the west.
If not the best skill, yet have the best will,
To make this our paper the best.
We want a little money to begin with, dear honey,
So bring it and take you the news.
Have a little heart, nor be sorry to part,
With a trifle like misers and jews.
We shall tell how the Spaniards, dress hides in their
tanyards,
Or curry their leather in France.
And when that we come to things nearer home,
You shall hear of these just at once.
Who's married? Who's broken? Who is shot, or
is choken,
By himself, or the hand of the law.
What dress is on foot, who has got a new clout,
To tickle the fancy and draw.
The lads that can write, now let them indite,
And here come speak their own praise;
On politics or pride, or threshing the hide,
Of judges and lawyers now a days.
'Tis all one to us, what the blunderbuss,
So that it but makes a noise,
So down with your ink-pots; thinkers or think nots,
And help out our journal, brave boys.
Harum Scarum was a contributor to the paper,
and dealt in fabrications and intelligence. Will
Watlin gave dissertations on oeconomies, taming
wild geese, and brewing beer out of wasps nests.
Tom the Tinker hankering after insurrections struck
his hammer on the government. The Latin
schoolmaster
was now employed as an Indian interpreter,
passing his Greek for the Chickasaw; nevertheless
found time to furnish a distic or hemistic, or Latin
epigram occasionally. O'Fin was a politician, and
brought down his flail upon Bonaparte, and said, had
it not been for his usurpation, there would have been
a republic in Ireland. The bag-piper was a merry
fellow, and brought his talents into hotch-pot in the
way of essays upon
drones;
shewing their use in a
commonwealth. Thus few papers were better
supported
than the Twilight and it had subscribers.
The great variety of talents,
Quoniam sic posit, suaves misscetis odores,
Said the Latinistthe great variety of talents
could not fail to furnish something to hit the taste of
every individual; and it is not so much excellency
N
as variety that pleases. The most odiferous shrub,
or rose ceases to delight, and we turn to another bush,
or take up even a less fragrant flower.
The passions having their vent in a gazette, saves
battery and bloodshed. In this view of the subject it
is an aid-du-camp to the laws; and if it should be
thought eligible to extend the province of the press,
and to canvass all matters depending in a court of
justice
,
it will be an accessary to the practice, and a
great acquisition in a free government. But this I
leave to the discretion of the legislature.
The bog-trotter wrote little; in fact nothing. He
was busy tending process in the capacity of constable;
and in one of his excursions met with an accident. He
set his foot on the spur of a horse-jockey; which,
in this new country, from the prick of the rowler, he
took for a rattle snake. Not waiting to look
behind
him, after it made the impression, and left a
puncture like the tooth of a serpent, he made his
tour to the town with great howling and
lamentation
.
A ligament was drawn tight about his ancle;
and the leg stroked down and the flesh pressed
towards
the orifice. Cold water from the mouth of a
tea kettle, was poured upon the wound, with a steady
current from a considerable height. Finally,
certain
roots, pointed out by the Indian traders, in a
cataplasm was applied to the foot, bandaged up, for
a fortnight, until all appearance, I need not say of
poison
,
for there was none, but all apprehension of poison,
and mortification was removed.
It will not be understood that I record this
incident
as an evidence of pusillanimity in the
bog-trotter
For a man of the firmest mind, might
reasonably
conceive an alarm at the idea of being bitten by
a snake. Such is the horror in the human mind
at even the touch, much more the bite of such a
reptile.
Milton represents the tempter as seducing Eve
under
the form of a serpent, and endeavours to render
that form amiable, by the art of description.
Inclos'd
In serpent, inmate bad, and towards Eve
Address'd his way, not with indented wave
Prone on the ground, as since, but on his rear,
Circular base of rising folds, that tower'd
Fold above fold, a surging maze; his head
Crested aloft, and carbuncle his eyes;
With burnish'd neck of verdant gold, erect
Amidst his circling spires, that on the grass
Floated redundant: pleasing was his shape,
And lovely: never since of serpent kind
Lovelier.
It would seem to me to have been an oversight in
Milton to make the tempter assume the snake. For he
is not supported by the Scripture. The idea in Genesis
is not that the tempter was in the guise of a serpent;
but of some creature which was, for that very act
condemned to be a serpent. Upon thy belly shalt
thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of thy
life. It is a metanomasia, or post-nomination.
The serpent was more subtil; that is the beast
which now we call a serpent, was then the wisest of
the field. It is impossible to imagine that creature,
which would seem to have been changed; for we
can no more imagine a new creature, than create one.
When the poets feign a griffin, it is but a winged
beast. The orc' of Aristo is made up of parts that are
taken from animals in nature.
But, it is to be presumed that the animal assumed
by the tempter, must have been next to the human,
the form the most beautiful in nature. The poet
represents
the transformation as denounced in the
garden
.
Without delay
To judgment he proceeded on th' accus'd
Serpent, tho' brute, unable to transfer
The guilt on him who made him instrument
Of mischief, and polluted from the end
Of his creation; justly then accurs'd.
As vitiated in nature
Because thou hast first done this, thou art accurs'd
Above all cattle, each beast of the field;
Upon thy belly grovelling thou shalt go,
And dust shall eat all the days of thy life.
I would have expected the metamorphose at this
time and place.
His visage drawn he felt to sharp and spare,
His arms clung to his ribs, his legs intwining
Each other, till supplanted down he fell
A monstrous serpent on his belly prone,
Reluctant; but in vain, a greater pow'r,
Now rul'd him, punish'd in the shape he sinn'd,
According to his doom.
Since my first reading of the Poem, I have been
struck with the incongruity of representing the
animal
which the tempter assumed, as being a serpent
in the first instance. yet there is classical authority
for supposing it possible, that a serpentine form could
be the subject, even of affection.
Lovelier: not those that in Illyria chang'd
Hermione and Cadmus, or the god
In Epidarus, nor to which transform'd
Ammonian Jove, or Capitoline was seen,
He with Olympias, this with her who bore,
Scipio the height of Rome.
And Dryden in his Ode on St. Cecilia's day;
When he to fair Olympia prest,
Awhile he sought her snowy breast,
And then around her slender waist he curl'd
And stampt an image of himself, a sovereign
of the world.
N 2
Yet strange as it seems to me, the antients in some
countries, appear not to have had this horror of
serpents
.
In the temple of Esculapius, the god himself
was said to visit his patients disguised under the form
of a great serpent, the caresses of which re-animated
them with new hope. Serpents in general were
consecrated
to this god. He appears to have had a
particular
predilection for those found in the
neighbourhood
of Epidarus, which are of a colour approaching
to a yellow, have no poison, are tame and gentle,
and love to live in familiarity with man. That which
the priests keep in the temple, will sometimes wind
round their bodies, or raise himself on his tail to take
the food which they present him on a plate. He is
rarely suffered to go out; but, when this liberty is
permitted him, he walks majestically through the
streets, and as his appearance is deemed a happy
omen, it excites universal joy.
These familiar serpents are found in the other
temples
of Esculapius. They are very common at Pella,
the capital of Macedonia. The women there keep
them for their amusement. In the great heats of
summer, they wind them round their necks, like
necklaces. During my stay in Greece, it was said
that Olympia, queen of Philip king of Macedon, had
one of them, which she frequently took to bed to her,
and it was even added, that Jupiter had taken the form
of that animal, and that Alexander was his son.
Translation of Anacharsis
.
Nevertheless, I still think that the more natural
allegory in Milton, and better supported by the
Scripture
,
would have been the idea of some creaturee the
most beautiful, as well as the wisest, tempting Eve,
and thence as a punishment, undergoing
transformation
.
So much for criticism.
CHAP. II.
INACUS founded Argos; Cecrops Athens;
Cadmus Thebes in Boetia; Romulus Rome; and
Penn, Philadelphia. Now who formed the town of
which we are speaking, cannot be said; for it was
founded by a congluvies of mortals like the company
of David, in the cave of Adullam. Every one that
was in distress; and every one that was discontented,
gathered themselves unto him. Amongst these a
broken judge came in, who complained that he was
unjustly broken.
A word with you friend, said the Captain. Were
you not tried by a competent tribunal?
Yes, said the Judge; but the judgment was
unjust
.
Why not appeal? It was the tribunal in the
last resort.
What, said the Captain; can there be an error in
a dernier decision? What is it, according to
yourselves
that makes the law, but decision? Precedent
is authority. What has reason to do in the case?
Once it gets into the books, and becomes a case, let
me see what judge can undo it; or question the
reason
of it. It has become law.
We must take the
law as we find it
. If Holt has once said it, the game
is up; or Buller; or Kenion. It is a knock 'im
down argument, that Paterson has ruled it so; or
Washington, or Marshal. It is the construction of
the judge makes the law. It is the application to facts
proved, or admitted, that makes the case; and the
application being by the constitutional tribunals, there
is no more to be said about it. Positive institutions
are arbitrary things, and there is no reason necessary
that they are as they are. You a judge, and talk of
an unjust judgment, where it has been given by those
who alone have had a right to judge. This shews
that you were not fit for your office; so turn in there,
we shall do the best we can for you; but no more
caterwauling
about the injustice of your sentence; you
sent many a man from your decisions, I will
undertake
to say, dissatisfied; but the law had determined
it; It had become a case; and there was an end of
the disquisition.
The Judge hung his lip, and turned into a
cabbin
.
A young Doctor had come here. What
learning
he had before he came, is not of so much
consequence
,
as what
practice
he had afterwards. One
thing he had acquired, the cant of a physician, that
had he been called sooner, before the constitution had
lost its tone; or nature her diathesis to co-operate
with the medicine; a cure might have been effected;
and even as it was, by preserving regimen, something
might be done. The quack taking care first to find
out what the patient liked best; and especially
prohibiting
that, because, as he knew the indulgence
could not all at once be restrained absolutely, it was
morally certain, the patient would transgress a little,
and furnish the complaint with a pretence to stick by
him in spite of the faculty.
A young woman had been found in the woods,
naked, gag'd, and had been, as she said, tyed to a
tree. The account she gave, was that she had been
taken out of a
nunnery
in Canada, where she had been
educated: was on her way to her father in Kentucky,
a rich man; had been robbed of a thousand doubloons
by her conductor, stripped of her silks and muslins,
and left to perish in the wilderness. Imagination, or
philanthropy, saw truth in her history; and she was
fed and clothed, not as the law directed, but as
humanity
dictated, and brought into good company.
At the first discovery of her, she was thought to be
a mortal; but in a short time she was conceived to
be an angel. There were an hundred that would have
married her, had it not been for this distrust of being
real flesh and blood. But by this time it began to be
found out, or at least suspected, that the nunnery had
been no farther off than a city of these states, and
under
the care of brothers, rather than sisters; and
where the employment was something else than needle
work. In the opinion of most persons she became a
mortal, that had put off her duds; and except in odes
or dithyrambics, we hear little farther of her as a
divinity
.
The preacher of the town was a Methodist that
had been a horse thief; and when he had taken his
text and was warning from the like offence, and
telling
the danger of it, he would put back his wig, and
say you see, I have lost my ears by it.
Ecce signum, said the Latin schoolmaster;
Segnius irritant aminos demissa per aurem,
Quam qu sunt oculis subjecta fidelibus.
At an early period, the ceremony of marriage had
been dispensed with, in this town, as is the case
where there are not magistrates or priests at hand
to officiate, and make the legal copula, or knot of
marriage. Diana, and her nymphs; the three
graces, and the nine muses, are represented as not
marrying at all. It is to be presumed, that it is
owing
to the same cause, the absence of the justice of
the peace, or the parson. But it is always spoken of
as the first step towards civilization, the coupling
in marriage.
Sancire leges.
Concubitu prohibere vago.
The Captain being elected governor of the new
state, paid attention in the first instance, to this
matter
of police, and directed the girdle of Hymen, to be
added to the zone of Venus, in all cases where it
had been yet wanting. The settlement in a new
country, is in some respects delightful; the country
in its virgin state; before the underwood is browzed
upon, and the luxury of flowers, and shrubs is
repressed
by the beasts of burden, or the labours of the
husbandman
It has seemed to me that the streams run
clearer in a new country than the old; they are
certainly
more abundant. The cultivation of the soil
uncovering
the vallies, lets in the rays of the sun which
drink up the moisture, and open fissures in the earth,
where the streamlets sink and disappear. Hence it
is that we read of brooks, and rivulets in the classic
and long cultivated countries, which bubble now, only
in the song of the muses.
Sunk are their fountains, and their channels dry.
The natural moss on the margin of the fountains
and the rivers in a new country, are greener, and
furnish
a more romantic seat,
Saxo sedilia vivo,
shaded by the umbrage of the forest than the clover of the
meadow; or the artificial bank and bowers of the
garden
itself. How delightful the small parties that are
made upon the water of the rivers in skiffs, or canoes,
or in the shades of the forest, and near a spring head,
at a fete champetre or barbecue, where the company
assemble, nor yet divided by the classifications of
wealth or pride. I do not wonder that the young
people
of the Israelites were apt to be seduced to
sacrifice
in high places, on hills, and under every green
tree, even though prohibited, inasmuch as these
situations were so delightful, at least in the summer
seasons.
The flowers of the forest are a' wed away,
in the old school ballad, is a fine expression; for the
flowers of the forest are unquestionably of a more
lively bloom, and finer odour than those of a garden;
and that atmosphere of fragrance, which from a
wilderness
of verdure, pours upon the senses, overwhelms
with delight. There is no ague, or fever here, for
the exhalation from the foliage, is aromatic to the
smell. The gale is not tainted with miasmata. The
air is a bed of perfume and the vapour tastes of nectar
and ambrosia.
Such scenes, and such air must be salutary.
Whatever the component parts or qualities, hydrogen,
or oxygen of which the chymists speak,
certain
it is that the air breathed from plants and
flowers is favourable to health and longevity.
Inhaled
by the lungs it is restorative to the tabesscent, and
as a vapour bath to the whole body is salubrious. A
ride from the sea coast to an ultramontane settlement
in the spring of the year is resuscitation to an almost
dead constitution.
But it would seem to be owing to other causes
than mere bodily vigour and health, that the
inhabitants
of a new country, appear to have more
intellectual
O
vigour, and in fact more understanding in the
same grade of education, than the inhabitants of an
old settlement, and especially of towns and cities.
The mind enlarges with the horizon. Place a man
on the top of a mountain, or, on a large plain, his
ideas partake of the situation, and he thinks more
nobly than he would under the ceiling of a room, or
at a small country seat.
It may be that the change of situation gives a
spring to the mind, and that the intercourse with that
variety of characters which emigrate, increases the
stock of knowledge. Whether owing to these, or other
causes, it unquestionably appears to me, that the
ultramontaneer, is, in general the superior man,
in the same occupation, and pursuit in life. This
would seem to hold good out of the learned
professions
which require a propinquity to the libraries of
Appollo, as well as the seats of the muses; but we have
in view chiefly that natural sagacity, and discernment
of spirit, and strength of mind which constitutes
mental
superiority. Perhaps it may be that the most
active
spirits are those that emigrate; or that people
put to their shifts which is the case in a new
country
,
acquire a vigour of mind, proportioned to the
exercise
.
There is one thing observable that in a new
settlement
,
society is coveted, because it is scarce; and
mutual wants produce reciprocal accommodation.
The emigrants coming also, from different quarters,
and hitherto unknown to each other, do not bring
with them latent, or professed enmities; and the
mind, ira, amicitia, vacuus, is open wholly for new
impressions
.
Family feuds, of an old standing, or of
recent
inception, do not exist. The absence of all
chagrin
is a state of mind more easily coveted than
explained
either as to its sensations, or as to its
consequences
.
But it is a main spring of happiness in a
settlement, that the improver begins upon a new plan,
and upon his own scale; and he has his shades, and
his avenues at once, without waiting for the trees to
grow. There are neither ruins, nor vestiges of decay
before his eyes, but a young country receiving young
cultivation; just at the will of the possessor, without
the necessity of sacrificing taste to what had been
begun, and half finished. Suffice it to have said these
things to the encouragement of young people who
may not be well provided for by those before them,
and are disposed to seek their fortunes dependent only
on themselves.
CHAP. III.
THE Captain in the capacity of governor, began to
turn his thoughts towards government; and considered
with himself what had been the means of governing men,
from time immemorial. This he found might be
comprehended
under two general heads,
fear and affection
.
The
priest
is an adjunct of fear, because he holds out
the horror of what is to come, or is invisible.
What the origin of sacrifices? The true religion
ordain'd them being of mystical type and signification;
The false, in order to be like the true, and also,
because
not having tithes, these became doubly
necessary
for subsistence. For when a bullock was
offered
up to the gods, the smell went to them, but the
taste to mortals. It was not that any thing could be
got out of visscera, that tripes were inspected; but
because this could not be done until the cow was
killed
;
and in that case, the
Priest got a beef-stake
.
What contempt would one entertain of the
Haruspices
,
pouring over the entrails of cattle, in order to
ascertain
the events of futurity, if he had no idea, all this
time that it led to a
barbecue
.
Having discovered this, he would do the past ages
more justice, and would be disposed to acknowledge,
that men were not just such fools, heretofore, as he
had thought them to be.
But what the origin of human sacrifices? That
has a deeper foundation. It was not that the Gentiles
devoured them; or were Cannibals. But, it was a
state engine, and under pretence that a human victim
was desired by the gods, some individual obnoxious to
the government, was pointed out by the Priest, in
collusion
with the officer, and made the holocaust. We
have a proof of this from the poet Virgil, who puts a
tale into the mouth of Sinon, viz. that a victim being
necessary to procure a favourable wind to the Greeks
to return home, Ulysses having a grudge on an old
account, got Calchas to denounce Pil Garlick, as the
one the gods had pitched upon; and accordingly being
marked out for the altar, he had run off. In the Foola
country, according to Winterbottom, whom we have
already quoted, the Bondoo woman is made use of by
the Purra, to single out the culprit that is to go to pot,
and be knocked on the head. In the south sea islands,
it is the usual policy. A letter from a missionary at
Otaheit, tells us that the Emperor of that island, lately
dead, had offered up in his time, at least, two thousand
human persons. These were, doubtless, such as had
been in opposition to the administration.
Lettres de cachet, had answered this end in France;
the inquisition in Catholic countries, which was an
ecclesiastical
tribunal, served the same purpose.
O 2
The clergy in free states, are useful to
government
;
but not in the same way. It is by inculcating
obedience as a divine precept; and a moral duty. This
is the only alliance of church and state, that exists
in this country. Or if the clergy here do not touch
upon politics at all, yet by teaching such doctrines as
lead men to virtue, they make them good citizens.
Even the Calvinist, though he talks of nothing but
faith,
and spiritual affections
, yet produces the effect
of good works. So that in fact he comes to the same
point with the Arminian who talks chiefly of good
works.
In the antient republics, founded like ours, on
reason
,
and the laws
, the power of speech was the great
means of keeping men together. Hence the orators
of the popular assemblies. With us the press is the
great pulley, by which the public mind is hoisted up,
or let down to any sentiment. It is a wonderful block
and tackle, so to speak, on board the state ship. It
can overthrow a good administration, and for a while
support the bad. But the press cannot exist but
by liberty. Nevertheless the freedom of it may
be lost by its own exertions. The intemperance, and
indiscretion of the journalist, propels to popular
excesses
,
which subdue the laws; and bring despotism.
See the French Revolution.
These were the reflections of the governor, who
thought it fortunate that a press had been established
in his government as a vehicle of information, but was
a little afraid of some of the correspondents;
Harum
Scarum, Tom the Tinker; Clonmel the ballad singer;
Will Watlin, and others. O'Fin the Irishman
was an
excellent flail man; but threshing grain, and
threshing
in a new paper, require, if not different powers of
mind, yet at least different cultivation. He was an
honest good hearted fellow; but as on a barn floor,
an unskilful, or careless person will bring the voluble
end of the jack-staff about his own head; and hurt;
so it is with a politician who enters the list with a
view to do good; but, from mistake of the true
interest
of the body politic, does harm.
Under this idea of the effect of a journal to guide,
or mislead the public mind, the Governor solicited an
interview with the editor of the Twilight. After
such introductory compliments and observations as
may be presumed on the occasion, the governor
insensibly drew him (the editor) into a conversation
on the subject of the press, and his gazette in
particular
.
Editor, said he, your good sense I know, and
your patriotism; but I am afraid of your being a
little
too much carried away with the spirit of the times,
oeconomies; dissolution of courts, disuse of codes of
law, and invectives against lawyers. There is a
medium
in all things. This may be carried too far.
Would you not think it prudent to restrain this
down-hill
speed a little. As to attacks upon the
administration
or the policy of measures merely executive, or
even the constitutionality, or expediency of a law, I
should think the greatest freedom may be used; or
the public conduct of men in office may be canvassed;
though, by the bye, I should not think the public had
any interest in their amours, their costume, as for
instance
the cut of their pantaloons, or the colour of
their breeches; or peccadilloes, even in the breaches
of decorum. Such restriction may perhaps be laying
an anchor to winward in my own behalf, as I am not
the most exact of all men in these particulars. But
I ask or wish for no indulgence, on the score of
official
acts; let them be the subject of your
examination
and strictures. At the same time, taking the
rule of humanity for your guide, as expressed by the
Poet,
Nothing extenuate, or set down ought in malice.
But I advert chiefly to such sentiments, as poison
in respect of the elementary principles and
constitutions
of government itself, and the prostration of those
establishments on which the security of
property,
reputation
and
liberty depends
.
You will assign us typographists a very narrow
sphere, indeed, said the editor; and you will strike
away from us the
footstool of all our popularity
.
What is it to the macaronie, whether you acquire
territory to the republic, or lose it; but what is the
fashion of your boot, or the cape of your coat? What
is it to a female, whether you wisely sanction a
remedial
act by your approbation, or negative it? But
whether you keep a mistress, or ever had one. The
taste of your subscribers is as various, as their faces,
and we must please our subscribers. Every body can
understand scurrility, but it requires one to knit the
brow to take up a report on the finances. As to the taste
of the time, we must fall in with it, if we mean to
keep on the popular side of the question. The rage
is now oeconomies, and down with the lawyers. We
cannot avoid harking in a little. You are not to take
it for granted that we speak our own minds in every
thing you see in our papers; no more than an
advocate
who is employed on the wrong side to plead:
It happens to fall to his lot, and he finds his account
in it.
Cannot you fill up your journal, said the Captain,
or at least a great part of it, with essays on
agriculture
;
experiments in chymistry, mathematical
problems
or love adventures, years ago, or at a great
distance! Let the governors, and the laws alone,
since you cannot speak of them just according to
your own judgment.
That would never do, said the editor. The
public
would not take half the interest in it. Finding
fault is a secret satisfaction, and the source of great
delight to the human mind. Hence slanders in
society
.
Why not much more in public life? When
a man builds a cabbin, it pleases us to object to the
plan, or something done about it; much more when
the subject of our remark is of a high and noble
nature
,
such as a measure of the executive.
The fact is, a newspaper is a battery, and it must
have something to batter at. Where the editor is a
friend to the executive, or the legislative part of the
administration, he must make a butt of the
judiciary
.
It is against this he must bring his catapult, or
battering
ram, to bear. Fortunate the man who is
unentramelled
with any attachments, or restraints, of
affection
,
gratitude, or obligation: he has the whole before
him, and he is not under the necessity of slackening
his efforts, at one angle, lest he should affect another.
A clear field, and no favour. That is the province of
the printer. An advocate seldom finds it his interest
to be retained by a suitor altogether. And as to
building up systems, that is what we do not so well
understand
.
We leave that to the sages, and philosophers,
with whom we are naturally at war. It is not our
fort; every man has his faculty. One to spin a rope;
another to pick oakum.
Well; said the Captain, you must take your own
way. I had no idea of shackling the press, but only
of suggesting such hints, as might conduce to its
credit
,
and the good of the community.
I do not know, said the Governor to the Chief
Justice; the blind lawyer who was present; the
editor now withdrawn; I do not know, said he,
whether
,
notwithstanding my observations to the printer,
something might not be done in setling suits, and
composing differences in matters of property without
such extensive codes of jurisprudence and court trials,
with advocates, and endless speeches. I should like
to hear your idea on this subject, Chief Justice,
Might we not do without such struggling to exist
in other respects, said the Chief Justice? The acre
must be grubbed; the maize planted; the sickle is
necessary. Why clothing? at least why taylors.
Skins, or a plaid might answer. Why houses? It
is probable that mankind had tried the acorn; the
bear skin; the cave, or the hut before these. Must
they return to this state, to see whether they cannot
now do without them?
The presumption is, that before laws, men had
tried what it was to dispense with them. Jury trial
would not seem to have been an invention, all at once
like the Cotton loom by Arkwright. It is probable
that it was considered an improvement upon
arbitrations
,
when it first came into use. But it would not
seem to have been adopted all at once, but to be the
result of successive amendments. In fact, it is
nothing
but a mode of arbitration by the vicinage, uniting
with it the advantage of a court to inform as to what the
law is, and furnishing an executive authority to carry
awards into effect, and execution
.
This trial is of immemorial usage, and hid in
deep antiquity. If we had its history, it would be
seen that its laws, are the result of gradual accession;
and these added from an experience of defect. Just
as in our own time, and in these states, we find
amendments
,
or at least, changes in the summoning, return,
impaneling, or serving of juries.
The privilege of council in capital cases; as to
matters of fact, or witnesses on oath, is but a late
acquisition in England. And the presumption is, that
at least, as to the privilege of council, it did not
originally
obtain in
civil cases
. But that the prerogative
of the crown had impeded this improvement in the
criminal laws, so that it did not keep equal pace with
that in the civil. Yet with us it begins now to be
thought a grievance to have council in any case. It
seems to be a wish of many to try a system of judicial
determination without it.
What would be the effect of the experiment of
simple arbitration? Said the Governor.
An injury to credit, said the Chief Justice; men
would not so readily give trust, knowing that the
screw of the law was relaxed, and they could not so
readily recover what was due to them; of course, it
would reduce contracts; and bring matters to the
immediate
exchange of money, and commodities.
In the third place, it would shake the security of
property
,
real and personal; on account of the
uncertainty
of holding it, the rules of evidence being
rendered
uncertain before a tribunal having no rules;
and also on account of having no principles of
contract
or use, but the notions of right and wrong, in
the breasts of the auditors; and these as changeable
as the different sets that sit upon a controversy.
In the last place, it would check, if not put a stop
to all improvement. A great object of the social
compact
,
is the security of private property; the
ascertaining
and protecting the meum and tuum; the
mine, and thine of possessions. With sovereigns the
ultima ratio regum, is the means of redress in case
of an invasion. Of trespass with individuals in a state
of society, what else but the laws? and what are laws
without tribunals to lay down and enforce them?
tribunals
,
not casual and temporary, but fixed, and
moving
with set times, and the regularity of clock work;
tribunals who have rules of property as well
understood
,
and as certain in their applications, as the laws
of gravitation, or magnetism. When the Barons met
at Runningmede, did they complain of any thing more
than the delay of justice. Nulli negabimus, nulli
deferemus
justiam, is a provision of Magna Charta.
Could there be steady justice, otherwise than by a
proper
organization of courts and juries? Not unless
we take the short way of despotism, and appoint
subordinates
with a prompt power, and arbitrary
discretion
Trial by jury and the constituted courts, had
been in use, time out of mind, before Magna Charta,
P
and more than eight hundred years since, it has been
tolerated; nay prized, and the constant subject of
eulogy; notwithstanding what I consider as that which
might be the subject of amendment, the
principle of
unanimity
. It ought not rashly to be changed, in
the
essential law of its nature, that it shall be annexed to a
court where men sit, who are learned in the usages, and
customs, or written laws of the society
. Human
wisdom
never has devised an equal mode of uniting the
means of
ascertaining fact, and applying law
. It is
the life-giving principle in this regulation, that the
jury and the court are associated in the trial, and that
one cannot move without the other. As to the mode
of bringing forward juries, by return of the sheriff;
by a special jury, selected in the manner known, or
by election of the country, these are particulars of a
lesser
nature, and may be the subject of modification from
time to time, and yet the vital principle preserved.
But the moment, the tribunals of fact and law are
separated
,
the
talismanic charm is gone;
that which was
never understood before, will then be felt.
But, said the Governor, did they not lay aside law
judges, and attempt the system of mere a-bitrament
in France, during the revolution?
It would have been matter of wonder if they had not,
said the Chief Justice. When the cord from its extreme
tension is let go, it vibrates nearly as far on the other
side of the circle to that from which it had been drawn.
What could you expect in the return from despotism
but the opposite extreme? In the state of the public
mind, in France, what was there to arrest at a
medium
?
Was it natural for the preciptancy of the
national
will, to stop short of the utmost latitude? You
might as well expect the stone of Sysiphus down hill,
of itself, to stop short, at a proper point.
Of what account was it, what the mode of settling
disputes, relative to property in France, at some
periods
of the revolution? Proscriptions brought
owners
and possessors, so quickly to the guillotine; and
conscriptions took them so hastily to the cannons'
mouth, or the bayonet point, that it was of little
consequence
what the tribunals of justice, or of litigation.
But had they the trial by the vicinage there to loose?
Or, have they continued to do even without judges?
Bonaparte, you may say, has given them courts. If
he had let them alone, they would have had them of
themselves, unless anarchy had continued, or some
other sovereignty of a like nature had taken place.
What was the law in France before the revolution?
From what sources drawn? The
Roman civil law
.
Not this only, but usages, customs, and written laws
of a general, or local nature, derived from their Gallic
ancestors; or from the Goths of Franconia; from the
law of nature; from the law of nations; from
municipal
institutions, and a thousand sources as numerous,
as the springs that make the rivers of their country.
Could not property be held and adjudged without
a knowledge of all these? Said the Governor. No
more than you could breathe without the atmosphere,
unless another atmosphere be given you. For what is
property, but that
which is peculiarly my right?
And
what constitutes it my right, but the laws under which
it was acquired, and to which it is subject?
Is this Roman civil law, that you speak of, a thing
of much extent? Said the Governor.
It is as extensive, said the Chief Justice, as the
common law with us, or as any law must be, that
arises out of the concerns of a great community, or is
provided for it. Romulus made regulations; Numa
institutions; the plebiscita, or resolutions of the
tribunes
,
and the commons; Senatus consulta; judicia
pretoris; responsa prudentum; these contained in the
twelve tables, institutes, pandects, and commentaries,
are grounds of that law, which on the decline and fall
of the empire, was incorporated by the barbarous
nations
in their codes, as they became civilized, and an
agricultural, and commercial people. It is the
experience
and wisdom of ages which can alone provide
for the cases of difference in matters of claim, or right
amongst a people. It will require the application of
years in those who administer these laws, to acquire a
knowledge of the rules established relative to them,
and which rules, by the change of property under
them, have become as much the right of the citizen
as the property itself. For the laws of property go
with it; and is the right of the purchaser; and as
much a part of his estate, as the charters and
documents
that constitutes the evidence of the acquisition.
A bit of a manual or collect of the rules of a
legislative
body, will fill a duodecimo volume; and yet how
small a part is this of the law of parliament, which
embraces privileges, immunities, laws of election,
and expulsion, &c. &c. &c. And in the code of the
community, there are a thousand chapters of law,
more extensive than this, and equally important to be
known, and every day in use by the whole of the
people
.
So that the disuse of lawyers, judges, and courts,
or superceding the necessity of them by novel
institutions
,
is what will be found impracticable consistent
with government.
Nevertheless, said Harum Scarum, who had just
come in, and heard the concluding part of what the
chief justice had said, Harum Scarum, whom the
governor
had just appointed secretary: Nevertheless,
said he, so it is, that nolens volens, the people will
have the lawyers and the judges down. They may
let the chief justice alone a while, because he is blind.
There is a generosity in men that leads them to spare
the miserable. But as to lawyers that have their hands,
and judges that can see, down they go: every day has
its rage; ca ira, it will go on. The Marseilles hymn
need not be sung to this. Marchez, Marchez;
Marchon
,
Marchon. It will march of itself, quick step.
P 2
There needs no drum beat, or fife to play. So much
for the lawyers; they are under way, and down they go.
Every day has its trumpery of opinions, and
pursuits
;
obstinacies, and predilections. We had the age
of swindlers some time ago. Every man that had a
mountain, or no matter whether he had one or not, he
sold the top first, and then the bottom. For though
you lawyers say, chief justice, that Cujus est solum,
ejus est usque ad Coelum; yet we have no such
maxim
as usque ad Tartarum, and so he might sell the
bottom
and by the bye, represent it as level, and well
watered
,
which he could not always say, with a good
conscience
as to the frustrum of the cone, whether the
parabola, or the hyperbola. It was not enough for
the swindler, to purchase or sell lands that were neither
in the moon, or on the earth, nor in the waters
under
the earth; but he must go to the ring of Saturn,
and the planet Herchel. There was no end to
deception
on the one hand, or credulity on the other.
But we have seen this age pass over, and now is
the age of
oeconomies
. A man wears spectacles, or a
clout on his eye, to save day-light; his shirt above his
coat in the day-time, and sleeps in his coat at night, to
save his shirt. It has got among the very Indians. A
sachem runs with his back-side bare, to save his
breeches
,
but wastes as much oil on his posteriors to keep
them from muskittoes, as would buy overalls, or
pantaloons
,
to hide his nakedness.
Harum Scarum, said the governor, you are an
extravagant
fellow in your painting; you exagerate. I
expect better things from the people, than such
derangement
in their ideas of policy. But, in the mean
time, let us take dinner.
Note
. There are two problems in politics, which
have some difficulty in the solution. The one is the
power of the judiciary, to adjudge a law void on the
ground of
unconstitutionality
. The other is that which
we have just touched upon a little, in the preceding
chapters; viz. the practibility of adjusting civil
controversies
by
arbitration
.
On the first point, we find a precedent in the
government
of the Athenian people. I shall quote from a
translation of the travels of Anacharsis the younger.
Amidst that multitude of decrees, we see from
time to time enacted with the sanction of the Senate,
and the people, some there are in manifest
contradiction
to the welfare of the state, and which it is
important
not to suffer to subsist. But, as they were the
acts of the legislative power, it should seem that no
authority, no tribunal is competent to annual them.
The people themselves should not attempt it, lest the
orators who have already taken them by
surprise
,
should again mislead them. What resource then shall
there be for the republic? A law singular indeed at
first sight, but admirable in its nature, and so essential
as to reduce it impossible either to suppress or
neglect
it, without destroying the democracy; I mean the
law that authorizes the very
lowest citizen to appeal
from a judgment of the whole people
, whenever he is
able to demonstrate, that the new decree is contrary
to the laws already established.
In these circumstances, it is the
invisible sovereign
,
it is the laws which loudly protest against the national
judgement that has violated them; it is in the name of
the laws that the accusation is brought forward; it is
before the tribunal, which is the chief depositary and
avenger of the laws, that it is prosecuted; and the
judges by setting aside the decree, only pronounce that
the
authority of the people has happened to clash
unintentionally
with that of the laws;
or rather they maintain
the ancient and permanent decisions of the
people
against their present and transient inclinations
.
On the second point, I meet with a precedent, in
the same state, the Athenian, and I quote from the
same book. I cannot overlook an institution which
appears to me highly favourable to those, who, though
they appeal to the laws
, wish not to be litigious.
Every
year forty inferior judges go the circuit through
the different towns of Attica, hold their
assizes
there,
decide on certain acts of violencs, and terminate all
processes for small sums,
refering more considerable
causes to arbitration
.
These arbitrators are all persons of good
reputation
,
and about 60 years of age. At the end of every
year, they are drawn by lot, out of each tribe, to the
number of 44.
Persons who do not choose to expose themselves to
the delays of ordinary justice, to deposit a sum of
money
previous to the judgment, or to pay the fine (
damages
decreed against the plaintiff, failing in his
proofs, may confide their interest
to one or more
arbibitrators
nominated by themselves
, or whom the Archon
draws by lot in their presence. When the arbitrators
are of their own choice, they take an oath to abide
by their decision, from
which they cannot appeal;
but if they are chosen by lot, they are not deprived of
that resource; and the arbitrators, inclose the
depositions
of the witnesses, and all the documents of
the process, into a box, which they carefully seal up,
and transmit them to the Archon, whose duty it is
to
lay the cause before one of the higher tribunals
.
If the Archon has referred the matter in dispute
to arbitrators drawn by lot, at the request only of one
party, the adverse party has the right, either to
demur
against the competency of the tribunals, or to
alledge other exceptions.
Arbitrators called upon to decide in affairs where
one of the parties are their friends or relations might
be tempted to pronounce an iniquitous judgment: in
such cases, it is provided,
that the cause may be
removed
into one of the superior courts
. They might also
permit themselves to be corrupted by presents, or be
influenced by private prejudices: in which case the
injured party has a right at the expiration of the year
to prosecute them in a court of justice, and compel
them to defend, and shew the reasons of their award.
The fear of such a scrutiny might likewise induce
them to elude the exercise of these functions. But the
law has provided against that by
fixing a stigma on
every arbitrator who when drawn by lot, refuses to
perform
his duty
.
The idea of
an action against an arbitrator for a
wrong judgment
, involves this, that the court above
must judge of his judgment. The
jury trial
had not
got quit of this under the shape of an attaint until the
granting new trials
took place. It proves that
arbitration
has been brought to perfection in the present state
of trial by jury,
in the presence, and under the
direction
of the court
.
CHAP. IV.
A noise
was heard coming down the town, and a
cavalcade accompanying. It was Clonmel the ballad
singer followed by the Piper, and the blind Fidler;
the one with his bag-pipes; the other with his violin.
Will Watlin was along and had a bottle in his hand;
Tom the Tinker, O'Fin the Irishman, the Latin
schoolmaster, and a number others. The song sung
was as follows:
COME gather away to the new town,
There's nothing but lilting here,
And piping and singing and dancing,
Throughout every day of the year.
No maid that comes here but gets married,
Before she is here half an hour;
The brown, the black, or the hair red,
To live single is not in her power.
Come gather away, &c.
We get our provisions for nothing;
Just knock down a wolf or a bear,
The wear and the tear of our clothing,
A dress'd skin, or just in the hair.
No trouble, no bubble, no sweating,
Like people that live in the smoke,
We catch the fresh fish with a neting,
And roast them just under the oak.
Come gather, &c.
Our governor is a fine fellow,
Chief justice as blind as a bat;
The governor sometimes gets mellow,
And blinks himself like a cat.
No lawyers are here but a couple,
Just enough to keep up the breed
The word of their mouth is a bubble,
And not worth a copper indeed.
Come gather, &c.
We have a fine printer a devil,
To whack at their fees and the court,
Because that the rascals can give ill
Opinions that do us much hurt.
Good fortune, we have little money,
To quarrel, and law suit about;
So turn up the bottle, dear honey,
But see that you dont drink it out.
Come gather, &c.
The air of this country is clearer,
The water is clearer by far,
The words of our wooing are dearer,
Such words as a body can spare;
When we smother the maids with our kisses,
And they smother us in their turn;
I swear by St. Patrick that this is,
The best country that ever was born.
Come gather, &c.
The lads they go out a racooning,
Or take at a squirrel, a shot,
If they knock down a fowl, they are soon in,
To shew what a fowl they have got.
Great shame to the Paddies below stairs,
That live in the country below,
Ly snoring, and sleeping on bolsters;
And lounging one cannot tell how.
Come gather, &c.
Up to the mountains bog-trotters;
Our shamrocks are fresh, and are green.
Set traps for your beavers and otters,
And musk-rats the best ever seen.
Though I am too lazy to rough it,
And go to the waters with you.
Because I have had just enough 'f it;
Don't like to be rich as a Jew.
Come gather, &c.
O, what is life but a blister,
Put on we cannot tell where;
And sorrow herself is a sister,
To thinking, and much taking care.
So let us be jovial, and jolly,
And make out as well as we can;
Who knows whether wisdom or folly,
Makes the better or the happier man.
Come gather, &c.
Q
The drone of the piper; the screeching of the
violin, and the voices of the multitude, made such a
noise that one would have thought they were in
Dublin
;
and had it not been that Harum Scarum looking
out saw what it was, the Governor would have thought
of issuing his proclamation to keep the peace; but
the cause being understood, there was found to be no
necessity, and the secretary with the leave of the
Governor
took a turn with them. The editor of the
journal seeing this came out. The two lawyers filed
in, a pedlar, and the bog-trotter. Being all together,
a new song was struck up, and the whole joined in
the chorus.
WHO says we're not of all trades,
And some they call professions;
Who wear their wigs or bald heads,
Scotch, English, Irish, Hessians?
The lawyer and the journal,
Though of a different calling,
And long, so like to turn all,
To tails with caterwalling.
Yet here they join in melody,
Walk hand in hand before us.
And they may go to hell the day,
They spoil the general chorus.
The bat has but its living,
No more than has the cat.
The carter with his driving,
'Tis all he can get at.
The Tinker lives by blowing,
His bellows in the fire;
The Lawyer lives by throwing,
His snout a little higher.
The Pedlar goes the circuit,
And carries his small pack,
The Judge has harder work o't,
Impeachments on his back.
So let us all be liberal,
Let one another live
Dick, Harry, Tom, and Gabriel,
Which ever way they drive.
The Fidler and the Piper,
The flute and fife agree.
The boatman or the skipper,
'Tis all the same to me.
O'Fin come taste the jorum.
And Harum Scarum pledge,
And Horum Harum horum,
Will take it next I 'ngage.
Here's to the world of worthies,
That love a merry song;
Let all your topsy turvies,
Now drink and hold your tongue.
OBSERVATIONS.
I HAVE spoken of Thomas Payne as an
uncommon
,
but
uninformed man
. The felicity of his stile,
and the magic of his wit, is irresistible. But thinking
all and reading little, at least, before the writings he
has published, his ideas are unborrowed; but he
thinks them sole, whereas the human mind had
produced
them all before. The same thoughts on
religion
or government have never been expressed with
the like illusion; but they have existed in the doubts
of the unbeliever; and the theories of political
reformers
,
before his time. This philanthropist; for
his vote on the sentence of Louis XVI. proves him to
be such, had not sufficiently considered man's nature,
and the consequence of a deracination of
establishments
,
before he began to write his books. It is
easier
to destroy than to substitute. The French
revolution
,
I presume, may have shewn him the difficulty
of arresting
the human mind at a proper point
. A book
of anecdotes, and remarks illustrative of this, with
the opportunities he has had, the discernment he
possesses
,
with the originality of his expression, would
have been a valuable work. I could wish him to have
done this, and left the priests to themselves, who
have trouble enough on their heads with the devil
unassisted
by Thomas Payne. He had no occasion to
tell philosophers, that the
discoveries in astronomy were
not favourable to some of the dogmata of our theology;
for it was the source of melancholy reflection with
themselves; and as to the bulk of believers, that have
got over it, or never got into it, it is of no use; on the
contrary, a great injury. For even supposing the
representations
of our theologists to be an illusion, why
dissipate the vision? Does it not constitute a great
portion of our happiness? Are those men supossed
to have done nothing for the world who have raised
fabricks of this kind to the imagination
even upon
false grounds?
Has it not contributed at least to
amuse in this life? It is an opiate under pain,
and
cases the mind without affecting the nerves
. But I
know what occurs upon this. It is, that it is not taking
away the opiate, but changing it. But is there no
difficulty in believing any thing, after you have begun
to doubt at all.
It is as easy to believe that all things
always were, as that they began to be
. So
that if you
lay aside revelation
, there is an end of the chapter.
When Plato read his dialogue on the immortality of
the soul, all his school rose up, save Aristotle. I
presume
the logical mind of the youth thought the
reasoning
unsatisfactory.
On the subject of
oeconomies
, I have touched on
the administration of the general government, with
what might seem a fling at the executive in the case
Q 2
of the reduction of the navy, &c. It was currente
calamo
,
and more in a vein of jealousy than certain,
and correct stricture. For I am aware of the
incapacity
and consequent presumption, of an individual not
master of reasons and circumstances, to undertake to
judge of public measures, on a great scale. It is not
from between decks in a vessel, that we expect to
hear directions to take in sail, to give more sail, or to
steer upon a wind; but from an officer on deck who
has an opportunity of judging of the way which the
vessel has, and what sail she carries. Carping at
public measures which we do not understand is not the
part of a good citizen; at the same time, unless there
is a perfect freedom of thought in a government
founded on opinion, those that direct the helm, will
be at a loss to know the impressions which public
measures
give, and mistake silence for approbation.
Hence oftentimes, a deceitful calm, which is
succeeded
by a squall, as sudden as it is destructive. I
confess I was one of those who instead of diminishing
our navy, was for augmenting it. But this was but the
idea of an individual, far from the seat of government,
and still farther from an opportunity of forming a just
estimate of the policy of public measures.
It may be discovered from some things thrown
out in the course of this work, that I am apprehensive
of giving offence, and the reader may wonder why I
should have such apprehensions. It is because I have
offended oftentimes, when I had no intention of
offending
;
and when I could not, even afterwards, conceive
how the offence could be taken. In early life,
admiring
the beauty and manners of a young girl, I made
a few verses, and presented to her. After having read
them, she returned them to me, with visible anger and
emotion; and said she did not know what she could
have done to have deserved such treatment at my
hands.
Being unfortunate in poetry, my next billet doux,
some years after, to a young lady, was in prose. But
the consequence was the same. It produced
resentment
.
I could no more divine at the time, what it
was that displeased, than I could conjure up a spirit
from the deep. I disdained to enquire into the
cause; for in turn I was offended. But reflecting
since, on the nature of the human mind, I resolve it
into this,
that I had attempted wit with my compliments,
which was mistaken for ridicule
.
There have been occasions when I had in view to
try whether I had wit, but meant nothing more than a
little pleasantry, and to tickle with a feather, and yet
have hurt the feelings of the mind much. When at
the academy, I wrote an epigram upon a class-mate
whom I much respected, and had no conception that
it would have been more than the subject of
a laugh
to himself
as well as others, but he ran almost mad,
and I ran off. It was a fortnight, before the matter
could be set right, and I could return again. A like
case happened to me some years since. The
publisher
of a gazette, applied to me relative to the
publication
of certain strictures on a public character, to
have my opinion as to their being libelous. I told
him they might not amount, in strictness to a libel;
but came rather under the idea of
scurrility
. But,
to satisfy his correspondents, who might think
themselves
neglected, if no notice was taken of what they
had sent forward, I would throw the substance of them
into a light airy dress of playfulness, and fancy, so as
not to wound the man, who was my friend, but make
it difficult to say whether the laugh was most at his
expence
,
or that of others. But contrary to my
expectation
it hurt much, and occasioned an assault and
battery
on a journalist who had copied it into his paper.
It cannot be the poignancy of any share of what
may be called wit that I possess, if any faculty that I
have may be to called; but it must be some
peculiarity
in the expression, of the effect of which, I am not
myself sensible. I have not felt that I am apt to hurt
in conversation, or that my words are liable to be
misconstrued
,
and a meaning drawn from them, which
was not intended. Yet certainly the same shape of
thought, and turn of expression, must shew itself in
common parlance. I can account for the difference on
no other principle but this, that an appearance of good
humour may rebut the suspicion of malevolence,
which might otherwise attach itself to the allusion.
When I had written, and even printed off the first
volume of this second part, which was in the course of
last summer, looking over it, at some distance of time,
I concluded to burn the impression. But not being
near a fire, it escaped; and in the mean time, I began
to consider, that it was paying but a bad compliment
to the understanding of a democratic people, who are
in the habit of freedom of speech, among themselves,
and allow great liberties, not to say licentiousness to
the press, to suspect them of being so intollerant, and
so ready to take offence, when it was not meant. Hence
it was that I have taken courage to write on, and
thought that if it did give offence, I might as well be
hanged for an old sheep as a lamb. The truth is, I
had not written myself out; but, many more ideas
springing up in my brain, and crouding together in a
narrow compass, wanted egress, and demanded to see
the light. But some of the more forward of them I have
actually knocked on the head, having reason to believe
that they might do more harm than good at the
present
time. I thought a pity of several of them, for
they struggled hard to live. But, dearies, said I, you
must go. It is better you should die than your father.
So they went, poor things, to house themselves with
the infantile images that are heard only by their
plaints in the entrance of the house of night.
Vagitus et ingens,
Infantrumque anim flentes in limine primo
CHAP. V.
THE Lay Preacher having been pronounced by
the faculty, sui compos, and come to his reason, had
been dismissed from the hospital, and had come to
the new settlement. This was now a kind of
Botany-Bay
,
to the old country, with this difference, that here,
the outcasts came voluntarily, but there of force. The
Governor received the Lay Preacher with courtesy,
and made him his chaplain. The Sunday following
he preached to a numerous congregation, in a chapel
in the woods. His discourse was taken down in short
hand, by the editor of the Twilight, and has
appeared
in his paper. As it would seem worth
preserving
we have copied it from them, and given it in
this work.
THE SERMON.
Shadrach, Meshach, and Abed-nego:
Dan. iii. 12.
These are the Hebrew names for Tom, Dick, and
Harry, and applicable to this settlement, which is a
colluvies of all nations: Mac's, O's, and Ap's; Erse,
Irish, and Welsh. But, as in a garden, a variety of
seeds, and plants, is desirable, so in a settlement,
where the human species is about to be cultivated, and
this not only for the sake of what pleases the fancy,
but what is useful for the kitchen, or for medicine.
So let no uncharitableness prevail among you, and one
cast up to the other, their origin, former occupation,
or character. I presume there would be but little to
gain or lose on a fair balance, and set off, as the
lawyers
say, among you. But it is best to consider all
accounts squared, and set out in a new partnership.
It falls to the lot of my function to see what good
advice I can give you, for it is by admonition only that
I can serve the commonwealth. I shall leave
spiritual
things to my brother, the Methodist, who is as
busy
as a bee in a tar barrel yonder, raising the
affections
,
and disturbing the imagination. I shall content
myself with some things merely temporal.
The sin that most easily besets a new settler, is
laziness, or to give it a more civil term,
indolence
.
He gets the means of life easily. He sets a trap over
night; or, he goes out with his gun in the morning,
and kills game. The flesh serves for food, and the
skin for covering. The soil is fertile, and yields, some
30, some 40, some 60, and some an 100 fold. This
just by a little stirring of the hoe. For you must know
that I myself have been brought up in a new
settlement
,
and know the history of such. Though that
settlement, in which I was brought up is now an
hundred
miles below us, not by the sinking of the earth,
but by the frontier pushing back, and settling beyond
it. Indolence, I know, is a vice of that situation. For
necessity is the mother of invention, and impels to
labour.
Duris in rebus, urgens egestas.
Said the Latin schoolmaster;
Improbus labor omnia vincit.
Drive out that fellow there, said the Sexton. He
disturbs the congregation.
The Preacher proceeded.
Now if a man can live without working, he will
not work. The cattle of a settler browzes in the woods;
and subsits even in the winter, without other shelter,
or food, than the under wood, and such shrubbery as
covers the head of a valley, where the soil is dry, and
the spring rises. The wilderness obstructs the course
of the winter winds, and the cabbin is warm on the
south side of the hill. Hence the temptation to
indolence
.
But there is a worse sin that easily besets the
settler
in a new country; these especially that settle
in a town, where there is usually a tavern, a store, and
a race ground for the horse jockies. This sin, or vice
is,
intemperance
. Horse jockeying, shooting matches,
and all elections, are an inlet to this. Shew me a man
that frequents the county town, much, and I will shew
you one that is in the way to contract a habit of
intoxication
.
The little peltry he may have got to buy
himself a hunting shirt, or a little tea, and sugar, for
his family, goes into the whiskey bottle.
Now to the application, said Harum Scarum, this
will do for the body of the sermon.
As to application, said the Preacher, I will leave
that to every man to make for himself. You can all
apply the doctrine as well as I can.
Non omnia possumus omnes.
Said the Latinist.
Will not that fellow be quiet yet? Said the
Sexton
,
drive him out.
By the bye he was out already, for the woods was
all the chapel that they had; and a rising ground
for the pulpit; but the Sexton meant to remove him
from the circle; and it was so understood; for they
pushed him back to some distance.
The Governor reprimanded Harum Scarum, for
his interruption also; for though this could be
considered
but as a substitute for preaching, until a
regular
clergyman came forward, yet, in the mean time,
the rules of propriety ought to be observed, and
interruption
or desultory dialogue was improper.
Harum Scarum asked pardon, but wished the
preacher would stick a little more to his text, and
illustrate
the words Shadrach, Meshach, and
Abednego
.
The Preacher said he had done that already, and
would not return to it; but, as the usual time had
clapsed, he would now finish his discourse.
R
CONCLUSION.
COMPARING great things with small, we have
written this book in the manner of certain of the
ancients
;
that is, with a
dramatic cast
. The book of
Job, is amongst the earliest of all compositions, and
after an introduction containing the history of his
misfortunes
,
and malady, introduces the speakers in three
different characters, and names, each sustaining his
opinion; and giving the authour an opportunity to
canvass the subject he had in view, the ways of
Providence
,
and to give lessons of humility and
resignation
to man.
The Socratic school, and amongst these, have
distinguished
themselves chiefly, Plato in his dialogues,
and Zenophon, in his Symposium, or Banquet.
It has been followed by the Romans; of whom
Cicero in his book treating of the qualifications of an
orator, or, as we commonly stile it, de oratore, is the
happiest instance.
Sir Thomas More introduces his Utopia, in this
manner. But the most complete model of such
structure
of writing, is a posthumous work of David Hume,
his Religion of Nature.
The vehicle which I have chosen of supposed
travels, and conversations, affords great scope, and
much freedom, and furnishes an opportunity to
enliven
with incident. Doubtless it is of the same nature,
with many things in the novel way, written by
philosophic
men, who chose that form of writing, for the
purpose merely of conveying sentiments, which in a
didactic work, under the head of tract or dissertation,
could not so easily gain attention, or procure readers.
But the characters which we have introduced, are
many of them low. That gives the greater relief to
the mind.
The eye withdraws itself, to rest,
Upon the green of folly's breast.
Shakespeare has his Bardolph, Nymn, and
Pistol, and the dialogue of these is a relief to
the drama of the principal personages. It is so in
nature; and why should it not be so represented in
the images of her works. We have the sage and the
fool, interspersed in society, and the fool gives
occasion
for the wise man to make his reflections. So in
our book.
In the beginning of the work, will be seen
Entered
according to act of Congress
. How far this
might legaily exclude extracts from the work, it is
not necessary to consider, as the authour gives
permission
to all Journalists to extract what they think
proper; and even essayists who write a book, are at
liberty, to copy with all freedom, if they should find
themselves at their shifts, or, as we say, a dead lift,
for something to diversify their lucubrations. In this
case, if the book itself should leave home but little,
it will be known abroad by the quotations; and the
chances will be multiplied of coming down to
posterity
,
at least as to the title, and perhaps something of
the manner, and the execution.
Criticisms, if the bagatelle should seem to deserve
it, favourable, or otherwise, will be well taken, with
exception only to that stile and manner, which we
call scurrilous, not so much for our own sake, as for
the sake of those who have a propensity that way, and
whom we would not wish to encourage, by an express
invitation. If they indulge it, it is not amiss for them
to know that
it is not to our taste, or acceptation
. Such
as have no other talent, must be indulged; but it is
as we indulge the frailties of mortals in other cases.
It is a pleasure to have it known that one lives; yet
there is no man who would not rather be unknown
than much hurt. But though, what is
undervaluing
must hurt, yet men of the quill, as erst those of the
sword, would rather bear a gentle prick than not
have the rare pleasure of playing with a master of
the noble science of defence. There is no knowing
how our guards may be beaten down; or how the
adversary
may prick in an unguarded part; but it will
be a hard case if our
diversions
should prove a serious
matter, and through the imperfection of language, or
our awkwardness, occasion misconception and ill will.
Deprecating this, we consign the volume to the
public
.
We do not say the world; for it has got a bad
name. We have heard since ever we recollect, the
terms, an ungenerous world; a wicked world; a
persecuting
world. But the word
public
carries with it
a more favourable impression. Public spirit, is spoken
of as a virtue, and most men profess themselves
disposed
to
serve the public
. Taking this distinction
therefore, we hope we are safe in giving this thing
publicity
, and under this impression, to use a pun, we
commit the impression to the booksellers in the first
instance, and from them it may go into libraries, or
the hands of hawkers, as may happen. Time and
chance happeneth to all men, and so it must to
things.